Evaluation of the rapid diagnostic test OptiMAL for diagnosis of malaria due to Plasmodium vivax.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of the rapid diagnostic test OptiMAL for diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax malaria.We included all the patients who sought medical attention in the San Martin Pangoa Hospital, Junin, an area endemic for vivax malaria in Peru, between October and December 1998, who had fever during the previous 72 hours and who were older than 12 months. The gold standard for diagnosis was thick blood film microscopy. We determined the parasitemia rate for each of the positive slides. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test.We included 72 patients; 39 of them were positive for P. vivax by microscopic examination. The sensitivity of the Optimal test was 92.3%, the specificity 100%, the positive predictive value 100% and the negative predictive value 91.6%. The accuracy of the test was 95.8%. The sensitivity of the OptiMAL test progressively decreased when parasitemia was lower than 1,000 parasites/microliter.the OptiMAL test has a high sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of P. vivax malaria. However, its sensitivity decreased when parasitemia levels were lower. It is a very simple technique, which makes it a good alternative for malaria diagnosis in remote places, although its elevated cost is still a problem.Performance of OptiMAL-IT compared to microscopy, for malaria detection in Burkina Faso.To compare the performance of OptiMAL-IT, a rapid diagnostic test for malaria, with that of microscopy in Burkina Faso.Finger-prick blood samples of 464 children attending hospital for suspected malaria were tested for malaria by microscopy and OptiMAL-IT.The sensitivity and specificity of OptiMAL-IT were 98.7% (CI 95% = 97.6-99.8) and 96.2% (CI 95% = 94.3-98.1) respectively, with a high positive likelihood ratio (25.97).OptiMAL-IT can be considered a good method to diagnose malaria in Burkina Faso, particularly in remote areas with little or no access to microscopy services.The diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Gambian children, by field staff using the rapid, manual, ParaSight-F test.A rapid immunodiagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum, the ParaSight-F test, was evaluated in the diagnosis of malaria in 139 children with uncomplicated malaria, who presented at the Medical Research Council's clinic at Basse in Upper River division, The Gambia. The aim was to evaluate the performance and usefulness of the test as a diagnostic method in a malaria-endemic area, when performed by a field worker. Compared with microscopy, the test had a sensitivity of 96.5%, a specificity of 90.5%, a negative predictive value of 94.2% and a positive predictive value of 94.3%. Because of its sensitivity, specificity and simplicity, the ParaSight-F test will be of value in situations where microscopy is not possible.Comparison of different diagnostic techniques in Plasmodium falciparum cerebral malaria.Plasmodium falciparum cerebral malaria remains a major health problem in India. The efficacy of treatment of cerebral malaria lies in its early diagnosis through rapid diagnostic methods. ParaSights-F test detects HRP-2 antigen secreted by parasitised red blood cells and quantitative buffy coat assay (QBC) is examination of buffy coat for the presence of malarial parasite stained with acridine orange. This study was performed to evaluate the effectiveness of ParaSight-F test and QBC assay as diagnostic methods in the patients of cerebral malaria.Fifty clinically diagnosed patients of cerebral malaria were included in the study. ParaSight-F test, QBC and conventional blood smear examination was done. Patients who were in coma and there were no obvious features of bacterial or viral etiology were investigated for cerebral malaria by these diagnostic methods.ParaSight-F test, QBC and peripheral blood smears were examined. Patients were followed-up for signs of clinical recovery. ParaSight-F test was positive in 47 patients, QBC in 46 while blood smear examination was positive in 28 cases.Sensitivity and specificity of ParaSight-F test were found to be 96.6 and 94% while QBC showed 97.8 and 100% respectively. ParaSight-F test and QBC were found to be novel methods for diagnosis of cerebral malaria especially in the cases where diagnosis can not be made by conventional blood smear examination due to low parasitaemia. These rapid diagnostic methods help in early therapeutic intervention.Multicentre study, in patients with imported malaria, on the sensitivity and specificity of a dipstick test (ICT Malaria P.f./P.v.) compared with expert microscopy.A prospective, multicentre study was carried out in Italy to assess the sensitivity and specificity of a rapid dipstick test (ICT Malaria P.f./P.v.) in the diagnosis of imported malaria caused by Plasmodium falciparum and other Plasmodium spp. The test is based on the detection of histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2) from P. falciparum and 'panmalarial' antigen in peripheral blood. The 241 subjects were international travellers or immigrants from areas where malaria is endemic. When compared with the microscopical examination of bloodsmears (used as the 'gold standard'), the dipsticks were found to be 94.4% sensitive and 94.5% specific for pure infections with P. falciparum. The performance of the tests when used on patients infected with species other than P. falciparum or more than one Plasmodium spp. showed a high degree of variability. Although the dipsticks represent a very simple, rapid, and valuable diagnostic aid, they should not be considered a complete substitute for direct microscopical diagnosis using stained bloodsmears.Comparison with the Pan Malaria IgG assays for malaria diagnosis and direct microscopy among suspected malaria patients in Sanliurfa.In this study, we evaluated the usage of the Pan Malaria IgG CELISA test in the diagnosis of malarial infections in Siverek-Sanliurfa, Turkey, where malarial infection is endemic and there are minimal health services available. The Pan Malaria IgG CELISA (Cellabs) test, which uses recombinant antigens and detects exposure to all four forms of malaria (P. falciparum, P. vivax, P. ovale and P. malariae) was used as individuals. Using the consensus microscopy results as the standard, sensitivity of ELISA for detection of any malarial infection in the rural populations was 83%, specificity was 85%. These results show that the performance of ELISA for the detection of any malarial infection is adequate for acute- and post-emergency situations and rural populations when the alternative is just clinical diagnosis.Diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in pregnancy in sub-Saharan Africa: the challenges and public health implications.Plasmodium falciparum malaria in pregnancy is a major public health problem in sub-Saharan Africa and represents enormous diagnostic challenge. The objective of this report was to review scientific data from studies conducted in sub-Saharan Africa on the diagnosis of malaria in pregnancy within the last two decades (1987 to 2007), to highlight the challenges and the public health implications. Using the Medline Entrez-Pubmed search, relevant publications were identified for the review via combinations of key words such as Malaria, Pregnancy, and Sub-Saharan Africa, which yielded 777 entries as of September 2007. The results from the various studies were discordant, due to differences in the techniques of sample collection and analysis, based on the differences in the definition of clinical, peripheral, and placental malaria. Definitions were based on the presence of malaria parasite and/or pigments in blood smear from peripheral/placental blood, on histological placental findings, on the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Nonspecific clinical presentation of malaria, lack of efficient diagnostic facilities and trained personnel, and absence of regulatory standards for diagnostic tests, are some of the major diagnostic challenges. Increased allocation of resources to development and application of accurate diagnostics will improve malaria diagnosis in pregnancy.Evaluation of Plasmodium-lactate dehydrogenase based immunochromatographic kit for the diagnosis of malaria.Rapid diagnosis of vivax malaria by the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test when thrombocytopenia is present.An easy and reliable diagnostic method for malaria is highly desirable. We examined the recently introduced SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test, which detects Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase, with the additional aid of the presence or absence of thrombocytopenia to diagnose vivax malaria. We enrolled 732 patients with clinically suspected malaria in an area where vivax malaria is endemic. We performed microscopic examination of thin film, applied the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test, and checked platelet counts. One hundred ninety-five patients were smear positive for vivax malaria. The sensitivity of the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test was 96.4%, and its specificity was 98.9%. We found that 95.4% of malaria patients had thrombocytopenia, and the proportion with malaria increased as platelet counts decreased. A positive SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test when thrombocytopenia was present showed a 100% positive predictive value for vivax malaria. In conclusion, the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test is a rapid and accurate diagnostic method for vivax malaria, and a platelet count can facilitate a rapid diagnosis of malaria.A comparison of antigen dipstick assays with polymerase chain reaction (PCR) technique and blood film examination in the rapid diagnosis of malaria.Early diagnosis of malaria for military personnel training in the field is crucial in providing proper treatment for the infected and in taking appropriate preventive measures for the non-infected. Present preliminary diagnosis of malaria in the field depends on the clinical symptoms of the patients and there is a need for rapid diagnosis of malaria in the field. The presence of drug-resistant strains of the Plasmodium species in the region also increases the urgency of finding a quick and sensitive way of identifying the different strains. This study evaluated current methods available for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. The dipstick assays, the ParaSight F test and the OptiMAL malaria rapid test were compared with the methods of microscopic examination of blood film and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). On comparison to the blood film and PCR methods, the ParaSight F test has specificity of 98.6% and sensitivity of 91% for P. falciparum detection. The OptiMAL malaria rapid test has a specificity of 100% and 98.6% and sensitivity of 92.8% and 92.6% for P. vivax and P. falciparum detection respectively. We conclude that both tests are suitable for use for rapid malaria diagnosis in the field but the OptiMAL rapid malaria test, which can detect both vivax and falciparum malaria, would be more useful.[Evaluation of two rapid diagnostic tests, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL, for diagnosis of malaria].To increase the accessibility of malaria diagnosis, the Instituto Nacional de Salud de Colombia undertook a field trial to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of two rapid diagnostic tests.The sensitivity, specificity and concordance was compared for two rapid diagnostic tests for malaria, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL.A descriptive and concordance study was performed with 214 patients in the southwestern coastal city of Tumaco, Colombia, each of whom presented at least one of the symptoms of the classical malaria triad. Two strategies were applied for patient recruitment-one by passive search and a second through local health brigades.NOW ICT showed a general sensitivity of 98.4% (95%CI: 90.3-99.9), and a general specificity of 98.0% (95%CI: 93.9-99.5). For Plasmodium falciparum, the sensitivity was 98.2% (95%CI: 89.4-99.9) and the specificity 98.1% (95%CI: 94.1-99.5). The sensitivity was lower (80.0%) when parasitemia ranged from 200 to 4,000 parasites/microl. The sensitivity and specificity of the NOW ICT for P. vivax malaria were 100%. The sensitivity for this test was not affected for the established ranges of parasitemia for P. vivax. The overall figures for OptiMAL were 95.2% (95%CI: 85.8-98.8) sensitivity and 99.3% (95%CI: 95.8-100.0) specificity. For P. falciparum malaria OptiMAL showed 94.7% (95%CI: 84.5-98.6) sensitivity and 99.4% (95%CI: 96.0-100.0) specificity. The sensitivity was lower (60.0%) when samples with 200-4,000 parasites/microl were tested. For P. vivax, OptiMAL presented a 66.7% (95%CI: 24.1-94.0) sensitivity, which diminished to 50% with a parasitemia between 300-2.500 parasites/microL.Good results for sensitivity and specificity were obtained for malaria diagnosis using NOW ICT and OptiMAL, with NOW ICT showing higher sensitivity and specificity values than OptiMAL.Evaluation of the OptiMAL rapid antigen test and species-specific PCR to detect placental Plasmodium falciparum infection at delivery.During pregnancy, Plasmodium falciparum infection of the placenta frequently occurs in the absence of parasites in peripheral blood. We investigated the abilities of the OptiMAL rapid immunochromatographic strip test for P. falciparum lactate dehydrogenase and species-specific PCR performed on peripheral blood to detect placental infection or malaria-associated low birth weight. Of 509 Malawian women screened by microscopy, 76 had malaria infection. Among these 509 women, the frequency of peripheral blood parasitemia was low. The OptiMAL test gave positive results in 37 of 171 women tested (one of whom had placental but not peripheral blood parasitemia) and had sensitivities of 71% for peripheral parasitemia and 38% for placental parasitemia compared to the microscopy values. The specificity for peripheral parasitemia was 94%. In 135 women, PCR had sensitivities of 94% for peripheral blood malaria detected by microscopy and 72% for placental infection. In samples examined by PCR, the prevalence of malaria in peripheral blood increased from 26.7% by microscopy to 51.9%. Women with placental malaria and women with malaria in peripheral blood samples by microscopy or OptiMAL testing, but not women with malaria detected only by PCR, had lower-birth-weight babies than did women without malaria by these criteria. Positive results by PCR in the absence of microscopic parasitemia were not associated with low birth weight. Neither OptiMAL nor PCR testing of peripheral blood is adequately sensitive to detect all placental malaria infection, but a positive result by OptiMAL testing identifies women with a high proportion of low-birth-weight babies.A bedside dipstick method to detect Plasmodium falciparum.We conducted this study to determine efficacy of Parasight-F (an HRP-II antigen dipstick method to detect P. Falciparum) in children. A total of 30 children were enrolled in the age group of 2 months to 12 years whose peripheral smear showed asexual forms of Plasmodium falciparum. All patients were tested for presence of HRP-II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum in their blood by the Parasight-F dipstick test by either an EDTA sample or a finger prick blood sample. The sensitivity of Parasight-F was 83.3 % However, the sensitivity of Parasight-F to detect Plasmodium Falciparum in case of mixed Plasmodium (Vivax + Falciparum) infection was only 25 %. Also, all patients less than 6 months of age had a negative Parasight-F test. Parasitic index, prior treatment with antimalarials or severity of Falciparum malaria have no effect on the sensitivity of Parasight-F test. We conclude that Parasight-F is an effective tool for diagnosis of Plasmoduim falciparum malaria in children.Role of ICT malaria immunochromatographic test for rapid diagnosis of malaria.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of immunochromatographic test (ICT) malaria p.f/p.v using microscopy as the gold standard diagnosis.Five hundred and sixty patients of both sexes and all age groups with clinical suspicion of malaria were studied. Venous blood was collected for microscopy and ICT. Thick and thin films prepared and stained with Leishman's stain were examined. ICT malaria test was performed and interpreted according to manufacturer's instructions. Data was analyzed using Epi-6.A total of 560 cases were studied, 339 males and 221 females with age ranges between 2 to 73 years. Seventy two (12.85%) cases had parasitaemia (with or without sexual forms). On microscopy 65 (11.6%) cases had asexual-stage parasitaemia and 7 (1.25%) cases had P. falciparum gametocytes only. Thirty two cases were infected with P. falciparum, 29 with P. vivax and 4 had mixed infection. For P. falciparum the ICT was 97.0% sensitive, 98.3% specific, with positive predictive value (PPV) of 78.0% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99.8%. For P. vivax the sensitivity was only 89.7%, specificity 97.9%, PPV was 70.3% and NPV 99.4%.Our results are in concordance with previous studies. Rapid tests though expensive are simple to perform and effective diagnostic tools of malaria. They can be used selectively, though microscopy remains the gold standard diagnosis, economical and accurate if performed by skilled technologists.Use of dipstick tests for the rapid diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune travelers.Swift diagnosis of falciparum malaria in nonendemic areas is frequently complicated by lack of experience on the side of involved laboratory personnel. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) (ICT Malaria P.f. (R)) and parasite-specific lactate-dehydrogenase (pLDH) (OptiMal(R)), respectively, have become available for the qualitative detection of falciparum malaria.In order to evaluate currently available assays, a series of studies was conducted: sensitivity and specificity were evaluated by investigation of specimens from 231 febrile returnees from endemic areas, cross reactivity in patients with rheumatoid factor (RF) was assessed among 92 patients from a rheumatology unit, and the quality of dipstick self-use by febrile travelers was tested in Kenya.Whereas the test kit based on the detection of HRP-2 performed with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 98.3%, the kit for the detection of pLDH showed a sensitivity of 88.5% and a specificity of 99.4%. Cross-reactions with sera positive for rheumatoid factor occurred in 6.6% with the ICT Malaria P.f.(R), and in 3.3% with the OptiMal(R) test. Only ICT Malaria P.f.(R) was tested for quality of self-use among travelers. This dipstick assay was performed successfully by 67 patients (68.4%), but 31 (31.6%) were unable to obtain a result.Dipstick tests have the potential of enhancing speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, especially if nonspecialized laboratories are involved. However, microscopical testing remains mandatory in every single patient with the possible diagnosis of malaria. Self-use of dipstick tests for malaria diagnosis by travelers should only be recommended after appropriate instruction and training, including a successful performance of the test procedure.The reliability of diagnostic techniques in the diagnosis and management of malaria in the absence of a gold standard.The accuracy of techniques for the diagnosis of malaria are usually compared with optical microscopy, which is considered to be a gold standard. However, microscopy is prone to error and therefore makes it difficult to assess the reliability of other diagnostic techniques. We did a systematic review to assess the specificity and sensitivity of diagnostic techniques in different settings, using a statistical method that avoided defining a gold standard. Performance varied depending on species of the malaria parasite, level of parasitaemia, and immunity. Overall, histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2)-based dipsticks showed a high sensitivity (92.7%) and specificity (99.2%) for Plasmodium falciparum in endemic areas. The acridine orange test was more sensitive (97.1%) in detecting P falciparum in epidemiological studies, with a specificity of 97.9%. In the absence of a gold standard, HRP2 dipsticks and acridine orange could provide an alternative for detecting falciparum infections in endemic areas and epidemiological studies, respectively. Microscopy still remains more reliable in detecting non-falciparum infections.Evaluation of a malaria rapid diagnostic test for assessing the burden of malaria during pregnancy.Plasmodium falciparum infection during pregnancy may cause placental malaria and subsequently low birth weight, primarily through the placental sequestration of infected red blood cells. Measuring the burden of malaria during pregnancy usually involves determining the prevalence of placental malaria infection through microscopic examination of placental blood films, a difficult and error-prone process. A number of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria have been developed, most of them immunochromatographic dipstick assays. However, none have been tested for the direct determination of malaria antigen in placental blood. We undertook an evaluation of the Malaria Rapid Test (MAKROmed in determining placental malaria infection. The prevalence of placental parasitemia was 22.6% by microscopy, 51.0% by a polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and 43.1% by RDT. When the PCR was used as the gold standard, RDTs had a sensitivity of 89% and a specificity of 76%. The MAKROmed RDT was highly sensitive in the detection of placental malaria, but had lower than expected specificity.Use of a histidine-rich protein 2-based rapid diagnostic test for malaria by health personnel during routine consultation of febrile outpatients in a peripheral health facility in Yaounde, Cameroon.The role of a rapid diagnostic test (RDT) in the case management of Plasmodium falciparum malaria infections has not been determined in Africa. Our study was conducted during November 2007-January 2008 to assess test accuracy of an RDT in the management of febrile outpatients in a peripheral urban health facility in Cameroon. We found the overall sensitivity to be 71.4% and a specificity of 82.2%; the positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 73.8% and 80.4%, respectively. False-negative and false-positive cases represented 11.8% and 10.5% of all febrile patients. Malaria alone (31.3%) was the first cause of fever; 33.5% of fever cases were of unknown origin. Acute respiratory infections were common among children 0-2 years of age (25.5%) and decreased with age. The risk of having a clinical failure with the presumptive treatment of febrile children was seven times greater than that of the RDT-oriented management (relative risk = 6.8, 95% confidence interval = 0.88-53.4, P = 0.03) because of the delay of appropriate treatment of non-malarial febrile illness. Our results suggest that the RDT may be of limited utility for children greater than five years of age and adults and that diagnosis based on microscopic examination of blood smears should be recommended for these patient populations, as well as in areas of low transmission.[Serum HRP-2 antigens and imported Plasmodium falciparum malaria: comparison of ParaSight-F and ICT malaria P.f].Serum levels of HRP-2 antigens against Plasmodium falciparum in 568 venous blood samples collected at two general hospitals were evaluated using the ParaSight-F (Becton-Dickinson) alone (568/568 samples) or in combination (156/568 samples) with the new ICT-Malaria P.f. (ICT-diagnostic). Comparison with the reference method (thin and thick blood smears assessed by two experienced parasitologists) showed that both tests were highly sensitive (93% and 96% respectively) and specific (98% and 98% respectively). The positive predictive values of the two tests were equal (96%) and the negative predicative values were close (96% and 98% respectively). Although both tests provided results within 10 minutes and required no special equipment for interpretation, the ICT-Malaria P.f. test seemed simpler and easier to use than the ParaSight-F test. The ParaSight-F test alone was used to monitor serum antigen levels after treatment in 24 patients. Antigen levels remained positive for at least three days after disappearance of circulating parasites (range: 3 to 28 days). Evaluation of serum levels of HRP-2 antigens can be useful for emergency diagnosis, especially in patients with low circulating parasite levels. The ICT-Malaria P.f. test seems especially suited for in-field use.Rapid immunochromatographic diagnosis and Rolling Back Malaria--experiences from an African control program.Malaria is a re-emerging disease in much of Africa. In response, the World Health Organization launched the Roll Back Malaria (RBM) initiative. One of six key principles adopted is the early detection of malaria cases. However, the importance of definitive diagnosis and potential value of field deployment of rapid malaria tests in RBM has been largely ignored. The Lowveld Region of Mpumalanga Province, South Africa, is home to a predominantly non-immune population, of approximately 850000 inhabitants, who are at risk of seasonal Plasmodium falciparum malaria. Malaria treatment in this area is usually only initiated on detection of malaria parasites in the peripheral bloodstream, as many other rickettsial and viral febrile illness mimic malaria. The malaria control programme traditionally relied on light microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick blood films for malaria diagnosis. This review summarizes operational research findings that led to the introduction of rapid malaria card tests for primary diagnosis of malaria throughout the Mpumalanga malaria area. Subsequent operational research and extensive experience over a four-year period since introducing the ICT Malaria Pf test appears to confirm the local appropriateness of this diagnostic modality. A laboratory is not required and clinic staff are empowered to make a prompt definitive diagnosis, limiting delays in initiating correct therapy. The simple, accurate and rapid non-microscopic means now available for diagnosing malaria could play an important role in Rolling Back Malaria in selected areas.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria at sites of varying transmission intensity in Uganda.In Africa, fever is often treated presumptively as malaria, resulting in misdiagnosis and the overuse of antimalarial drugs. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria may allow improved fever management.We compared RDTs based on histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) and RDTs based on Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) with expert microscopy and PCR-corrected microscopy for 7000 patients at sites of varying malaria transmission intensity across Uganda.When all sites were considered, the sensitivity of the HRP2-based test was 97% when compared with microscopy and 98% when corrected by PCR; the sensitivity of the pLDH-based test was 88% when compared with microscopy and 77% when corrected by PCR. The specificity of the HRP2-based test was 71% when compared with microscopy and 88% when corrected by PCR; the specificity of the pLDH-based test was 92% when compared with microscopy and >98% when corrected by PCR. Based on Plasmodium falciparum PCR-corrected microscopy, the positive predictive value (PPV) of the HRP2-based test was high (93%) at all but the site with the lowest transmission rate; the pLDH-based test and expert microscopy offered excellent PPVs (98%) for all sites. The negative predictive value (NPV) of the HRP2-based test was consistently high (>97%); in contrast, the NPV for the pLDH-based test dropped significantly (from 98% to 66%) as transmission intensity increased, and the NPV for expert microscopy decreased significantly (99% to 54%) because of increasing failure to detect subpatent parasitemia.Based on the high PPV and NPV, HRP2-based RDTs are likely to be the best diagnostic choice for areas with medium-to-high malaria transmission rates in Africa.Evaluation of two tests based on the detection of histidine rich protein 2 for the diagnosis of imported Plasmodium falciparum malaria.The ParaSight-F dipstick test (Becton Dickinson, USA) and the ICT Malaria Pf test (ICT, Australia) both detect histidine rich protein 2 (HRP-2), a water-soluble antigen expressed by Plasmodium falciparum trophozoites. The present study compared the diagnostic performance of both tests in persons returning to Belgium from countries endemic for malaria. During a period of 18 months both tests were performed on all patients returning from the tropics with a positive malaria blood film. Patients with fever without an obvious cause were used as controls. For the ParaSight-F test, considering P. falciparum trophozoites only, sensitivity was 95% and specificity 90%. Considering trophozoites of all species of Plasmodium, sensitivity was 71% and specificity 87%. Finally, considering patients with clinical malaria, the sensitivity of the test was 72% and specificity 87%. For the ICT Malaria Pf test, sensitivity was 95% and specificity 89% for P. falciparum trophozoites only, 71% and 86% for trophozoites of all species, and 72% and 87% for clinical malaria. Both tests gave highly comparable results. However, antigen detection assays cannot replace conventional microscopy in diagnosing imported malaria. Thick blood film examination is more sensitive and more specific, it allows estimation of parasitaemia and distinction between parasite growth stages, and it covers all species. Moreover, with treated patients the use of antigen tests might lead to problems in determining the efficacy of therapy.Accuracy and reliability of malaria diagnostic techniques for guiding febrile outpatient treatment in malaria-endemic countries.The main purpose of this study was to assess the accuracy of various techniques available for diagnosis of malaria. Blood samples were collected from 313 patients with clinical suspicion of uncomplicated malaria in 2 primary health centers in Madagascar. The presence of Plasmodium parasites was assessed by conventional microscopy, 2 rapid diagnostic tests (one HRP2-based test, PALUTOP(+4), and one pLDH-based test, OptiMAL-IT), and real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR), which is used as the "gold standard" method. The degree of agreement observed was very high for microscopy (0.99) and the HRP2-based test (0.93) and high for the pLDH-based test (0.82). Public-health implications are also discussed in this paper.Cost-effectiveness of malaria diagnostic methods in sub-Saharan Africa in an era of combination therapy.To evaluate the relative cost-effectiveness in different sub-Saharan African settings of presumptive treatment, field-standard microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) to diagnose malaria.We used a decision tree model and probabilistic sensitivity analysis applied to outpatients presenting at rural health facilities with suspected malaria. Costs and effects encompassed those for both patients positive on RDT (assuming artemisinin-based combination therapy) and febrile patients negative on RDT (assuming antibiotic treatment). Interventions were defined as cost-effective if they were less costly and more effective or had an incremental cost per disability-adjusted life year averted of less than US$ 150. Data were drawn from published and unpublished sources, supplemented with expert opinion.RDTs were cost-effective compared with presumptive treatment up to high prevalences of Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia. Decision-makers can be at least 50% confident of this result below 81% malaria prevalence, and 95% confident below 62% prevalence, a level seldom exceeded in practice. RDTs were more than 50% likely to be cost-saving below 58% prevalence. Relative to microscopy, RDTs were more than 85% likely to be cost-effective across all prevalence levels, reflecting their expected better accuracy under real-life conditions. Results were robust to extensive sensitivity analysis. The cost-effectiveness of RDTs mainly reflected improved treatment and health outcomes for non-malarial febrile illness, plus savings in antimalarial drug costs. Results were dependent on the assumption that prescribers used test results to guide treatment decisions.RDTs have the potential to be cost-effective in most parts of sub-Saharan Africa. Appropriate management of malaria and non-malarial febrile illnesses is required to reap the full benefits of these tests.Evaluation of malaria screening in newly arrived refugees to the United States by microscopy and rapid antigen capture enzyme assay.Before an empiric malaria treatment program, >60% of Liberian refugees had malaria on arrival to Minnesota. We compared microscopy with rapid antigen testing for detecting asymptomatic parasitemia. Nine of 103 (8.7%) had malaria by polymerase chain reaction (blood smear and rapid testing had a sensitivity of 22%). The empiric treatment program has decreased the rate of imported asymptomatic malaria. Blood film and rapid antigen testing are poor screening tests.Sensitivity and specificity of dipstick tests for rapid diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune travelers.Swift diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in areas where the disease is not endemic is frequently complicated by the lack of experience on the side of involved laboratory personal. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), respectively, have become available for the qualitative detection of P. falciparum malaria. In order to evaluate two of the currently available assays, specimens from 231 patients were screened during a prospective multicenter study. Among the screened specimens, samples from 53 patients (22.9%) were positive for P. falciparum malaria by microscopy and/or PCR. While the test kit based on the detection of HRP-2 performed with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 98.3%, the kit for the detection of pLDH showed a sensitivity of 88.5% and a specificity of 99.4%. Dipstick tests have the potential of enhancing speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria, especially if nonspecialized laboratories are involved.Diagnosis of malaria in a remote area of the Philippines: comparison of techniques and their acceptance by health workers and the community.To compare the efficacies of remote symptom-based diagnosis of malaria, rapid diagnostic tests and microscopy in an area of low endemicity in the Philippines.In Trial I, 350 symptomatic patients were tested within their villages using malaria Plasmodium falciparum (Pf)/Plasmodium vivax (Pv) immunochromatographic tests (ICT tests) and blood films stored and read under local conditions. The slides were later restained and read. In Trial II, unsupervised volunteer barangay health workers prepared ICT tests and slides after brief training. These slides were read at rural health units. Twenty-seven barangay health workers and 72 community members were later questioned about the three diagnostic strategies.A history of fever alone was sensitive (95.4%) but poorly specific (16.5%) for predicting parasitaemia. The inclusion of other symptoms reduced the sensitivity to below 85%, while specificity remained low. The axillary temperature was poorly predictive. ICT tests achieved high sensitivity (97.9%) but many cases indicated as positive by ICT tests were negative by microscopy. Further analysis of these cases in Trial I indicated that ICT tests were detecting low-level parasitaemias missed by microscopy, and that local microscopy had poor accuracy. ICT tests were well accepted and accurately performed by barangay health workers.These tests meet a strong desire in the community for blood-based diagnosis and may increase the compliance and treatment-seeking behaviour of patients.A review of malaria diagnostic tools: microscopy and rapid diagnostic test (RDT).The absolute necessity for rational therapy in the face of rampant drug resistance places increasing importance on the accuracy of malaria diagnosis. Giemsa microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) represent the two diagnostics most likely to have the largest impact on malaria control today. These two methods, each with characteristic strengths and limitations, together represent the best hope for accurate diagnosis as a key component of successful malaria control. This review addresses the quality issues with current malaria diagnostics and presents data from recent rapid diagnostic test trials. Reduction of malaria morbidity and drug resistance intensity plus the associated economic loss of these two factors require urgent scaling up of the quality of parasite-based diagnostic methods. An investment in anti-malarial drug development or malaria vaccine development should be accompanied by a parallel commitment to improve diagnostic tools and their availability to people living in malarious areas.Quick detection of malaria.Comparison of three antigen detection methods for diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of malaria: a field study from southern Vietnam.To compare the sensitivity, specificity and post-treatment persistence of three commonly used rapid antigen detection methods.We studied 252 Vietnamese patients aged from 4 to 60 years, 157 with falciparum and 95 with vivax malaria and 160 healthy volunteers. An initial blood sample was taken for microscopy, and OptiMAL, immunochromatographic test (ICT) malaria P.f./P.v. and Paracheck-Pf tests. Patients with falciparum malaria were treated with an artesunate-based combination regimen and those with vivax malaria received chloroquine. Eighty-seven patients with falciparum malaria who were initially positive for one of the antigen tests and who remained blood smear-negative underwent follow-up testing over 28 days.Paracheck-Pf was the most sensitive test for Plasmodium falciparum (95.8% vs. 82.6% for ICT malaria P.f./P.v. and 49.7% for OptiMAL). Specificities were all 100%. For vivax malaria, OptiMAL performed better than ICT malaria P.f./P.v. (sensitivities 73.7% and 20.0%, respectively), with 100% specificity in both cases. All tests had low sensitivities (< or = 75.0%) at parasitaemias < 1000/microl regardless of malaria species. During follow-up, Paracheck-Pf remained positive in the greatest proportion of patients, especially at higher parasitaemias (> 10,000/microl). Residual OptiMAL positivity occurred only in a relatively small proportion of patients (< 10%) with parasitaemias > 10,000/microl during the first 2 weeks after treatment.Although microscopy remains the gold standard for malaria diagnosis, Paracheck-Pf may prove a useful adjunctive test in uncomplicated falciparum malaria in southern Vietnam. OptiMAL had the lowest sensitivity for P. falciparum but it might have a use in the diagnosis of vivax malaria and perhaps to monitor efficacy of treatment for falciparum malaria where microscopy is unavailable.Diagnosis of imported malaria by Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) and histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2)-based immunocapture assays.This study was conducted to evaluate the performance of two rapid non-microscopic assays: Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) assay (OptiMAL) and Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2) assay (ICT Malaria). The assays were used to detect malaria infection in 515 immigrants living in Kuwait. The performance of both assays was compared to that of microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick blood films and to each other. Of the 515 patients tested, 163 were positive for malaria parasites by microscopy of thick blood film. Of these, 87 were infected with Plasmodium vivax parasites, 63 with P. falciparum, 1 with Plasmodium malariae, and 12 had mixed infections of P. falciparum and P. vivax. The PfHRP-2 assay detected 53 P. falciparum infections and, as expected, failed to detect all but one case of P. vivax. Three cases of mixed infections were also not detected by this assay. The pLDH assay detected 56 P. falciparum cases and 77 P. vivax infections but failed to detect 4 cases of mixed infections. Compared to microscopy, the performance of both the assays to diagnose P. falciparum infection was comparable. The sensitivity for the PfHRP-2 assay was 82% with a specificity of 99.0% and for the pLDH assay the sensitivity was 89% with a specificity of 99.5%. The PfHRP-2 assay detected 4 false positive cases, 2 of which were also detected by the pLDH assay. These patients reported treatment with chloroquine in the last 2-5 weeks. Though the immunocapture diagnostic assays may be helpful in certain situations, microscopy of thick blood film is still the method of choice in diagnosing imported malaria.Rapid diagnosis of Falciparum malaria by using the ParaSight F test in travellers returning to the United Kingdom: prospective study.Which malaria rapid test for Madagascar? Field and laboratory evaluation of three tests and expert microscopy of samples from suspected malaria patients in Madagascar.Field and laboratory studies were carried out in October and November 2005 to provide a comparative evaluation of the performance of three rapid malaria detection tests, two of which were recently introduced (the CareStart Malaria test and the SD Malaria Antigen Bioline test) and the well-known OptiMAL-IT test. Compared with microscopy, the sensitivity of the three tests to detect Plasmodium falciparum malaria was 97% for the CareStart Malaria test, 89.4% for the SD Malaria Antigen Bioline test, and 92.6% for the OptiMAL-IT test. The three tests were less sensitive in detecting non-P. falciparum infections, and the sensitivity decreased at levels of parasitemia<or=500 parasites/microL for P. falciparum and<or=5,000 parasites/microL for other Plasmodium spp. On the basis of World Health Organization recommendations, only the CareStart Malaria test and the OptiMAL-IT test had sensitivities greater than 95% for samples with parasitemias>or=100 parasites/microL.Multicenter study to evaluate the OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of malaria in U.S. hospitals.More than 1,000 cases of malaria are diagnosed each year in the United States. Reported numbers, however, may be artificially low because many clinicians fail to consider the diagnosis on presentation, U.S. hospital laboratory technologists have very limited experience in detecting and identifying malaria parasites, and reporting of malaria to state health departments is sporadic in many states. In this study, a rapid malaria diagnostic test, the OptiMAL test (DiaMed; under license from Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.) was evaluated in six U.S. hospitals and compared with results of microscopy. The OptiMAL test is a 15-min rapid immunochromatographic test that both identifies and differentiates Plasmodium falciparum from non-P. falciparum malaria parasites on the basis of the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase in a drop of patient blood. A total of 216 specimens from patients suspected of having malaria were tested. Results indicated that 43 samples (20%) were positive for malaria parasites by microscopy (32 P. falciparum, 11 non-P. falciparum) while 42 (19%) were positive by OptiMAL (31 P. falciparum, 11 non-P. falciparum). The sensitivity of the OptiMAL test was 98%; its specificity was 100%, with positive and negative predictive values of 100 and 99%, respectively. Participating hospital physicians and laboratory directors independently reported that the OptiMAL rapid malaria test was accurate, easy to use, and well accepted by those working in their diagnostic laboratories. The overall conclusion was that integration of the OptiMAL rapid malaria test into the U.S. health care infrastructure would provide an important and easy-to-use tool for the timely diagnosis of malaria.Application of the ParaSight-F dipstick test for malaria diagnosis in a district control program.A rapid test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections based on the detection of histidine-rich-protein II, the ParaSight-F test, was evaluated after introduction in a district malaria control program in Uganda. Suspected treatment failures, pregnant women and infants with clinical malaria and general fever cases were tested at health facilities in malaria hypo-, meso- and holoendemic areas. A total of 1326 tests were carried out by health unit staff, cross read by experienced laboratory staff and results compared with thick film microscopy as the standard. Rater agreement in reading the dipstick result between health unit staff and laboratory staff was high, kappa index 0.94 (0.88-0.99). Sensitivity was 99.6% (99.0-100) for parasite densities above 500/microl, 98.6% (97.7-99.6) for densities above 50/microl and 22.2% (8.6-42.3) for densities below 10/microl. With the applied testing strategies no differences were found between endemicity levels or patient categories. Specificity was 86.2% (83.3-88.8) overall, but significantly higher in general fever cases (92.7%) compared to the other patient groups (84.3%, P=0.009). At the given prevalences positive predictive values (ppv) were above 80% and negative predictive values (npv) above 90% in all cases except in pregnant women (ppv: 77.8%). We conclude that in certain situations this test is an alternative to microscopy to improve diagnostic facilities for case management in malaria control programs in endemic African countries.Influence of rapid malaria diagnostic tests on treatment and health outcome in fever patients, Zanzibar: a crossover validation study.The use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for Plasmodium falciparum malaria is being suggested to improve diagnostic efficiency in peripheral health care settings in Africa. Such improved diagnostics are critical to minimize overuse and thereby delay development of resistance to artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACTs). Our objective was to study the influence of RDT-aided malaria diagnosis on drug prescriptions, health outcomes, and costs in primary health care settings.We conducted a cross-over validation clinical trial in four primary health care units in Zanzibar. Patients of all ages with reported fever in the previous 48 hours were eligible and allocated alternate weeks to RDT-aided malaria diagnosis or symptom-based clinical diagnosis (CD) alone. Follow-up was 14 days. ACT was to be prescribed to patients diagnosed with malaria in both groups. Statistical analyses with multilevel modelling were performed. A total of 1,887 patients were enrolled February through August 2005. RDT was associated with lower prescription rates of antimalarial treatment than CD alone, 361/1005 (36%) compared with 752/882 (85%) (odds ratio [OR] 0.04, 95% confidence interval [CI] 0.03-0.05, p<0.001). Prescriptions of antibiotics were higher after RDT than CD alone, i.e., 372/1005 (37%) and 235/882 (27%) (OR 1.8, 95%CI 1.5-2.2, p<0.001), respectively. Reattendance due to perceived unsuccessful clinical cure was lower after RDT 25/1005 (2.5%), than CD alone 43/882 (4.9%) (OR 0.5, 95% CI 0.3-0.9, p = 0.005). Total average cost per patient was similar: USD 2.47 and 2.37 after RDT and CD alone, respectively.RDTs resulted in improved adequate treatment and health outcomes without increased cost per patient. RDTs may represent a tool for improved management of patients with fever in peripheral health care settings.(Clinicaltrials.gov) NCT00549003.Evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v and the OptiMal rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in febrile returned travellers.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are less reliant on expert microscopy and have the potential to reduce errors in malaria diagnosis but have not been extensively evaluated in nonimmune persons or in countries where infection is not endemic. We evaluated the ICT P.f/P.v (ICT-Amrad, Sydney, Australia) and OptiMal (Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.) assays prospectively for the diagnosis of malaria in 158 specimens from 144 febrile returned travellers in Australia by using expert microscopy and PCR as reference standards. Malaria was diagnosed in 93 specimens from 87 patients by expert microscopy, with 3 additional specimens from recently treated patients testing positive for Plasmodium falciparum by PCR. For the diagnosis of asexual-stage P. falciparum malaria, the sensitivity and specificity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay were 97 and 90%, respectively, and those of the OptiMal assay were 85 and 96%, respectively. The ICT P.f/P.v assay missed one infection with a density of 45 parasites/ micro l, whereas the OptiMal assay missed infections up to 2,500/ micro l; below 1,000/ micro l, its sensitivity was only 43%. For the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria, the sensitivity and specificity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay were 44 and 100%, respectively, and those of the OptiMal assay were 80 and 97%, respectively. Both assays missed infections with parasite densities over 5,000/ micro l: up to 10,000/ micro l with the former and 5,300/ micro l with the latter. Despite the high sensitivity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay for P. falciparum malaria, caution is warranted before RDTs are widely adopted for the diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune patients or in countries where malaria is not endemic.Use of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in an emergency situation after the flood disaster in Mozambique.To determine how diagnosis of malaria may be improved by combining the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for Plasmodium falciparum malaria with clinical diagnosis by the presence or history of fever compared with clinical diagnosis alone in emergency situations with flood-affected displaced populations in Mozambique.A cross-sectional study conducted at the emergency outpatient clinic in a village in the Chòkwè district of Gaza Province, 3 weeks after Cyclone Eline hit Mozambique in February 2000.A hundred and thirty children aged less than 15 years with clinical malaria were selected for examination by RDT and fluorescent microscopy using acridine orange as a reference test. The diagnosis of clinical malaria was made by a history of fever in the last three days or axillary temperature above 37.0 degrees C at the time of attending the emergency outpatient clinic. Two positive predictive values were calculated; RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis and clinical diagnosis alone.Positive predictive values of RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis by the presence of fever or history of fever were 87.6% (92/105) (95% confidence interval (CI) 80.8-92.8) compared with 74.6% (97/130) (95% CI 66.2-81.8) for clinical diagnosis alone. Five patients were diagnosed false negative.RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis has sufficient positive predictive value to be used in emergency situations, while RDTs could result in increasing failure to treat when they are used for decisions of treatment compared with clinical diagnosis alone.[Malaria diagnosis: thickdrop and bloodsmear examination, and rapid test].Comparison of blood-film microscopy, the OptiMAL dipstick, Rhodamine-123 fluorescence staining and PCR, for monitoring antimalarial treatment.In an attempt to see if the OptiMAL dipstick (Flow Inc., Portland, OR) can be used to monitor antimalarial treatment, a pilot study of 17 patients with Plasmodium falciparum malaria, admitted to the Hospital for Tropical Diseases in London, U.K., was conducted. Sequential, follow-up, blood specimens were obtained from day 1 to day 3, 4 or 5 post-admission. Thin and thick films prepared from these samples were examined for the presence of malarial parasites, and the intensities of parasitaemia were estimated. In addition, each specimen was tested with the OptiMAL dipstick, Rhodamine-123 fluorescence staining and, on specimens collected on day 1 and the last follow-up before discharge, by a PCR-based test. The results showed that OptiMAL has good sensitivity for the initial diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria and also mirrors the decline in viability of the parasites on treatment, giving the potential to follow the efficacy of drug treatment. The results of the PCR-based tests were still positive when the blood film and OptiMAL result were negative. The OptiMAL dipstick compared well with blood-film microscopy for monitoring antimalarial treatment and could be a useful replacement for microscopy to monitor treatment in places where facilities for microscopy are either lacking or inadequate. In developed countries it could be a useful adjunct to blood-film microscopy, and it might permit a reduction in the duration of hospitalization and give an early warning of treatment failure.Rapid immunochromatographic malarial antigen detection unreliable for detecting Plasmodium malariae and Plasmodium ovale.In order to determine the reliability of two commercial tests for the rapid detection of plasmodial antigen in cases of infection with Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae, the products were evaluated in four centers and a search of the relevant literature was performed. The results of the present and previous studies were compared. With overall sensitivities ranging between 18.8% and 47.6% for Plasmodium malariae and between 20% and 31.3% for Plasmodium ovale, it is evident that neither test is reliable for the detection of Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae infections.[Comparative study of four malaria diagnostic techniques used in Ivory Coast].The biological diagnosis of malaria plays an important part in the patients' treatment for malaria. Thus, many techniques have been developed to reach this purpose. We have compared four of them concerning 196 patients from October, 1996 to January, 1997 in Abidjan. Thick blood film has been chosen as the technique for reference. It has come out that the plasmodic index was 18.3%. The Plasmodium falciparum has been the only encountered species. The different sensitivities of the QBC test and of the Parasight F test reached 100% against 83.3% in the case of the thin blood film. The QBC test and the thin blood film had each a specificity of 100% against 88.1% for the Parasight F test. Unlike the QBC test, the thick blood film and the thin blood film have remained the most difficult to be realised. Therefore, the analysis of parameters of credibility (sensitivity, specificity), predictable values and the time involved will allow in a given situation to use the appropriate biological diagnosis technique.[Rapid diagnostic test for malaria: preliminary study in Madagascar in 2003].This study was conducted in 2003 as part of the training of laboratory technicians in the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria and to evaluate these tests in Madagascar in field conditions for the first time. Two types of RDT were used separately. The dipstick (Optimal-I) that detects circulating pLDH was tested in 168 patients with clinically suspected malaria (fever or recent history of fever) at primary health centers. Microscopy confirmed malaria in 93/168 (55.4%) cases. Monoparasitic P. falciparum infection was identified in 86/93, P. malariae in 3/93, P. vivax in 3/93 and P. ovale in 1/93. A positive Optimal-I test was a highly sensitive indicator of P. falciparum infection with parasitemia exceeding 500 trophozoites/mul (sensitivity of 97.2%; with a specificity of 100%); it also confirmed 6/7 cases of non-P. falciparum malaria. A community malaria survey used the Malaria Hexagon dipstick (detecting P. falciparum-specific HRP2) for 273 patients: 17 (6.2%) RDT tests were positive, and 16 (5.9%) microscopic tests. Although this dipstick did not detect the only case of infection with P. vivax, its specificity was 100% for detection of P. falciparum infection. Installing microscopes and qualified microscopists in the health centers of the one hundred and eleven districts in Madagascar would be extremely difficult, but our results show that RDT is an effective alternative diagnostic tool for daily use as well as for sporadic malaria epidemics. The revised antimalarial treatment policy, involving a drug ten to twenty times more expensive than chloroquine, demonstrates the need to improve malaria diagnosis: presumptive treatment has become prohibitively expensive. RDT can be used to improve malaria case management at the primary heath centers in Madagascar. We discuss the choice of RDTs.[Rapid methods for the diagnosis of tropical malaria].A comparison of three malaria diagnostic tests, under field conditions in North-west Thailand.A hospital-based trial to compare the clinical diagnosis of malaria; microscopy, and a rapid diagnostic antigen capture detection dipstick (ParaSight-F) was conducted in North-west Thailand. 301 people who presented themselves at the hospital were selected. 204 (68%) were presumptively diagnosed as having malaria by the triage nurses; 64 (21.3%) were P. falciparum parasite positive, and 94 (32%) tested positive for P. falciparum with the ParaSight-F test strips. There was no association between hemoglobin levels (<10g/dl and > or = 10g/dl) and malaria, and although there was a good statistical association between temperature and malaria the specificity, sensitivity and positive predictive values were all low, indicating that temperature alone is a poor indicator of the disease. Based on the microscopy results, we found that a presumptive clinical diagnosis dramatically over-diagnosed malaria, and similarly there were a large number of false positives using the ParaSight-F test. We believe that many of the patients had received some form of malaria treatment prior to presentation at the hospital, and that the high number of false positives are explained by persistent antigenemia and the possibility of there being sequestered parasites following incomplete chemotherapy.Evaluation of an immunochromatography test for malaria diagnosis under different storage conditions.This study aimed to evaluate the second-generation OptiMal test for malaria diagnosis under various storage conditions. It detected all the positive samples, except for two Plasmodium malariae samples. Further research evaluating diverse environmental conditions are important for ICT test applicability in Brazilian malaria areas.[Diagnosis of falciparum malaria using ICT].Operational response to malaria epidemics: are rapid diagnostic tests cost-effective?To compare the cost-effectiveness of malaria treatment based on presumptive diagnosis with that of malaria treatment based on rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs).We calculated direct costs (based on experience from Ethiopia and southern Sudan) and effectiveness (in terms of reduced over-treatment) of a free, decentralised treatment programme using artesunate plus amodiaquine (AS + AQ) or artemether-lumefantrine (ART-LUM) in a Plasmodium falciparum epidemic. Our main cost-effectiveness measure was the incremental cost per false positive treatment averted by RDTs.As malaria prevalence increases, the difference in cost between presumptive and RDT-based treatment rises. The threshold prevalence above which the RDT-based strategy becomes more expensive is 21% in the AS + AQ scenario and 55% in the ART-LUM scenario, but these thresholds increase to 58 and 70%, respectively, if the financing body tolerates an incremental cost of 1 euro per false positive averted. However, even at a high (90%) prevalence of malaria consistent with an epidemic peak, an RDT-based strategy would only cost moderately more than the presumptive strategy: +29.9% in the AS + AQ scenario and +19.4% in the ART-LUM scenario. The treatment comparison is insensitive to the age and pregnancy distribution of febrile cases, but is strongly affected by variation in non-biomedical costs. If their unit price were halved, RDTs would be more cost-effective at a malaria prevalence up to 45% in case of AS + AQ treatment and at a prevalence up to 68% in case of ART-LUM treatment.In most epidemic prevalence scenarios, RDTs would considerably reduce over-treatment for only a moderate increase in costs over presumptive diagnosis. A substantial decrease in RDT unit price would greatly increase their cost-effectiveness, and should thus be advocated. A tolerated incremental cost of 1 euro is probably justified given overall public health and financial benefits. The RDTs should be considered for malaria epidemics if logistics and human resources allow.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test specific for Plasmodium vivax.Plasmodium vivax is the only human malaria indigenous to the Republic of Korea (ROK). A rapid and sensitive diagnostic test (RDT) that detects P. vivax is appropriate for evaluating suspected malaria patients with no travel history abroad. The RDTs, SD Malaria Antigen P.v (SD diagnostic, Kyonggi, ROK) specific for P. vivax and the well documented OptiMAL (DiaMed, Cressier, Switzerland) were compared among 282 volunteers for specificity and sensitivity of P. vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria infections against Giemsa-stained blood smears read by an experienced microscopist. A total of 137 volunteers were diagnosed with P. vivax, 45 cases (returned travellers from overseas) were diagnosed with P. falciparum and 100 healthy volunteers were diagnosed as negative for malaria. Correspondingly, the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test identified P. vivax infections in 128/137 malaria patients (93.4%) and 0/100 (0%) healthy volunteers. Three patients identified with P. falciparum also were interpreted as P. vivax by the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test; however, these patients were later confirmed as mixed infections of P. vivax and P. falciparum by polymerase chain reaction. OptiMAL interpreted the three mixed infections only as P. falciparum and detected 130/137 (94.9%) patients with P. vivax. The sensitivity of the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test decreased from 100% (>5000 parasite/microl) to 81.3% (1-100 parasites/microl) as parasitaemia levels declined. For the regions where P. vivax is the primary malaria parasite, the SD P. vivax-specific rapid diagnostic test may be useful for screening suspected malaria patients when sufficient material and human resources (e.g. trained microscopists) are unavailable for malaria diagnosis.Dispensary level pilot implementation of rapid diagnostic tests: an evaluation of RDT acceptance and usage by providers and patients--Tanzania, 2005.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may assist in diagnosis, improve prescribing practices and reduce potential drug resistance development. Without understanding operational issues or acceptance and usage by providers and patients, the costs of these tests may not be justified.To evaluate the impact of RDTs on prescribing behaviours, assess prescribers' and patients' perceptions, and identify operational issues during implementation.Baseline data were collected at six Tanzanian public dispensaries. RDTs were implemented for eight weeks and data collected on frequency of RDT use, results, malaria diagnoses and the prescription of antimalarials. Patients referred for RDTs completed a standardised exit interview. Qualitative methods assessed attitudes toward and satisfaction with RDTs, perceptions about the test and operational issues related to implementation.Of 595 patients at baseline, 200 (33%) were diagnosed clinically with malaria but had a negative RDT. Among the 2519 RDTs performed during implementation, 289 (11.5%) had a negative result and antimalarials prescribed. The proportion of "over-prescriptions" at baseline was 54.8% (198/365). At weeks four and eight this decreased to 16.1% (27/168) and 16.4% (42/256) respectively.A total of 355 patient or parent/caregiver and 21 prescriber individual interviews and 12 focus group discussions (FGDs) were conducted. Patients, caregivers and providers trusted RDT results, agreed that use of RDTs was feasible at dispensary level, and perceived that RDTs improved clinical diagnosis. Negative concerns included community suspicion and fear that RDTs were HIV tests, the need for additional supervision in interpreting the results, and increased work loads without added compensation.Overprescriptions decreased over the study period. There was a high degree of patient/caregiver and provider acceptance of and satisfaction with RDTs. Implementation should include community education, sufficient levels of training and supervision and consideration of the need for additional staff.The role of rapid diagnostic tests in managing malaria.Field studies on the sensitivity and specificity of an immunochromatographic test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in tribal areas of Orissa.A rapid immunodiagnostic test developed by an Australian Biotechnology company for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum in the peripheral blood has been evaluated in the field for its sensitivity, specificity and efficacy in comparison to microscopic examination. The results showed that the tests sensitivity, specificity and efficacy were 98.2, 96.9 and 97.5 per cent respectively. The positive and negative predictive values of the test were 96.4 and 98.4 per cent respectively. The test when compared to the conventional microscopy did not show any statistically significant difference suggesting that the two diagnostic methods are equally good. The test performed did not show cross-reactions with other parasite species. It is a simple and rapid field diagnostic method, which does not require any expensive laboratory equipment or skilled personnel.Evaluation of a new Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase assay (OptiMAL-IT) for the detection of malaria.The new OptiMAL-IT(R) rapid diagnostic test for malaria was evaluated in 271 patients in Thailand with uncomplicated malaria between June and July 2002. The sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum parasites were 88% and 92%, respectively. For species other than P. falciparum, the sensitivity was 65% and specificity was 99%. The performance of the new test decreased markedly at low levels of parasitaemia.Evaluation of two new immunochromatographic assays for diagnosis of malaria.We assessed the performance of two new commercially available rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria (SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf test and Ag Pf/Pan test) in 200 patients with uncomplicated malaria between August and October 2007 in Madagascar. Results of the two RDTs were compared with those obtained by microscopy and real-time polymerase chain reaction. The sensitivity and specificity for detection of Plasmodium falciparum were 93% and 98.9%, respectively, for the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf test and 92.9% and 98.9% for the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf/Pan test. The sensitivity of the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf/Pan test was much lower for detection of other species (63.6%). The sensitivity of the two new assays decreased to 77.3% at parasitemia levels < 100 parasites/microL for detection of P. falciparum.Inter-test comparison between filter paper absorbed blood eluate and serum for malaria serology by enzyme immunoassay: an operational feasibility.Antimalarial IgG and IgM were detected by enzyme immunoassay in finger-stick blood samples collected in capillary tubes and also spotted onto Whatman filter paper. Assay was performed in 92 blood samples obtained from 53 falciparum malaria patients, representing 23 fever cases (malaria negative) and 16 healthy individuals. A simple indirect ELISA was done using Plasmodium falciparum lysate and MSP1(19) peptide as antigens. Total IgG and IgM contents were also estimated in individual sera and filter paper eluate by single radial immunodiffusion (SRID). Assay results of both serum and filter paper eluates were compared. The sensitivity and specificity of the assays for IgG measurement were comparable between serum and filter paper eluates (P < 0.001), whereas, in case of IgM, detection level was poor in filter paper eluates as observed by ELISA and SRID. The filter paper eluates may serve the purpose of antigen-specific IgG detection in seroepidemiological surveys.Evaluation of the OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria.The development of rapid and specific diagnostic tests to identify individuals infected with malaria is of paramount importance in efforts to control the severe public health impact of this disease. This study evaluated the ability of a newly developed rapid malaria diagnostic test, OptiMAL (Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.), to detect Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria during an outbreak in Honduras. OptiMAL is a rapid (10-min) malaria detection test which utilizes a dipstick coated with monoclonal antibodies against the intracellular metabolic enzyme parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH). Differentiation of malaria parasites is based on antigenic differences between the pLDH isoforms. Since pLDH is produced only by live Plasmodium parasites, this test has the ability to differentiate live from dead organisms. Results from the OptiMAL test were compared to those obtained by reading 100 fields of traditional Giemsa-stained thick-smear blood films. Whole-blood samples were obtained from 202 patients suspected of having malaria. A total of 96 samples (48%) were positive by blood films, while 91 (45%) were positive by the OptiMAL test. The blood films indicated that 82% (79 of 96) of the patients were positive for P. vivax and 18% (17 of 96) were infected with P. falciparum. The OptiMAL test showed that 81% (74 of 91) were positive for P. vivax and 19% (17 of 91) were positive for P. falciparum. These results demonstrated that the OptiMAL test had sensitivities of 94 and 88% and specificities of 100 and 99%, respectively, when compared to traditional blood films for the detection of P. vivax and P. falciparum malaria. Blood samples not identified by OptiMAL as malaria positive normally contained parasites at concentrations of less than 100/microl of blood. Samples found to contain P. falciparum were further tested by two other commercially available rapid malaria diagnostic tests, ParaSight-F (Becton Dickinson, Cockeysville, Md.) and ICT Malaria P.f. (ICT Diagnostics, Sydney, Australia), both of which detect only P. falciparum. Only 11 of the 17 (65%) P. falciparum-positive blood samples were identified by the ICT and ParaSight-F tests. Thus, OptiMAL correctly identified P. falciparum malaria parasites in patient blood samples more often than did the other two commercially available diagnostic tests and showed an excellent correlation with traditional blood films in the identification of both P. vivax malaria and P. falciparum malaria. We conclude that the OptiMAL test is an effective tool for the rapid diagnosis of malaria.Usefulness of a rapid on-site Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis (Paracheck PF) in forest migrants and among the indigenous population at the site of their occupational activities in central India.Logistic, economic, and technical factors limit rapid access to microscopic confirmation of malaria in many tropical countries, including India. The occurrence of high-grade fever and three deaths during the hot summer months in some forest migrants created an emergency situation in Jabalpur in central India. A cheap and rapid malaria test, Paracheck Pf, was tested in this group of migrants in parallel with microscopy. The indigenous population at the site of occupational activities of these migrants approximately 250 km from Jabalpur was also screened by both methods. The results of this field investigation are very encouraging. Among migrants, the test had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 67%. The positive and negative predictive values were 94% and 100%, respectively. Among indigenous population, the corresponding values were 100%, 97.3%, 98.4%, and 100%, respectively, indicating the usefulness of test as a diagnostic tool for providing on-site confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Performance of the OptiMAL malaria antigen capture dipstick for malaria diagnosis and treatment monitoring at the Hospital for Tropical Diseases, London.We report here the sensitivity and specificity of OptiMAL for the diagnosis of acute malaria in patients presenting to the Hospital for Tropical Diseases (HTD), a tertiary referral centre for Tropical and Infectious diseases. A sensitivity of 95.3% and a specificity of 100% for Plasmodium falciparum and a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 100% for Plasmodium vivax was obtained. The ability to follow the course of the parasitaemia using OptiMAL during treatment and its significance for use in areas where expert microscopy is not available is discussed.Persistent ICT malaria P.f/P.v panmalarial and HRP2 antigen reactivity after treatment of Plasmodium falciparum malaria is associated with gametocytemia and results in false-positive diagnoses of Plasmodium vivax in convalescence.A problem with rapid Plasmodium falciparum-specific antigen histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) detection tests for malaria is the persistence of antigen in blood after the disappearance of asexual-stage parasitemia and clinical symptoms, resulting in false-positive (FP) test results following treatment. The ICT P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test detects both HRP2 and a panmalarial antigen (PMA) found in both P. falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. To examine posttreatment antigen persistence with this test and whether persistent sexual-stage forms (gametocytes) are a cause of FP tests after treatment, we compared serial antigen test results with microscopy results from patients symptomatic with P. falciparum malaria in Indonesia for 28 days following treatment with chloroquine (CQ; n = 66), sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP; n = 36), and artesunate plus sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (ART + SP; n = 15). Persistent FP antigenemia following SP treatment occurred in 29% (HRP2) and 42% (PMA) of the patients on day 7 and in 10% (HRP2) and 23% (PMA) on day 14. The high rates of persistent HRP2 and PMA antigenemia following CQ and SP treatment were strongly associated with the presence of gametocytemia, with the proportion with gametocytes on day 7 posttreatment being significantly greater in those with FP results than in those with true-negative PMA and HRP2 results. Gametocyte frequency on day 14 post-SP treatment was also greater in those with FP PMA results. Following SP treatment, PMA persisted longer than HRP2, giving an FP diagnosis of P. vivax in up to 16% of patients on day 14, with all FP P. vivax diagnoses having gametocytemia. In contrast, PMA was rapidly cleared following ART + SP treatment in association with rapid clearance of gametocytemia. Gametocytes appear to be an important cause of persistent posttreatment panmalarial antigenemia in areas of endemicity and may also contribute in part to persistent HRP2 antigenemia following treatment.Methods used in the diagnosis of malaria: where do we stand?In developing nations, limited resources lead to inadequate malaria diagnosis. In wealthy countries, poor familiarity with malaria may lead to clinical and laboratory misdiagnosis. Giemsa thick and thin blood films remain the current standard for diagnosis. Although it has good sensitivity and allows species identification and parasite counts, it is time consuming, requires microscopic expertise and maintenance of equipment. Microscopy with fluorescent stains (QBC), dipstick antigen detection of HRP2 and pLDH (Parasight-F, ICT Malaria Pf, OptiMAL), polymerase chain reaction assays and some automated blood cell analyzers offer new approaches and are reviewed here, with emphasis on clinical relevance and the potential to complement conventional microscopy.Diagnostic performance of rapid diagnostic tests versus blood smears for malaria in US clinical practice.Approximately 4 million US travelers to developing countries are ill enough to seek health care, with 1500 malaria cases reported in the United States annually. The diagnosis of malaria is frequently delayed because of the time required to prepare malaria blood films and lack of technical expertise. An easy, reliable rapid diagnostic test (RDT) with high sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV), particularly for Plasmodium falciparum, would be clinically useful. The objective of this study was to determine the diagnostic performance of a RDT approved by the US Food and Drug Administration compared with traditional thick and thin blood smears for malaria diagnosis.This prospective study tested 852 consecutive blood samples that underwent thick and thin smears and blinded malaria RDTs at 3 hospital laboratories during 2003-2006. Polymerase chain reaction verified positive test results and discordant results.Malaria was noted in 95 (11%) of the 852 samples. The RDT had superior performance than the standard Giemsa thick blood smear (p = .003). The RDT's sensitivity for all malaria was 97% (92 of 95 samples), compared with 85% (81 of 95) for the blood smear, and the RDT had a superior NPV of 99.6%, compared with 98.2% for the blood smear (p = .001). The P. falciparum performance was excellent, with 100% rapid test sensitivity, compared with only 88% (65 of 74) by blood smear (p = .003).This operational study demonstrates that the US Food and Drug Administration-approved RDT for malaria is superior to a single set of blood smears performed under routine US clinical laboratory conditions. The most valuable clinical role of the RDT is in the rapid diagnosis or the exclusion of P. falciparum malaria, which is particularly useful in outpatient settings when evaluating febrile travelers.Evidence behind the WHO guidelines: hospital care for children: what is the precision of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria?The evaluation of a dipstick test for Plasmodium falciparum in mining areas of Venezuela.A field trial comparing a dipstick test, an antigen-capture test detecting trophozoite-derived histidine-rich protein-II, and the quantitative buffer coat (QBC) (acridine orange staining technique) assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum was carried out on a population of 1,398 suspected malaria patients in gold mining areas of Venezuela. Sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive values were higher for the dipstick test than for the acridine orange staining compared with the thick blood smear. The sensitivity for the dipstick method was 86.7% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 82-90%), the specificity was 99.3% (95% CI = 98.5-99.7%), and the positive predictive value was 97.1% (95% CI = 94-98%) as compared with the thick blood smear. The sensitivity for acridine orange staining was 82.2% (95% CI = 77-86%), the specificity was 98.5% (95% CI = 97.6-99.1%), and the positive predictive value was 94.1% (95% CI = 90-97%); with a P. falciparum asexual parasitemia higher than 21 parasites/microliter, the dipstick was 100% sensitive, when parasitemia was 10-20/microliter, sensitivity was 88%, and when parasitemia was less than 10/microliter, it was only 13.4%. The dipstick assay meets the criteria for an appropriate, rapid, and reliable test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and has advantages over the acridine orange staining method. Nonetheless, its effectiveness seems limited in areas with low prevalence and among patients with low levels of parasitemia.Test characteristics of two rapid antigen detection tests (SD FK50 and SD FK60) for the diagnosis of malaria in returned travellers.Two malaria rapid diagnostic tests were evaluated in a travel clinic setting: the SD FK50 Malaria Ag Plasmodium falciparum test (a two-band test) and the SD FK60 Malaria Ag P. falciparum/Pan test (a three-band test).A panel of stored whole blood samples (n = 452 and n = 614 for FK50 and FK60, respectively) from returned travellers was used. The reference method was microscopy with PCR in case of discordant results.For both tests, overall sensitivity for the detection of P. falciparum was 93.5%, reaching 97.6% and 100% at parasite densities above 100 and 1,000/microl respectively. Overall sensitivities for Plasmodium vivax, Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae for the FK60 test were 87.5%, 76.3% and 45.2%, but they reached 92.6% and 90.5% for P. vivax and P. ovale at parasite densities above 500/microl. Specificities were above 95% for all species and both tests when corrected by PCR, with visible histidine-rich protein-2 lines for P. malariae (n = 3) and P. vivax and P. ovale (1 sample each). Line intensities were reproducible and correlated to parasite densities. The FK60 tests provided clues to estimate parasite densities for P. falciparum below or above 1,000/microl.Both the FK50 and FK60 performed well for the diagnosis of P. falciparum in the present setting, and the FK60 for the diagnosis of P. vivax and P. ovale at parasite densities > 500/microl. The potential use of the FK60 as a semi-quantitative estimation of parasite density needs to be further explored.Performance and usefulness of the Hexagon rapid diagnostic test in children with asymptomatic malaria living in the Mount Cameroon region.Rapid and correct diagnosis of malaria is considered an important strategy in the control of the disease. However, it remains to be determined how well these tests can perform in those who harbour the parasite, but are asymptomatic, so that rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) could be used in rapid mass surveillance in malaria control programmes.Microscopic and immunochromatographic diagnosis of malaria were performed on blood samples from the hyperendemic Mount Cameroon region. Thin and thick blood films were stained with Giemsa and examined under light microscopy for malaria parasites. The RDT was performed on the blood samples for the detection of Plasmodium species. In addition, the performance characteristics of the test were determined using microscopy as gold standard.Results revealed 40.32% to be positive for microscopy and 34.41% to be positive for the RDT. Parasites were detected in a greater proportion of samples as the parasite density increase. Plasmodium falciparum was the predominant Plasmodium species detected in the study population either by microscopy or by the RDT. Overall, the test recorded a sensitivity and specificity of 85.33% and 95.05% respectively, and an accuracy of 91.40%. The sensitivity and specificity of the RDT increased as parasite densities increased.The Hexagon Malaria Combi test showed a high sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing malaria in asymptomatic subjects and so could be suitable for use in mass surveillance programmes for the management and control of malaria.Devices for rapid diagnosis of Malaria: evaluation of prototype assays that detect Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 and a Plasmodium vivax-specific antigen.The ParaSight F test was developed as a pioneer industry effort in the large-scale, process-controlled production of a device for the rapid diagnosis of malaria. This device performed well in field settings but was limited to the detection of a single malaria species, Plasmodium falciparum. The ParaSight F+V assay advanced upon the ParaSight F test format by incorporating a monoclonal antibody directed against a proprietary Plasmodium vivax-specific antigen, in addition to the antibody directed against P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2, which was used in the ParaSight F assay. The modified assay was developed to add the capability to detect P. falciparum and P. vivax in a single-test-strip format. The present study evaluated three distinct ParaSight F+V prototypes with samples from symptomatic patients in regions of Thailand and Peru where malaria is endemic. Over a 2-year enrollment period (1998 and 1999), a total of 4,894 patients consented to participation in the study. Compared with the results for duplicate microscopic examinations of Giemsa-stained blood smears as the reference diagnostic standard, each successive prototype showed substantial improvement in performance. The final ParaSight F+V prototype, evaluated in 1999, had an overall sensitivity for detection of asexual P. falciparum parasites of 98%. The sensitivity of the device was 100% for P. falciparum densities of >500 parasites/ micro l, with a sensitivity of 83% for parasite densities of </=500/ micro l. The specificity for the exclusion of P. falciparum was 93%. For P. vivax, the overall sensitivity was 87% for the final 1999 prototype. The sensitivities calculated for different levels of P. vivax parasitemia were 99% for parasite densities of >5,000/ micro l, 92% for parasite densities of 1,001 to 5,000/ micro l, 94% for parasite densities of 501 to 1,000/ micro l, and 55% for parasite densities of 1 to 500/ micro l. The specificity for the exclusion of P. vivax was 87%. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves for the diagnostic performance of the assay for the detection of P. falciparum and P. vivax were 0.8907 and 0.8522, respectively. These findings indicate that assays for rapid diagnosis have the potential to enhance diagnostic capabilities in those instances in which skilled microscopy is not readily available.Performance characteristics of a rapid diagnostic test for malaria, when used to confirm cerebral malaria in children and young adults.Serial ParaSight-F test in patients with severe malaria.Evaluation & usefulness of a immunochromatographic test for rapid detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection.Rapid test (Parachek Pf) based on detection of HRP-2 protein specific to Plasmodium falciparum by immunochromatographic technique was evaluated. Prevalence of infection was 8.5%. The test was 100% sensitive & 99.5% specific on comparison with light microscopy. The test is useful for making 'on the spot' diagnosis.Immunocapture diagnostic assays for malaria using Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).We have developed two diagnostic assays based on the specific detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) activity. These assays exploit a panel of monoclonal antibodies that capture the parasite enzyme and allow for the quantitation and speciation of human malaria infections. An immunocapture pLDH activity assay (ICpLDH) allows for the rapid purification and measurement of pLDH from infected blood using the NAD analog APAD, which reacts specifically with Plasmodium LDH isoforms. An immunochromatographic test (the OptiMAL assay) was also formatted and allowed the detection of parasite infections of approximately 200 parasites/microl of blood. By using a combination of antibodies, both tests can not only detect but differentiate between P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum malaria. Both assays show a sensitivity comparable with other commercial nonmicroscopic tests; importantly, we found very few instances of false-positive samples, especially with samples from patients recently cleared of malaria infection. Furthermore, we find that when one uses the quantitative ICpLDH assay, the levels of pLDH activity closely mirror the levels of parasitemia in both initial diagnosis and while following patient therapy. We conclude that diagnostic tests based on the detection of pLDH are both sensitive and practical for the detection, speciation, and quantitation of all human Plasmodium infections and can also be used to indicate drug-resistant infections.A rapid immunochromatographic test (ICT) for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.A field study was conducted to assess the sensitivity and specificity of rapid immunodiagnostic test based on detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) in peripheral blood for diagnosis of P. falciparum infection. Evaluation in 173 patients showed that the assay was 98.59% sensitive and 97.1% specific. There was no cross-reactivity with P. vivax. The test was positive in few patients who were found to be negative by microscopy showing the presence of antigen after curative chemotherapy. The test is a valuable diagnostic tool for falciparum malaria, especially in emergency/field situations requiring rapid diagnosis.Usefulness of an inexpensive, Paracheck test in detecting asymptomatic infectious reservoir of plasmodium falciparum during dry season in an inaccessible terrain in central India.The performance of a new indigenous rapid diagnostic test, Paracheck Pf was evaluated in detection of Plasmodium falciparum in asymptomatic children in remote forest villages of Mandla district, central India to determine the lower limits of sensitivity and specificity of rapid test.A finger prick blood sample was collected to prepare blood smear and for testing with the Paracheck test. The blood smears were read by an experienced technician blinded to the Paracheck results. The figures for specificity, sensitivity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.The new diagnostic test had a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 89%. The positive and negative predictive values were 71% and 98%, respectively. The J -index was 0.83%.The rapid test was found to be very easy to perform and the result could be read reliably by field workers. The field evaluation with this new inexpensive test, ($0.65/test) indicates that it could be used as an epidemiological tool in the management of malaria particularly in areas where microscopy is not operationally feasible to attain the goal of the roll back malaria initiative.Evaluation of ParaHITf strip test for diagnosis of malarial infection.This study sought to determine whether dip stick strip test containing antibody for Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein-II (PfHRP-II) antigen could be used for identification of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in man. The results obtained were also compared with the results of standard microscopic examination. A total of 150 cases were included for the study. Fifty cases were non-febrile cases with no history of malaria acting as control group and the rest 100 cases were having fever and formed the test group. All the cases in the control group was found to be negative for both microscopic examination and strip test. In the test group, all samples that showed positive for P. falciparum by microscopy was also found to be positive for strip test. Whereas, all those samples that were positive for P. vivax in microscopic examination was found to be negative for strip test indicating species specificity of the strip test. In addition, two other cases that were negative for microscopic examination were found to be positive for the strip test. Statistical analysis was done to compare the validity of the results of strip test with that of the results of microscopic examination.Evaluation of Paracheck pf o and Parascreen pan/pf o tests for the diagnosis of malaria in an endemic area, South Ethiopia.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria is limited in peripheral health care services and mainly depends on non-specific clinical examination until the advent of Rapid Diagnostic Tests.Evaluation of the effectiveness of Paracheck pf and Parascreen pan/pf tests for the diagnosis of malaria.A Health Center based cross-sectional study was conducted in Kella and Bussa Health Centers, Wondo-Genet area, South Ethiopia where malaria is endemic. Microscopy of Giemsa stained thick blood film was used as gold standard.The sensitivity and specificity of Paracheck Pf test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum were 96.7% and 76%, respectively, with positive predictive value of 67.1% and negative predictive value of 97.9%. The sensitivity and specificity of the Parascreen Pan/pf test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum were 100% and 65.1%, respectively, while its positive and negative predictive values were 67.9 and 100% respectively. Its sensitivity and specificity for Plasmodium vivax were 100 and 42.3%, respectively, with a positive predictive value of 33.3% and a negative predictive value of 100%.Although further study is needed to evaluate their specificities, both tests were found to be effective for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria at peripheral health care unit where skilled personnel and laboratory facilities are not available for blood film examination.Effect of malaria rapid diagnostic tests on the management of uncomplicated malaria with artemether-lumefantrine in Kenya: a cluster randomized trial.Shortly after Kenya introduced artemether-lumefantrine (AL) for first-line treatment of uncomplicated malaria, we conducted a pre-post cluster randomized controlled trial to assess the effect of providing malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) on recommended treatment (patients with malaria prescribed AL) and overtreatment (patients without malaria prescribed AL) in outpatients >/= 5 years old. Sixty health facilities were randomized to receive either RDTs plus training, guidelines, and supervision (TGS) or TGS alone. Of 1,540 patients included in the analysis, 7% had uncomplicated malaria. The provision of RDTs coupled with TGS emphasizing AL use only after laboratory confirmation of malaria reduced recommended treatment by 63%-points (P = 0.04), because diagnostic test use did not change (-2%-points), but health workers significantly reduced presumptive treatment with AL for patients with a clinical diagnosis of malaria who did not undergo testing (-36%-points; P = 0.03). Health workers generally adhered to RDT results when prescribing AL: 88% of RDT-positive and 9% of RDT-negative patients were treated with AL, respectively. Overtreatment was low in both arms and was not significantly reduced by the provision of RDTs (-12%-points, P = 0.30). RDTs could potentially improve malaria case management, but we urgently need to develop more effective strategies for implementing guidelines before large scale implementation.Comparison of blood smear microscopy to a rapid diagnostic test for in-vitro testing for P. falciparum malaria in Kenyan school children.To compare the diagnostic performance of microscopy using Giemsa-stained thick and thin blood smears to a rapid malaria dipstick test (RDT) in detecting P. falciparum malaria in Kenyan school children.Randomised, controlled feeding intervention trial from 1998-2001.Rural Embu district, Kenya. The area is considered endemic for malaria, with four rainy seasons per year. Chloroquine resistance was estimated in 80% of patients. Children had a spleen rate of 45%.A sample of 515 rural Kenyan primary school children, aged 7-11 years, who were enrolled in a feeding intervention trial from 1998-2001.Percent positive and negative P. falciparum malaria status, sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of RDT.For both years, the RDT yielded positive results of 30% in children compared to microscopy (17%). With microscopy as the "gold standard", RDT yielded a sensitivity of 81.3% in 1998 and 79.3% in 2000. Specificity was 81.6% in 1998 and 78.3% in 2000. Positive predictive value was 47.3% in 1998 and 42.6% in 2000, and negative predictive value was 95.6% in 1998 and 94.9% in 2000.Rapid diagnostic testing is a valuable tool for diagnosis and can shorten the interval for starting treatment, particularly where microscopy may not be feasible due to resource and distance limitations.Evaluation of the OptiMAL test for diagnosis of malaria in Venezuela.We evaluated the OptiMAL rapid dipstick test by comparing it with the conventional standard thick-blood film method, for the detection of malaria in two groups of individuals from different Venezuelan endemic areas. One of the groups consisted of individuals with malaria-like symptoms (n = 113) and the other of asymptomatic individuals (n = 89). The classical microscopy analysis of these populations determined that 67.5% were infected with P. vivax, 31.3% with P. falciparum, and 1.2% with mixed infections. The OptiMAL test showed 96.4% sensitivity, 100% specificity, 100% positive predictive value, 97.5% negative predictive value and optimal concordance (kappa = 0.97), capable of detecting any malaria infection in the evaluated population. However, these parameters were lower when the parasitaemia was < or = 300 parasites/microL. Freezing of the samples did not affect the sensitivity and specificity of the test. We concluded that this rapid malaria test is sensitive and specific for rapid diagnosis of malaria in the field and it is a complement to conventional microscopy.Plasmodium falciparum parasite infection prevalence from a household survey in Zambia using microscopy and a rapid diagnostic test: implications for monitoring and evaluation.This paper presents estimates of P. falciparum infection prevalence in children under 5 years old in the context of a population-based household survey in Luangwa District (Lusaka Province), Zambia, an area where greater than 75% of households possess at least one insecticide-treated mosquito net (ITN). The sensitivity and specificity of an HRP-2 rapid diagnostic test (RDT) (ICT Malaria Pf((R))) compared to microscopy, as well as factors associated with discordant diagnostic results are also presented. P. falciparum infection prevalence was estimated at 7.0% (95% CI 4.9-9.0%) using microscopy. Using microscopy as the gold standard, the sensitivity of the HRP-2 RDT was 100% and specificity was 91.5%; positive predictive value was estimated to be 46.7% (95% CI 36.3-57.4%). RDT discordance, or HRP-2 false positivity, was highest among older children, those in the northern part of Luangwa District, and those with a reported history of antimalarial treatment. These data suggest microscopy should remain the gold standard for estimating malaria parasite point prevalence from household surveys for monitoring and evaluation purposes.[Diagnosis of malaria with immunochromatographic test The Novara experience].Microscopic detection of parasites has been the reference standard for malaria diagnosis for decades. Recently rapid antigen assays provide an effective tool for the detection of malaria in symptomatic patients. In Novara Maggiore della Carità Hospital we evaluated the efficacy of the ParaSight F test in patients with malaria.[Establishment and evaluation of colloid gold labeled immunochromatographic strip test for rapid diagnosis of malaria].To establish and evaluate a gold immunochromatographic strip test for detection and differentiation of Plasmodium vivax and P. falciparum.The monoclonal antibodies, F4H12, G4C9 and D8F7, were conjugated with colloid gold as detecting reagent; monoclonal antibody B2G10 (against P. vivax/ P. falciparum) and D6A7 (only against P. falciparum) were immobilized on nitrocellulose in proper position. Blood samples from 107 febrile patients from endemic area of malaria and 17 patients with visceral leishmaniasis were used for evaluating the specificity. Blood samples of malaria patients (110 with P. vivax and 54 with P. falciparum) were used for evaluating the sensitivity.5 samples out of 107 febrile patients and 17 patients with visceral leishmaniasis showed false positive reaction with a specificity of 96.0% (119/124), all the 17 samples from patients with visceral leishmaniasis were negative. 164 blood samples of malaria patients showed a sensitivity of 92.3% (153/164), 92.7% (102/110)and 94.4% (51/ 54) for patients infected with P. vivax or P. falciparum, respectively.The immunochromatographic strip test based on antigen-capturing is a sensitive, specific, simple and rapid assay for malaria diagnosis.Use of rapid diagnostic tests for diagnosis of malaria in the UK.Malaria is currently diagnosed almost exclusively by microscopy in clinical laboratories. The introduction of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may be useful in achieving rapid detection of malaria parasites, especially in situations where malaria is not often seen or where staff are inexperienced.To explore the use of RDT in UK laboratories.The current use of RDTs was surveyed in UK laboratories subscribing to the United Kingdom National External Quality Assessment Scheme blood parasitology and haematology schemes.An overall survey response rate of 60.3% was seen. RDTs were found to be the preferred choice, either alone or in conjunction with microscopy in 31.2% of the samples examined during normal working hours and in 44.3% of the specimens examined on call.During on-call hours, the use of RDTs was observed to increase and RDTs changed the diagnosis in 12% of laboratories. No established protocol for RDT use was, however, observed in the UK. A protocol that needs to be validated in the laboratory setting is suggested.Non-microscopic method for malaria diagnosis using OptiMAL IT, a second-generation dipstick for malaria pLDH antigen detection.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria are now a commonly used procedure for malaria diagnosis. New or improved devices need to be evaluated against a recognised gold-standard procedure and subjected to conditions of temperature and humidity that may affect their performance. The OptiMAL 48 RDT has now been available commercially for several years and a second-generation OptiMAL IT test is now coming onto the market. In this study the problems associated with the routine use of OptiMAL 48 is investigated and its performance compared with a second-generation individual test, OptiMAL IT. Sensitivity and specificity for detection of all malaria species for both tests were comparable but loss of sensitivity of the test strips due to humidity or temperature found with the routine use of OptiMAL 48 was not seen with the individual OptiMAL IT. False-positive results for Plasmodium falciparum, seen in two negative blood samples, were attributed to the presence of high levels of heterophile antibodies.The usefulness of a new rapid diagnostic test, the First Response Malaria Combo (pLDH/HRP2) card test, for malaria diagnosis in the forested belt of central India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in tribal belt of central India where two Plasmodium species, Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax, are prevalent. In these areas, rapid detection of the malaria parasites and early treatment of infection remain the most important goals of disease management. Therefore, the usefulness of a new rapid diagnostic (RDT), the First Response(R) Combo Malaria Ag (pLDH/HRP2) card test was assessed for differential diagnosis between P. falciparum with other Plasmodium species in remote villages of Jabalpur district.A finger prick blood sample was collected to prepare blood smear and for testing with the RDT after taking informed consent. The figures for sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.Analysis revealed that overall, the RDT was 93% sensitive, 85% specific with a positive predictive value (PPV) of 79%, and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 95%. The accuracy 88% and J-index was 0.74. For P. falciparum, the sensitivity and specificity of the test were 96% and 95% respectively, with a PPV of 85% and a NPV of 99%. The RDT accuracy 95% and J-index was 0.84. For non-falciparum malaria, the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 83%, 94% and 92% respectively with a PPV of 69% and a NPV of 97%.The RDTs are easy to use, reliable and simple to interpret. RDTs are more suited to health workers in situations where health services are deficient or absent. Therefore, the test can be used as an epidemiological tool for the rapid screening of malaria.[Comparison of two techniques for detection of anti-Plasmodium falciparum antibodies: Falciparum-spot IF (Biomérieux) and Malaria IgG Celisa (BMD). Preliminary results].We compared a new Elisa assay to detect malaria antibodies: Malaria IgG Celisa (BMD) with the IFAT technique Falciparum-spot IF (Biomérieux): sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were 81%, 99%, 95%, 95%, respectively. Eight patients had positive thick blood smear out of 23 performed. For these eight confirmed acute malaria cases, the Elisa assay was negative in five instances. For two recent malaria attacks both Elisa and IFI were negative. With blood donors, two sera were IFAT positive and Elisa negative; 16 were IFAT doubtful and Elisa negative. Doubtful results rose up to 13.5% by IFAT against 1.5% by Elisa assay. We preferred kappa coefficient instead of chi 2 test for data analysis, which measures the concordance degree between the two techniques. Here concordance is moderate. Choosing an Elisa assay to detect the transmission of malaria for at-risk blood donors collides with the method sensitivity compared with IFAT as reference.Rapid malaria diagnostic tests vs. clinical management of malaria in rural Burkina Faso: safety and effect on clinical decisions. A randomized trial.To assess if the clinical outcome of patients treated after performing a Rapid Diagnostic Test for malaria (RDT) is at least equivalent to that of controls (treated presumptively without test) and to determine the impact of the introduction of a malaria RDT on clinical decisions.Randomized, multi-centre, open clinical trial in two arms in 2006 at the end of the dry and of the rainy season in 10 peripheral health centres in Burkina Faso: one arm with use of RDT before treatment decision, one arm managed clinically. Primary endpoint: persistence of fever at day 4. Secondary endpoints: frequency of malaria treatment and of antibiotic treatment.A total of 852 febrile patients were recruited in the dry season and 1317 febrile patients in the rainy season, and randomized either to be submitted to RDT (P_RTD) or to be managed presumptively (P_CLIN). In both seasons, no significant difference was found between the two randomized groups in the frequency of antimalarial treatment, nor of antibiotic prescription. In the dry season, 80.8% and 79.8% of patients with a negative RDT were nevertheless diagnosed and treated for malaria, and so were 85.0% and 82.6% negative patients in the rainy season. In the rainy season only, both diagnosis and treatment of other conditions were significantly less frequent in RDT positive vs. negative patients (48.3% vs. 61.4% and 46.2% vs. 59.9%, P = 0.00 and 0.00, respectively).Our study was inconclusive on RDT safety (clinical outcome in the two randomized groups), because of an exceedingly and unexpectedly low compliance with the negative test result. Further research is needed on best strategies to promote adherence and on the safety of a test based strategy compared with the current, presumptive treatment strategy.Performance of OptiMAL(R) in the diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum infections in a malaria referral center in Colombia.Alternative, non-microscopic methods for the diagnosis of malaria have recently become available. Among these, rapid dipstick methods stand out. One such test, OptiMAL(R), is based on the immunochromatographic detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) and has the capacity to detect and distinguish infections caused by P. falciparum and Plasmodium sp. This capacity is particularly important in countries where different species of Plasmodium co-exist. In this study we evaluated the performance of OptiMAL(R) in an urban referral center for malaria diagnosis. Two sets of patients were included: one (n = 112) having predetermined infections with P. falciparum or P. vivax and individuals with negative blood smears; and another consisting of all eligible consecutive patients (n = 80) consulting for diagnosis at the referral center during one month. The overall diagnostic efficiency of OptiMAL(R) for both sets of patients was 96.9%. Efficiency was higher for P. vivax (98.1%) than for P. falciparum (94.9%). These results corroborate the diagnostic utility of OptiMAL(R) in settings where P. vivax and P. falciparum co-exist and support its implementation where microscopic diagnosis is unavailable and in circumstances that exceed the capacity of the local microscopic diagnosis facility.Malaria overdiagnosis and burden of malaria misdiagnosis in the suburbs of central Sudan: special emphasis on artemisinin-based combination therapy era.Accuracy of diagnosis is central for malaria control. Although microscopy is gold standard in malaria diagnosis, its reliability is largely dependent on user skill. In this study, we evaluated practitioners' clinical and microscopists' technical skills in diagnosis of malaria in central Sudan. In a retrospective study, 3203 blood smears from 95 peripheral health facilities (each represented by a general practitioner [GP] and general microscopist [GM]) were reexamined by expert microscopist. Furthermore, in a prospective study, 410 patients had their malaria diagnosis rechecked by rapid diagnostic test for validation of the microscopic diagnosis. Results showed that the rate of false-positive diagnosis of malaria was 75.6% and false-negative diagnosis was 0.01%. The study disclosed poor skills of the GPs and GMs in malaria diagnosis because 43% of the GPs and 44% of the GMs failed to make a single true-positive malaria diagnosis. The false-positive malaria diagnosis showed bias toward adult females. Economically, the calculated cost of diagnosis and treatment of malaria in Sudan in year 2000 is US$100 million, whereas the calculated cost of true malaria is approximately US$14 million. In conclusion, malaria overdiagnosis was widely recognized in central Sudan, with high economic burden during the era of artemisinin-based combination therapy. Finally, different scenarios were suggested for improvement of malaria diagnosis.The diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection using a new antigen detection system.With the widespread emergence of drug-resistant Plasmodium falciparum infection, febrile patients in the tropics can no longer be empirically treated with inexpensive yet effective antimalarials. The substitution of newer and more costly drugs brings with it the need for rapid, accurate, and inexpensive diagnostic procedures so that directed therapy can be used. We report a field trial comparing standard microscopic malaria diagnosis and quantitative buffy coat analysis to a new P. falciparum antigen detection system. The ParaSight F test (PFT) was found to be easy to learn, rapid to perform, and highly accurate. If confirmed, the use of the PFT in endemic areas may aid in the identification of patients requiring therapy for drug-resistant malaria.Feasibility of a rapid dipstick antigen-capture assay for self-testing of travellers' malaria.This open comparative study sought to determine whether, and with what level of instruction, travellers can successfully use and interpret the rapid whole blood malaria diagnostic test, ParaSight F. 160 visitors to the Zürich University Travel Clinic took part in the study. One group received written instructions only, while another group was given combined oral and written instructions on how to test their own blood for malaria infection and interpret a series of 5 prepared test strips. Each volunteer also completed a questionnaire targeted at assessing performance in using the diagnostic, interpretation of the results and acceptability of the concept of self-testing for malaria infection. The main outcome measures were successful performance of the test, correct interpretation of prepared test strips and acceptability of the test. In the group which received only written instructions, 60/80 (75%) were successful, whilst in the group which received written and oral instructions, 72/80 (90%) successfully performed the test (P < 0.02). Overall, 565 (70.6%) test strips were correctly and 165 (20.6%) incorrectly interpreted with 113 (14.1%) false negative interpretations. No prepared test strip was interpreted as false positive. Seventy (8.8%) test strips were not interpreted. Some 91. 9% of all candidates would use such a test if it were available. While it is possible for lay persons to successfully perform the test, interpretation of results poses a problem. In particular, the proportion of false negative interpretations is unacceptable. A combination of written and oral instructions leads to a significantly higher level of successful test performance. If such a test is to be made available to the general public, written instructions must be made concise and foolproof and the test endpoint clearly defined, as the currently available test is more suitable for trained laboratory personnel. In the meantime other candidate diagnostics have become available and these should now be assessed for their suitability in the context of travellers' malaria.ParaSight-F test for the detection of treatment failure in multidrug resistant Plasmodium falciparum malaria.The ParaSight-F test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum was evaluated for its accuracy and usefulness in predicting treatment outcome in 75 patients (70 males, 5 females) with acute uncomplicated malaria who attended a malaria clinic in Mae Sot, Tak province, on the Thai-Myanmar border. All patients were admitted to the clinic for 28 d to exclude reinfection. The test was performed using blood samples collected into ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid from the patients on admission, and on days 1, 2, 7, and 14. The presence of microscopically detectable parasitaemia was used as the reference for sensitivity and specificity of the test. The reappearance of parasites on day 28 was used to determine the accuracy of predicting the outcome of artemether treatment on day 14. The sensitivity of the ParaSight-F test on admission, and on days 1, 2, 7, and 14, was 98.7%, 96.7%, 100%, 100% and 100%, respectively, with corresponding specificities of 50%, 24.2%, 47.1% and 72.9%. The sensitivity for predicting recrudescence by using the test on day 14 was 100%, with 97.7% specificity, and the sensitivity of predicting a sensitive response on day 14 was 97.7%, with 100% specificity. The test seems to permit more precise detection of treatment failure under 'field' conditions if used on day 14 after the start of treatment.[Efficacy of a rapid test to diagnose Plasmodium vivax in symptomatic patients of Chiapas, Mexico].To evaluate, under laboratory conditions, the sensitivity and specificity of a rapid diagnostic test (OptiMAL), based on immunoreactive strips, to detect Plasmodium vivax infection in febrile patients in Southern Chiapas, Mexico.The presence of parasites in blood samples of 893 patients was investigated by Giemsa-stained thick blood smear microscopic examination (gold standard). A blood drop from the same sample was smeared on immunoreactive strips to investigate the presence of the parasite pLDH. Discordant results were resolved by PCR amplification of the parasite's 18S SSU rRNA, to discard infection.OptiMAL had an overall sensitivity of 93.3% and its specificity was 99.5%. Its positive and negative predictive values were 96.5% and 98.9%, respectively. Signal intensity in OptiMAL strips correlated well with the parasitemia density in the blood samples (r = 0.601, p = 0.0001).This rapid test had acceptable sensitivity and specificity to detect P. vivax under laboratory conditions and could be useful for malaria diagnosis in field operations in Mexico.Comparison of the Paracheck-Pf test with microscopy, for the confirmation of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Tanzania.Paracheck-Pf is a rapid, qualitative immuno-assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein-2 in samples of human blood. The assay has now been evaluated, against the usual 'gold standard', microscopy, using blood samples from 1655 individuals in five districts of Tanzania, four of which experience frequent malaria outbreaks. The aim was to verify whether Paracheck-Pf could be a reliable tool for the confirmation of malaria outbreaks in such areas. The overall measurements of the assay's performance were good, with a sensitivity of 90.0%, a specificity of 96.6%, a positive predictive value of 88.9%, and a negative predictive value of 97.0% (with an estimated malaria prevalence of 23.3%). There was, however, marked variation between the study districts, the assay's performance being relatively poor where the test had been stored for 12 months at room temperature (23.5+/-3.5 degrees C). The assay was easy to perform in the field and could clearly be a valuable tool in remote areas and in emergency situations, such as the early detection of malaria outbreaks. The cost of the assay (U.S.$0.62/test at the time of the present study) is sufficiently low that its routine use in the confirmation of P. falciparum malaria might also be cost-effective, particularly in areas where there are no facilities for microscopy and/or where the first-line treatment of malaria is based on relatively expensive artemisinin-based combinations.Evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests: malaria.A comparison of thick smears, QBC malaria, PCR and PATH falciparum malaria test trip in Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis.Blood samples from 182 patients presenting at the out-patient clinic in Richard-Toll. Senegal were analysed by Thick smear microscopy, the QBC, PCR and the new dipstick PATH Malaria assay which detects the histidine rich protein II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. Thick smear microscopy was used as the reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were 100%, 83.6%, 93.4% and 100% QBC respectively; 100%, 72.7%, 89.4% and 100% for PCR; 96%, 92.7%, 96.8% and 91% for the PATH assay. PATH assay failed to detect one positive sample with Plasmodium malariae. Assays were also compared with regard to the expense of equipment and reagents and speed and ease of use. The rapid PATH assay can be performed with minimal training and may be specially useful in areas where P. falciparum is the predominant malaria species, in epidemic malaria regions, and where skilled microscopy is not readily available.[Value of rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum using indirect monoclonal immunofluorescence].Development and use of murine specific monoclonal antibodies associated with an indirect immunofluorescent assay allows a rapid detection of P. falciparum antigens. This work compares the results obtained by interpretation of Giemsa staining technique on blood smears, to the use of a commercial reagent (Monofluo Kit P. falciparum). This monoclonal indirect immunofluorescent assay (I.F.I.M.) provides the clinician with a precious aid to diagnosis as well by its specificity and sensitivity, better than conventional staining techniques; particularly in pauciparasitaemia induced by prime-infestation or partial anti-malarial drug resistance.Paracheck-Pf: a new, inexpensive and reliable rapid test for P. falciparum malaria.We compared the performance of Paracheck-Pf, a new and cheap rapid malaria test, with ICT-Pf/PvR and microscopy in two malaria surveys in Thai villages on the Thai-Burmese border. The specificity, sensitivity, predictive positive and negative values of the Paracheck-PfR and ICT-PfR tests were calculated taking microscopy results as the gold standard. The 294 ICT-Pf/Pv tests resulted in two invalid (no control line) and 11 doubtful results. Both the ICT-Pf/PvR and Paracheck-PfR tests reliably detected P. falciparum infections. However, Paracheck-PfR failed to detect three P. falciparum cases and likewise, ICT-Pf/PvR failed to detect the same three cases and an additional four cases. These seven cases were detected by microscopy and had a parasitaemia under 150 parasites/microl. At a cost of c. US $1.00, the Paracheck-PfR test, based on the detection of the P. falciparum specific HRP-2 protein, is a reliable, easy to use and affordable tool for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria.Evaluation of a rapid antigen capture assay for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria.A study was carried out to evaluate the accuracy of a dipstick antigen capture assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen (Pf HRP-II) in peripheral blood to diagnose P. falciparum malaria. The sensitivity and specificity of the test was found to be 97 and 100 per cent respectively. The persistence of the antigen varied from 5 to 15 days after initiation of antimalarial therapy. The assay was simple to perform, rapid and easy to interpret. However, infection due to other species of human malaria parasites cannot be detected by this dipstick assay. Use of more sensitive technique like polymerase chain reaction (PCR) would help in diagnosing cases with low parasitaemia and infection due to other plasmodial species.Evaluation of the SD FK70 malaria Ag Plasmodium vivax rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.For clinical and epidemiological reasons, it is interesting to diagnose non-falciparum malaria to the species level. This retrospective study assessed the performance of the SD BIOLINE Malaria Antigen Pv test (FK70), a two-band immunochromatographic test detecting Plasmodium vivax-specific lactate dehydrogenase, on samples of international travellers in a non-endemic setting.Stored blood samples from international travellers suspected of malaria were used, with microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Samples infected by Plasmodium vivax (n = 100), Plasmodium falciparum (n = 75), Plasmodium ovale (n = 75) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 25) were included, as well as 100 malaria-negative samples. End points were sensitivity, specificity, inter-reader reliability and reproducibility.The overall sensitivity of the FK70 for the diagnosis of P. vivax was 88.0% (95% confidence interval (CI): 83.6% - 90.3%). For parasite densities > 500/microl, a sensitivity of 97.2% (CI: 92.6% - 99.1%) was obtained. Specificity was 98.5%, with 4 out of 75 P. falciparum samples testing positive. None of the P. ovale samples tested positive. Nearly two-thirds (57/88, 64.7%) of positive P. vivax samples showed faint or weak line intensities, with stronger line intensities at higher parasite densities. The test showed excellent reproducibility and reliability for test results and line intensities (kappa values exceeding 0.98 and 0.87 respectively).The FK70 test performed well in diagnosing P. vivax infections in a non-endemic reference setting. It can be of added value to microscopy in species differentiation of malaria infections, especially at parasite densities > 500/microl.The sensitivity of the OptiMAL rapid diagnostic test to the presence of Plasmodium falciparum gametocytes compromises its ability to monitor treatment outcomes in an area of Papua New Guinea in which malaria is endemic.Using in vivo samples from treatment failure malaria cases, we demonstrate the high sensitivity of the parasite lactase dehydrogenase (pLDH)-based OptiMAL rapid diagnostic test in the detection of P. falciparum gametocytes. This high sensitivity limits the use of pLDH-based tests in the monitoring of treatment outcomes in circumstances where gametocytemia is common.Malaria diagnosis: false negative parasight-F tests in falciparum malaria patients in Nigeria.This study was designed to assess the relative reliability of microscopy, the dipstick technique based on the detection of Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine rich protein II (HRPII) (Parasight-F) and PCR assays in diagnosing falciparum malaria infections in Nigerian children. The prevalence of P. falciparum infections in enrolled patients was 100% by microscopy. Parasite density ranged from 329 to 81,194 parasites/microL of blood, with a geometric mean parasite density of 5168 parasites/microL of blood. The sensitivity of the HRPII based dipstick, PCR and microscopy were 80%, 92% and 100% respectively. A false negative rate of 20% was observed with Parasight-F as compared with microscopy. The parasitemia in patients with false negative Parasight-F tests ranged from 319 to 54,680 parasites/microL of blood. Detailed PCR analysis of Isolates obtained from five out of the eight patients who exhibited a negative Parasight-F test, showed that the average numbers of P. falciparum clones in these five isolates were: 1.7 +/- 1.02 with MSPI, 3.2 +/- 1.3 with MSP2 and 1.4 +/- 1.72 with GLURP. Comparison of microscopy and HRPII results showed a significant (p=0.009) difference as opposed to microscopy and PCR (p=0.239). This study showed that caution should be exercised when excluding P. falciparum infections on the basis of HRPII based dipstick results alone. Microscopy or PCR diagnosis where possible, should be carried out in order to confirm negative P. falciparum HRPII-based dipstick tests.Diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria using ParaSight F, ICT malaria PF and malaria IgG CELISA assays.A battery of sixty-six blood samples from Senegal was analysed by the ParaSight F test, the ICT Malaria PF and the Malaria IgG CELISA. These three assays detect the histidine rich protein 2 antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. Thick smear microscopy was used as the reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were respectively 89%, 100%, 100%, 88% for the ICT; 86%, 93%, 94%, 85% for the paraSight and 88%, 87%, 88%, 87% for the Malaria IgG CELISA. The three assays failed to detect two positive samples with P. ovale and P. malariae. Assays were also compared with regard to the expense of equipment and reagents and speed and ease of use. The rapid ICT and ParaSight F test can be performed with minimal training and may be specially useful in areas where P. falciparum is the predominant malaria species, in epidemic malaria regions, and where skilled microscopy is not readily available.Performance of the OptiMAL assay for detection and identification of malaria infections in asymptomatic residents of Irian Jaya, Indonesia.The OptiMAL assay, a new immunochromatographic "dipstick" test for malaria based on detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), is purported to detect infections of approximately 200 parasites/microL of blood and to differentiate between Plasmodium falciparum and non-P. falciparum. We evaluated OptiMAL performance by comparing the test strip interpretations of two independent readers with consensus results obtained independently by expert malaria microscopists. Unbiased measures of sensitivity were derived by applying the OptiMAL test for detection and differentiation of light, asymptomatic infections by P. falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. OptiMAL readings were separated in time to determine whether the reaction signal was stable. Microscopy identified infections in 225 of 505 individuals screened; those with P. falciparum (n = 170) averaged 354 asexual forms/microL and P. vivax/Plasmodium malariae (n = 112) averaged 216 asexual forms/microL of blood. Concordance between OptiMAL and microscopy was 81% and 78% by the two independent readings. The assay's sensitivity for detection of any malaria species was 60.4% and 70.2% respectively and specificity was 97% and 89%. Most cases identified by microscopy as P. falciparum were graded as negative or non-falciparum by both OptiMAL readers. OptiMAL false negatives as well as misidentifications were related to low parasitemias (< 500/microL). The OptiMAL assay demonstrated 88-92% sensitivity for detecting infections of 500-1,000 parasites/microL, a range covering the mean parasitemia of primary symptomatic P. falciparum infections in malaria-naïve Indonesian transmigrants. This device was markedly less sensitive than expert microscopy for discriminating between malaria species and is presently unsuited for use as an epidemiological screening tool. The OptiMAL assay is not approved for diagnostic use but is commercially available for research purposes only.Rapid malaria tests: where do we go after 20 years?Great advances have been made in developing rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for diagnosing malaria. To date, RDTs present an exceedingly practical format for malaria diagnosis that outperforms traditional microscopy and more experimental next generation devices in the development pipeline. However, although use of such tests is accepted in principle, their actual use has lagged. Furthermore, study of how these tests perform, what their limitations are, and how to work with these limitations to still use them effectively has stagnated. We propose that the study and implementation of such RDTs should be aggressively advanced and propose a series of questions that can guide efforts.Comparison of the OptiMAL rapid test and microscopy for detection of malaria in pregnant women in Nigeria.Malaria during pregnancy causes anaemia in pregnant women and low birthweight in infants. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the OptiMAL rapid malaria test in comparison with standard microscopy for malaria diagnosis in 268 pregnant women attending antenatal clinics at the Jos University Teaching Hospital and the Federal Medical Centre-Gombe in Nigeria. Positive results by either method were confirmed using a polymerase chain reaction assay for malaria. Although the OptiMAL assay did not detect malaria in the blood of pregnant women with low levels of parasitaemia, it may be useful for the detection of placental malaria which predisposes to low birthweight infants.Field evaluation of the OptiMAL rapid malaria diagnostic test during anti-malarial therapy in Guyana.An assessment of the accuracy of clinical diagnosis, local microscopy and a rapid immunochromatographic card test in comparison with expert microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria in rural Kenya.Short report: Field evaluation of posttreatment sensitivity for monitoring parasite clearance of Plasmodium falciparum malaria by use of the Determine Malaria pf test in central India.The posttreatment performance of the Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein rapid diagnostic test Determine Malaria pf (Abbott Laboratories, Tokyo, Japan) was assessed in 70 patients in central India with uncomplicated falciparum malaria who were treated with chloroquine, sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine, and arteether. Data were compared with those of microscopy. Results revealed that the sensitivity for predicting recrudescence by means of the Determine test after treatment with chloroquine on Day 14 was 75%, with 50% specificity. However, antigenemia was detected in 16% of patients as late as Day 21 in sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine-treated subjects with a drug-sensitive response. Clearance of parasitemia in thick blood smear and clearance of antigenemia appeared to parallel each other only in arteether-treated subjects. The observed diagnostic trends therefore mean that the potential of the Determine test to detect recrudescent infection is limited.Rapid diagnostic testing for malaria.Malaria rapid diagnostic devices (MRDD) have been developed with the hope that they would offer accurate, reliable, rapid, cheap and easily available alternatives to traditional methods of malaria diagnosis. The results from early malaria rapid diagnostic studies were quite promising, especially for detecting Plasmodium falciparum at densities of more than 100-500 parasites/microl. Despite the introduction of these devices over a decade ago, only a few target antigens have been introduced. Of greater concern, these devices have shown limitations in sensitivity, ability to differentiate species and robustness under field conditions in the tropics. Recent trials have revealed wide variability in sensitivity both within and between products. We review the recent trials assessing MRDD use for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections in endemic and non-endemic countries and describe the various aspects of these devices which need further improvement. High quality, accurate, rapid and affordable diagnostic tools are urgently needed now that new antimalarial regimens, characterized by higher cost and increased toxicity, have been introduced more widely in response to emerging multi-drug resistance.Field trial of the RTM dipstick method for the rapid diagnosis of malaria based on the detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen in whole blood.The performance of the Quorum RapidTest Malaria (RTM) dipstick method that detects Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) antigen in whole blood was evaluated in a malaria endemic area. Results were compared with conventional Giemsa-stained blood films. Of 306 people tested 37.9% (116/306) were found to be parasitaemic; of these 66.4% (77/116) were P. vivax and 32.8% (38/116) were P. falciparum infections. There was only one (0.9%) mixed P. falciparum plus P. vivax infection. The RTM test was positive in 35/36 patients with P. falciparum identified on blood smear examination, resulting in a sensitivity of 97.2% [95% confidence interval (CI): 91.6-102.8%]. Specificity was 96.3% (95% CI: 93.9-98.6%). The RTM test had a positive predictive value of 77.8% (95% CI: 65.7-89.9%) and a negative predictive value of 99.6% (95% CI: 98.4-100.8%). Of the 10 false positives, seven reported recent malaria episode and treatment, indicating persistence of antigenaemia. If these were assumed truly infected, the positive predictive value is increased to 93.3% (95% CI: 85.8-100.8%). The RTM test was positive in all seven P. falciparum infections with gametocytes and one mixed infection, but was negative in all falciparum gametocytes and relapsing fever cases. All but one P. vivax infection gave negative result on the RTM test. The RTM test missed one patient with parasitaemia. The test is highly sensitive and specific requiring no instrument or trained personnel. It appears to be a very useful tool for rapid diagnosis of malaria, especially in the rural health institutions with limited diagnostic facilities.An exploratory study of factors that affect the performance and usage of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in the Limpopo Province, South Africa.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are relatively simple to perform and provide results quickly for making treatment decisions. However, the accuracy and application of RDT results depends on several factors such as quality of the RDT, storage, transport and end user performance. A cross sectional survey to explore factors that affect the performance and use of RDTs was conducted in the primary care facilities in South Africa.This study was conducted in three malaria risk sub-districts of the Limpopo Province, in South Africa. Twenty nurses were randomly selected from 17 primary health care facilities, three nurses from hospitals serving the study area and 10 other key informants, representing the managers of the malaria control programmes, routine and research laboratories, were interviewed, using semi-structured questionnaires.There was a high degree of efficiency in ordering and distribution of RDTs, however only 13/20 (65%) of the health facilities had appropriate air-conditioning and monitoring of room temperatures. Sixty percent (12/20) of the nurses did not receive any external training on conducting and interpreting RDT. Fifty percent of nurses (10/20) reported RDT stock-outs. Only 3/20 nurses mentioned that they periodically checked quality of RDT. Fifteen percent of nurses reported giving antimalarial drugs even if the RDT was negative.Storage, quality assurance, end user training and use of RDT results for clinical decision making in primary care facilities in South Africa need to be improved. Further studies of the factors influencing the quality control of RDTs, their performance of RDTs and the ways to improve their use of RDTs are needed.Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2-based immunocapture diagnostic assay for malaria: cross-reactivity with rheumatoid factors.Recently introduced rapid nonmicroscopic immunocapture assays for the diagnosis of malaria infection are being evaluated for their sensitivity and specificity in various epidemiological settings. A Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2)-based assay (ICT) and a Plasmodium-specific lactate dehydrogenase test (OptiMAL) were evaluated for their specificities in different groups of patients who tested negative for malaria infection by microscopy. The patients were selected from different disease groups: rheumatoid arthritis, hepatitis C, toxoplasmosis, schistosomiasis, and hydatid disease. One hundred thirty-three of the 225 patients were positive for rheumatoid factor. Thirty-five of the 133 (26%) rheumatoid factor-positive patients gave a false-positive reaction with the ICT assay, but only 4 of these gave false-positive reactions with the OptiMAL test. Thirty-three of the 35 false-positive specimens became negative when repeat tested with the ICT assay after absorbing out the rheumatoid factor activity. Our study shows that the PfHRP-2-based ICT assay gave a false-positive reaction in 26% of the patients who had rheumatoid factors, but were negative for malaria by microscopy.Comparison of two rapid, HRP2-based diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum.Evaluation of the Binax NOW ICT test versus polymerase chain reaction and microscopy for the detection of malaria in returned travelers.Microscopic detection of Plasmodium species has been the reference standard for the diagnosis of malaria for more than a century. However, maintaining a sufficient level of expertise in microscopic diagnosis can be challenging, particularly in non-endemic countries. The objective of this study was to compare a new rapid malaria diagnostic device (NOW ICT Malaria Test; Binax, Inc., Portland, ME) to polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and expert microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria in 256 febrile returned travelers. Compared with PCR, the NOW ICT test showed a sensitivity of 94% for the detection of P. falciparum malaria (96% for pure P. falciparum infection) and 84% for non-P. falciparum infections (87% for pure P. vivax infections and 62% for pure P. ovale and P. malariae infections), with an overall specificity of 99%. The Binax NOW ICT may represent a useful adjunct for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in febrile returned travelers.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test for assessing the burden of malaria at delivery in India.All pregnant women who came for delivery at a district hospital in Mandla and a civil hospital in Maihar were screened for Plasmodium falciparum (placental parasitemia using a rapid test and microscopy and peripheral and umbilical cord parasitemia using microscopy alone). Two rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), Paracheck Pf and ParaHITf, were used. At Mandla, the sensitivity and specificity of the Paracheck Pf for P. falciparum were 93% and 84%, respectively. The positive predictive values (PPVs) and negative predictive values (NPVs) were 50% and 99%, respectively. At Maihar, the sensitivity and specificity of the ParaHITf for P. falciparum were 87.5% and 97%, respectively. The PPVs and NPVs were 75.4% and 98.7%, respectively. Placental infection was significantly associated with low birth weight. The RDTs for the identification of P. falciparum were more sensitive in placental blood than the placental blood smear by microscopy. Thus, the RDTs should be useful for rapid assessment of malaria at delivery.Out with the old, in with the new: the utility of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria diagnosis in Africa.After many years of development, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria are now being rolled out in many African countries to support the introduction of artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACT). RDTs create new opportunities both for improved care and as research tools, but it is important that the research agenda continues to address the many challenges, both operational and technical, that still need to be met. Here we review what is known and what new evidence is needed to maximise the utility of RDTs in Africa.Role of the Parasight-F test in the diagnosis of complicated Plasmodium falciparum malarial infection.An evaluation was made of the diagnostic efficacy and utility of the Parasight-F test in diagnosing Plasmodium falciparum malaria, compared with conventional microscopy, particularly in severe and complicated cases. This study was designed as a prospective, case control hospital-based study. Febrile patients suspected to be suffering from malaria were selected randomly and were subjected to peripheral smear examinations (thick and thin) and Parasight-F tests till the required number of at least 30 cases of P. falciparum infection were identified, including at least 15 complicated cases. In addition 20 cases of P. vivax malarial infection as well as 20 healthy age and sex-matched individuals were taken as two control groups. The outcome measure was the number of cases with positive Parasight-F test results compared with conventional microscopy. Thirty-two patients with P. falciparum malaria were identified, with 15 severe and complicated cases. Peripheral smears were positive in 29 (91%) of these, while parasight-F test was positive in 31 out of 32 (97%) cases. Parasites were detected only by bone marrow examination in one case. Diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of peripheral smears for detecting falciparum infection were 90.6% and 100% respectively while that of the Parasight-F test were 96.8% and 100%, respectively (P>.05). The Parasight-F test has high sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing P. falciparum malarial infection, comparable to or even higher than microscopy exams, particularly in severe and complicated cases, with additional advantages of speed, simplicity and objectivity.Invalid result of Plasmodium falciparum malaria detection with the BinaxNOW Malaria rapid diagnostic test.Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase assay to detect malarial parasites.Microscopic examination of blood smears remains the gold standard for the diagnosis of malaria. However, it is labour-intensive and requires skilled operators. Immunochromatographic dipstick assays provide a potential alternative. One such dipstick, the Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase assay (pLDH), is based on detection of the Plasmodium intracellular metabolic enzyme, LDH. The differentiation of malarial parasites is based on the antigenic differences between the pLDH isoforms. This study was designed to assess the sensitivity and specificity of pLDH assays in detecting and differentiating between various malarial species compared with microscopy.Blood samples (n = 124) submitted to our laboratory for routine diagnosis of malaria were included in this study. From each blood sample, two thin films and a quantitative buffy coat (QBC) were made for microscopy. Thin films were stained with Giemsa and acridine orange. The pLDH assay was performed on all the samples according to the manufacturer's instructions.Of the 124 blood samples, 84 were negative by all methods (Giemsa, acridine orange, QBC and pLDH assay). Of the 38 samples positive for Plasmodium falciparum on microscopy, pLDH assay correctly identified 36 at parasite counts as low as < 40 parasites/microl and had a sensitivity and specificity of 94.3% and 97.6%, respectively. Of the 21 samples positive for Plasmodium vivax, pLDH assay correctly identified 19 at parasite counts as low as < 80/microl, and had a sensitivity and specificity of 90.4% and 100%, respectively. However, it failed to identify two Plasmodium vivax infections at parasite counts of 5000/microl and > 200/microl, suggesting that plasmodial gene deletions could be responsible for non-expression of pLDH.Our data demonstrate that pLDH assay, given its accuracy, rapidity (10-15 minutes), ease of performance and interpretation, can be a useful tool for the detection of malaria in countries where both plasmodial species are co-endemic and where laboratory support is limited.Evaluation of a dipstick test for the rapid diagnosis of imported malaria among patients presenting within the network TropNetEurop.Lack of experience on the part of involved laboratory personnel frequently complicates swift diagnosis of imported falciparum malaria in non-endemic areas. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 have been marketed for several years and have been extensively evaluated. Recently, a test kit capable of detecting antigen of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax has been introduced. In order to evaluate this newly available tool, specimens from 664 patients were screened during the course of a prospective multicentre study within the European Network on Imported Infectious Disease Surveillance (TropNetEurop). Among the screened specimens, samples from 82 patients (12.3%) were positive for falciparum malaria using expert microscopy. A further 17 samples were positive for vivax malaria. The evaluated test kit performed with a sensitivity of 87.8% and a specificity of 99% for detection of falciparum malaria. Respective values for vivax malaria were 76.5% and 100%. Dipstick tests have the potential of improving the speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, especially if non-specialized laboratories are involved. However, decreased values of sensitivity and specificity, in comparison with expert microscopy, still impose a clear limit on the usefulness of the currently available kits.Antigen capture immuno-chromatographic strip format in detecting parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase to diagnose malaria in nonimmune patients.Several rapid diagnostic test devices (RDT) based on detection of malaria antigen in the whole blood were developed. OptiMal test the presence of parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) enzyme using three monoclonal antibodies was used. Two monoclonal antibodies were pan-specific and recognized all malaria species. The third one was specific only for Plasmodium falciparum. The parasite antigens were detected using an antigen-capture immunochromatographic strip format. One hundred-nine malaria positive and 730 malaria negative cases diagnosed by microscopy were included. 75/109 were P. falciparum 26 as P. vivax, 3 P. malariae and 5 mixed infection of P. falciparum & P. vivax. The RDT showed a low sensitivity (85%, 95% Confidence Interval [CI], 79-92%) with a much lower sensitivity in detecting species other than P. falciparum as well as in mixed infections. The sensitivity was 50% for less than 200 parasites/micro. The sensitivity of OptiMal for P. falciparum was 87% (95% CI, 79-94), 81% (95% CI, 66-96) for P. vivax, and failed with P. malariae. Mixed infections were misdiagnosed as Pfalciparum. The sensitivity of OptiMal was quite good in detecting both P. falciparum & P. vivax (98%; 95% CI, 97-99 & 100%; 95% CI, 100-100 respectively) and 99% (95% CI, 98-99) for all species. The positive and negative ratio for all malaria species was: (+LR = 62.3, -LR = 0.01); for P. falciparum (+LR = 38.9, -LR = 0.01) and for P. vivax (+LR = 0.8077/0, -LR = 0.2). The test value to assess drug resistance in post treatment days was discussed.Operational accuracy and comparative persistent antigenicity of HRP2 rapid diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum malaria in a hyperendemic region of Uganda.Parasite-based diagnosis of malaria by microscopy requires laboratory skills that are generally unavailable at peripheral health facilities. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) require less expertise, but accuracy under operational conditions has not been fully evaluated in Uganda. There are also concerns about RDTs that use the antigen histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) to detect Plasmodium falciparum, because this antigen can persist after effective treatment, giving false positive test results in the absence of infection. An assessment of the accuracy of Malaria Pf immuno-chromatographic test (ICT) and description of persistent antigenicity of HRP2 RDTs was undertaken in a hyperendemic area of Uganda.Using a cross-sectional design, a total of 357 febrile patients of all ages were tested using ICT, and compared to microscopy as the gold standard reference. Two independent RDT readings were used to assess accuracy and inter-observer reliability. With a longitudinal design to describe persistent antigenicity of ICT and Paracheck, 224 children aged 6-59 months were followed up at 7-day intervals until the HRP2 antigens where undetectable by the RDTs.Of the 357 patients tested during the cross-sectional component, 40% (139) had positive blood smears for asexual forms of P. falciparum. ICT had an overall sensitivity of 98%, a specificity of 72%, a negative predictive value (NPV) of 98% and a positive predictive value (PPV) of 69%. ICT showed a high inter-observer reliability under operational conditions, with 95% of readings having assigned the same results (kappa statistics 0.921, p < 0.001). In children followed up after successful antimalaria treatment, the mean duration of persistent antigenicity was 32 days, and this duration varied significantly depending on pre-treatment parasitaemia. In patients with parasite density >50,000/microl, the mean duration of persistent antigenicity was 37 days compared to 26 days for parasitaemia less than 1,000/microl (log rank 21.9, p < 0.001).ICT is an accurate and appropriate test for operational use as a diagnostic tool where microscopy is unavailable. However, persistent antigenicity reduces the accuracy of this and other HRP2-based RDTs. The low specificity continues to be of concern, especially in children below five years of age. These pose limitations that need consideration, such as their use for diagnosis of patients returning with symptoms within two to four weeks of treatment. Good clinical skills are essential to interpret test results.Rapid diagnostic tests for the home-based management of malaria, in a high-transmission area.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) are sometimes recommended to improve the home-based management of malaria. The accuracy of an RDT for the detection of clinical malaria and the presence of malarial parasites has recently been evaluated in a high-transmission area of southern Mali. During the same study, the cost-effectiveness of a 'test-and-treat' strategy for the home-based management of malaria (based on an artemisinin-combination therapy) was compared with that of a 'treat-all' strategy. Overall, 301 patients, of all ages, each of whom had been considered a presumptive case of uncomplicated malaria by a village healthworker, were checked with a commercial RDT (Paracheck-Pf). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of this test, compared with the results of microscopy and two different definitions of clinical malaria, were then determined. The RDT was found to be 82.9% sensitive (with a 95% confidence interval of 78.0%-87.1%) and 78.9% (63.9%-89.7%) specific compared with the detection of parasites by microscopy. In the detection of clinical malaria, it was 95.2% (91.3%-97.6%) sensitive and 57.4% (48.2%-66.2%) specific compared with a general practitioner's diagnosis of the disease, and 100.0% (94.5%-100.0%) sensitive but only 30.2% (24.8%-36.2%) specific when compared against the fulfillment of the World Health Organization's (2003) research criteria for uncomplicated malaria. Among children aged 0-5 years, the cost of the 'test-and-treat' strategy, per episode, was about twice that of the 'treat-all' (U.S.$1.0. v. U.S.$0.5). In older subjects, however, the two strategies were equally costly (approximately U.S.$2/episode). In conclusion, for children aged 0-5 years in a high-transmission area of sub-Saharan Africa, use of the RDT was not cost-effective compared with the presumptive treatment of malaria with an ACT. In older patients, use of the RDT did not reduce costs. The question remains whether either of the strategies investigated can be made affordable for the affected population.Diagnostic and prognostic utility of rapid strip (OptiMal and Paracheck) versus conventional smear microscopy in adult patients of acute, uncomplicated P. falciparum malaria in Mumbai, India.The present study compared the diagnostic and prognostic utility of two rapid tests the (Paracheck and OptiMal) versus conventional smear microscopy.Using two independent microscopists we carried out the three tests in 31 adult cases of smear positive, acute, uncomplicated Plasmodium falciparum malaria. All three tests were done pretreatment, and on Days 8, 15 and 29.Compared to microscopy, the Paracheck had a sensitivity of 100%, while the OptiMal had a sensitivity of 83.7%. The lower sensitivity of OptiMal resulted from misidentification by both microscopists of 6/31 cases as Plasmodium vivax. As a follow up tool, the OptiMal was better than Paracheck, due to the earlier disappearance of the parasite LDH. Also in the Paracheck, between microscopists, there was a significant difference in reading the tests, on Days 8 and 15.Our study reiterates, the continued utility of conventional smear microscopy.Field trial of the direct acridine orange method and ParaSight-F test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria at district hospitals in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.Assessment of malaria in pregnancy using rapid diagnostic tests and its association with HIV infection and hematologic parameters in South-Eastern Nigeria.P. falciparum malaria in pregnancy was evaluated using histidine-rich proteins-2 RDT and related to HIV infection and hematologic parameters. Prevalence of malaria, HIV and anemia were 19.7%, 3.1% and 17.2% respectively. Primigravidae were significantly more infected with malaria. Malaria was not significantly associated with anemia, blood group, genotype and HIV infection.Should countries implementing an artemisinin-based combination malaria treatment policy also introduce rapid diagnostic tests?Within the context of increasing antimalarial costs and or decreasing malaria transmission, the importance of limiting antimalarial treatment to only those confirmed as having malaria parasites becomes paramount. This motivates for this assessment of the cost-effectiveness of routine use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) as an integral part of deploying artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACTs).The costs and cost-effectiveness of using RDTs to limit the use of ACTs to those who actually have Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia in two districts in southern Mozambique were assessed. To evaluate the potential impact of introducing definitive diagnosis using RDTs (costing $0.95), five scenarios were considered, assuming that the use of definitive diagnosis would find that between 25% and 75% of the clinically diagnosed malaria patients are confirmed to be parasitaemic. The base analysis compared two ACTs, artesunate plus sulfadoxine/pyrimethamine (AS+SP) costing $1.77 per adult treatment and artemether-lumefantrine (AL) costing $2.40 per adult treatment, as well as the option of restricting RDT use to only those older than six years. Sensitivity analyses considered lower cost ACTs and RDTs and different population age distributions.Compared to treating patients on the basis of clinical diagnosis, the use of RDTs in all clinically diagnosed malaria cases results in cost savings only when 29% and 52% or less of all suspected malaria cases test positive for malaria and are treated with AS+SP and AL, respectively. These cut-off points increase to 41.5% (for AS+SP) and to 74% (for AL) when the use of RDTs is restricted to only those older than six years of age. When 25% of clinically diagnosed patients are RDT positive and treated using AL, there are cost savings per malaria positive patient treated of up to $2.12. When more than 29% of clinically diagnosed cases are malaria test positive, the incremental cost per malaria positive patient treated is less than US$1. When relatively less expensive ACTs are introduced (e.g. current WHO preferential price for AL of $1.44 per adult treatment), the RDT price to the healthcare provider should be $0.65 or lower for RDTs to be cost saving in populations with between 30 and 52% of clinically diagnosed malaria cases being malaria test positive.While the use of RDTs in all suspected cases has been shown to be cost-saving when parasite prevalence among clinically diagnosed malaria cases is low to moderate, findings show that targeting RDTs at the group older than six years and treating children less than six years on the basis of clinical diagnosis is even more cost-saving. In semi-immune populations, young children carry the highest risk of severe malaria and many healthcare providers would find it harder to deny antimalarials to those who test negative in this age group.[Concordance between thick blood smear, immunochromatography and polymerase chain reaction for malaria diagnosis].The rapid and effective diagnosis of malaria is the determining condition for an appropriate treatment and control of the disease.The sensitivity, specificity and the positive and negative predictive values were evaluated in cases of suspected malaria in Colombia in a comparison of a rapid diagnostic test. the PCR test and the thick blood smear-the traditional gold standard.A group of 100 patients with symptoms compatible with malaria, were included in the study. They were selected from the following Colombian regions: Urabá, Córdoba, lower Cauca, and relatively fewer from other malaria endemic areas of Colombia including the provinces of Valle, Chocó in the central west of Colombia and Vichada to the east. To each patient the following three tests were performed: the rapid OptiMAL test, the PCR identification and the thick blood smear. The PCR amplified specific DNA sequences with primers designed to identify the genus Plasmodium, and the two species present in Colombia, P. falciparum and P. vivax.The sensitivity of the rapid test versus the thick smear, for the diagnosis of both species of Plasmodium was 93.9% (95% CI: 87-100%) and the specificity was 94.3% (95% CI:.253 85-100%). The PCR compared with the thick smear showed a sensitivity of 100% (95% CI: 99-100%) and a specificity of 97.1% (95% CI: 90-100%).The sensitivity and specificity of the three tests did not present statistically significant differences. However, the thick blood smear was recommended as the standard test, mainly due to its low cost.PfHRP2 and PfLDH antigen detection for monitoring the efficacy of artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) in the treatment of uncomplicated falciparum malaria.An assessment of the accuracy of two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) or Pf lactate dehydrogenase (PfLDH) was undertaken in children aged between six and 59 months included in an anti-malarial efficacy study in Benin.In Allada (Benin), 205 children aged 6-59 months with falciparum malaria received either artesunate-amodiaquine (ASAQ), artemether-lumefantrine (AL), or sulphadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP). Children included in the study were simultaneously followed by both RDT and high-quality microscopy for up to 42 days.At the time of inclusion, PfHRP2-based tests were positive in 203 children (99%) and PfLDH-based tests were positive in 204 (99.5%). During follow-up, independent of the treatment received, only 17.3% (28/162) of children effectively cured were negative with the PfHRP2 RDT at day 3, with a gradual increase in specificity until day 42. The specificity of antigen detection with the PfLDH test was 87% (141/162) on day 3, and between 92% and 100% on days 7 to 42. A statistical difference was observed between the persistence of PfHRP2 and PfLDH antigenaemia during follow-up in children treated with artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) but not with SP.Although both RDTs are as sensitive as microscopy in detecting true malaria cases, the PfHRP2 RDT had very low specificity during follow-up until day 28. On the other hand, the PfLDH test could be used to detect failures and, therefore, to assess anti-malarial efficacy.Comparison of two commercial assays with expert microscopy for confirmation of symptomatically diagnosed malaria.Conventional light microscopy has been the established method for malaria diagnosis. However, recently several nonmicroscopic rapid diagnostic tests have been developed for situations in which reliable microscopy may not be available. This study was conducted to evaluate the diagnostic performance of a recently introduced ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test. This assay detects Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 antigen (PfHRP-2) for P. falciparum diagnosis and pan-malarial antigen for P. vivax diagnosis. In this study we compared the performance of ICT Malaria Pf/Pv with microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood films and with an OptiMAL test that detects Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) antigen. A total of 750 clinically suspected malaria patients were examined at local health centers in Kuwait. Both the antigen tests had a high degree of specificity (>98%) for detection of malaria infection. However, they were less sensitive than microscopy. Compared with microscopy the ICT Malaria PF/pf test failed to detect malaria infection in 93 (34%) of 271 malaria patients (11% of patients with P. falciparum and 37% of patients with P. vivax) and the OptiMAL test failed to detect malaria infection in 41 (15%) of 271 malaria patients (7% of patients with P. falciparum and 13% of patients with P. vivax). The sensitivities of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL tests for detection of P. falciparum infection were 81 and 87%, and those for detecting P. vivax were 58 to 79%, respectively. The sensitivity of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL tests decreased significantly to 23 and 44%, respectively, at parasite densities of <500/ micro l. Both of the tests also produced a number of false-positive results. Overall, the performance of the OptiMAL test was better than that of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test. However, our results raise particular concern over the sensitivity of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test for detection of P. vivax infection. Further developments appear necessary to improve the performance of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test.[Evaluation of ICT malaria immunochromatographic Binax NOW ICT P.f/P.v test for rapid diagnosis of malaria in a Colombian endemic area].One of the strategies to reduce malarial morbidity and mortality is to make an early diagnosis, using simple rapid tests which are highly sensitive and specific. Furthermore, the tests must be easy to perform and understand by local people in such a way that a suitable and prompt antimalarial treatment is guaranteed.The sensitivity and specificity was determined for the immuno-chromographic malaria dipstick (ICT Pf/Pv) test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria in Turbo, Antioquia.The sample consisted of 171 patients distributed into two groups: the first group was 118 patients with acute febrile syndrome compatible with malaria to which ICT Pf/Pv and thick smears were applied simultaneously; a second group was 53 patients with positive diagnosis by thick smear, with follow-up on the 4th and 7th days after beginning treatment.Sensitivity and specificity of the ICT Pf/Pv test for Plasmodium falciparum infections were 54.2% (95%CI: 52.0-53.4%) and 93.6% (95%CI: 93.1-94.2%), respectively. In addition, for Plasmodium vivax the sensitivity and specificity were 80% (95%CI: 77.9-82.1%) and 100% (95%CI: 99.5-100%); there was a 21.4% loss of sensitivity for P. falciparum 21.4% and a 33% loss for P. vivax malaria with parasitaemias under 500 parasites/ul. For the confirmatory test, ICT Pf/Pv showed a global sensitivity of 71.6% with 20.7% false positive and 5.6% false negative results. During follow-up, ICT showed 36% and 34% false positive results for day 4 and 7, respectively.The ICT Pf/Pv test has a poor sensitivity for P. falciparum malaria and its capacity to detect parasitemias under 500 parasites/ul is minimal. As a confirmatory test, the ICT Pf/Pv has a good sensitivity for P. falciparum. Its use for patient follow-up is not recommended.Performance of the Now Malaria rapid diagnostic test with returned travellers: a 2-year retrospective study in a French teaching hospital.Malaria caused by Plasmodium falciparum remains the major life-threatening parasitic infection in the world. The number of cases in non-endemic countries continues to increase, and it is important that misdiagnosis of malaria should not occur, especially in non-immune travellers, because of the high risk of a fatal outcome. In a retrospective study of 399 sera, the Now Malaria rapid test was compared with the quantitative buffy coat (QBC) test and microbiological examination of thin blood films. Compared with the QBC test and thin blood films, the Now Malaria test had sensitivity and specificity values of 96.4% and 97%, respectively, for the detection of pure P. falciparum infection. A negative predictive value of 99.4% allows this test to be included in diagnostic strategies for patients presenting with clinical suspicion of malaria. Two false-negative results were associated with low levels of parasitaemia in the specimens. Thus, use of the Now Malaria test alone to detect P. falciparum infection in non-endemic countries could lead to misdiagnosis of malaria. This rapid diagnostic test should therefore be performed in association with another prompt traditional method such as examination of thin blood films.Post treatment sensitivity studies with the ParaSight-F test for malaria diagnosis in Zimbabwe.The post-treatment diagnostic performance of the Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein (HRP-II) antigen detection test, ParaSight-F test, was assessed on 55 falciparum malaria cases treated with chloroquine during in vivo drug sensitivity studies. The post-treatment sensitivity of the test remained high, except for an insignificant decline on day 1. However, specificity dropped sharply by day 1, subsequently increasing linearly with time to satisfactory values by day 10. As expected, from its inverse relationship to specificity, the false positive rate was high on day 1 and decreased linearly to low level by day 10. The temporary increase in false positive rate-following treatment was due to persistent parasite antigen, rather than subpatent parasitaemia. Thus findings showed that positive readings by the test within 10 days post-treatment may occur in cured cases and will not necessarily imply treatment failure. Furthermore it will be important to take patient antimalarial history into consideration during routine usage of the test for malaria diagnosis. The trend of Youden's J-index for the ParaSight-F test showed that from 10 days post-treatment, the test was generally reliable, with positive readings indicating active infection. It was concluded that the ParaSight-F test was not only valuable at confirming malaria diagnosis on clinical cases in seasonal transmission areas, but had potential for application to detect recrudescent infections within 2 weeks of chloroquine treatment.Performance of an immunochromatography test for vivax malaria in the Amazon region, Brazil.The study was carried out to evaluate the diagnostic performance of the ICT malaria Pf/Pv test for vivax malaria diagnosis in Bel m, Amazon region, Brazil. The results of blood malaria parasites examination using an immunochromatography test were compared with thick blood film (TBF) examination. It was also evaluated the performance of this test storaged at three different temperatures (25 degree C, 30 degree C, and 37 degree C) for 24 hours before use. Overall sensitivity of ICT Pf/Pv was 61.8% with a specificity of 100%, positive and negative predictive value of 100% and 71.8%, respectively and accuracy of 80.6%. The test sensitivity was independent of the parasite density. This test needs to be further reviewed in order to have better performance for P. vivax malaria diagnosis.Evaluation of rapid immunocapture assays for diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax in Korea.The rapid immunocapture assays, OptiMal and ICT, were evaluated from 87 individuals for the diagnosis of malaria infections directly from whole blood. A total of 87 individuals was examined for malaria parasites by microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood smears, and 65 cases were positive for Plasmodium vivax by microscopy. Correspondingly, the OptiMal test identified malaria infection in 45 cases (69.2%) of microscopy positive cases. Of these, two cases were misinterpreted as Plasmodium falciparum, whereas ICT detected P. vivax infection in 29 (44.6%) patients. We would like to propose that rapid immuno capture assays are an easy method that can serve as a useful tool in addition to microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria, but sensitivity is not yet satisfactory for diagnosis of P. vivax in Korea.Glutamate dehydrogenase antigen detection in Plasmodium falciparum infections.The usefulness of malaria diagnosis by Plasmodium falciparum GDH (NADP+), obtained by affinity chromatography, is demonstrated in ELISA assays, testing IgG antibodies against GDH (NADP+) from patients with acute malaria, who have had two or more episodes of malaria, or from sera of hyperimmune patients. GDH (NADP+) thermal stability was demonstrated in a high heat resistance assay. The immunofluorescence assay demonstrated that anti-culture (P. falciparum) supernatant serum and anti-GDH (NADP+) of Proteus spp. recognized epitopes in Venezuelan isolates, and Colombian and Brasilian malarial strains. The antigen is soluble, with high specificity, is a potent immunogen and is thermoresistant.Is molecular biology the best alternative for diagnosis of malaria to microscopy? A comparison between microscopy, antigen detection and molecular tests in rural Kenya and urban Tanzania.To assess the agreement of different diagnostic methods for the diagnosis and confirmation of the clinical suspicion of Plasmodium infection in children in Tanzania and Kenya.Blood samples were collected by the finger prick method from 338 children. Blood samples were collected from 338 children with the clinical suspicion of uncomplicated malaria in health clinics in Tanzania and Kenya. The presence of Plasmodium parasites was assessed with microscopy, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and the molecular assays, quantitative nucleic acid sequence based amplification (QT-NASBA) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). The results were compared and analysed for agreement.There was a high degree of agreement (88.6-100%) between RDTs or molecular tests and microscopy. In rural Kenya, with a high incidence of malaria cases, the correlation coefficient ranged from 0.94 for RDTs to 0.76 for PCR. In urban Tanzania, where there was a low incidence of cases, R for RDTs was 1.0 but only 0.25 for PCR and 0.33 for NASBA.Malaria is overestimated if the diagnosis is based solely on clinical signs. Therefore, laboratory confirmation is essential. Microscopy is a reliable method in rural areas where malaria is prevalent, but RDTs offer a good alternative with the advantage that it is an easy and rapid method. Molecular tests are more sensitive but difficult to implement in rural areas. In areas with lower incidence, molecular tests detect a significantly higher number of Plasmodium infections than RDTs or microscopy. Although implementation of molecular tools can be difficult, the prospect of an easy and cheap detection system makes them promising tools for the near future.Field evaluation of the ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. immunochromatographic test in India.[Imported malaria: diagnostic traps and rapid tests].Imported malaria is a disease prevalent in France: 6,000 to 8,000 cases a year, of which 15% are pediatric cases. Despite this high incidence, the diagnosis is often delayed. The patient may then evolve to a severe form. This diagnostic delay is due to non-specific clinical symptoms in children. The most common symptoms are fever and digestive disorders (diarrhea, vomiting). In the absence of thrombocytopenia, the laboratory tests are not very useful for diagnosis. Parasitological examinations are dependent on the experience of the biologist, particularly in cases of low parasitemia as those observed in children who have received partial chemoprophylaxis. The recent introduction of rapid tests based on the detection of Plasmodium proteins, allows emergency remedy to this problem. The blood smears remains the gold standard and has to be used to confirm the results of rapid tests. If rapid tests improve the detection of Plasmodium in 2009, it remains mandatory to evoke the diagnosis of malaria in any febrile child coming from an endemic area.[Efficiency of KAT-quick P.f. test (KAT medical, SAR) among the populations of drug-resistant parasites].The KAT-Quick P.f. test (KAT Medical, South African Republic) is based on the detection of protein HPR II produced by trophozoites and young gametocytes of P. falciparum. This test was conducted by the authors in the distribution areas of P. falciparum strains differing in the spectrum of drug resistance. Five hundred and forty-nine blood samples from febrile patients in Vietnam (n=84), Sierra Leone (n=41), Nigeria (n=14), Tanzania (n=8), Kenya (n=5), and Tadjikistan (n=397) were tested. Microscopy served as a primary control. Detection of P. falciparum DNA, using polymerase chain reaction (PCR) with included primers (nested PCR) of the most sensitive modification of PCR was a final control. The efficiency of the KAT-Quick P.f. test was estimated as a ratio of the number of its positive results to those of PCR. It was equal to 98-95%. The KAT-Quick P.f. test revealed no false-positive case associated with the genome of the parasite. The specificity of the test was determined as a ratio of the number of its negative (no P. falciparum) results to those of PCR. The blood samples from patients with vivax malaria and from those with nonmalarial fever were investigated. There was no cross reaction of the KAT-Quick P.f. test system for P. falciparum with that for P. vivax. The KAT-Quick P.f. test yielded no positive reaction with the blood from patients with non-malarial fever. Drug resistance depending on the spectrum of specific drugs caused its emergence may be determined by one or several mechanisms that are ultimately determined by one, the key mechanism. Thus, the findings suggest that multidrug resistance of P. falciparum does not trigger the occurrence of changes in its surface antigen--HRPII that is responsible for the efficiency of the KAT-Quick P.f. test. These may be also extrapolated to other rapid tests patterned after the same principle.Malaria diagnosis under field conditions in the Venezuelan Amazon.To improve practical, accurate diagnosis of malaria in the Amazon rainforest of Venezuela, two rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) (OptiMAL-IT) and FalciVax) and a laboratory light microscope, used in the field with a battery-operated head lamp as an external light source, were evaluated against the standard laboratory microscope procedure for malaria detection. One hundred and thirty-six Yanomami patients were studied for the presence of malaria parasites. Thirty-three patients (24%) were positive for malaria (Plasmodium falciparum, P. vivax, P. malariae). Twenty-one (64%) of the positive patients had <100 parasites/microl. Both RDTs showed poor sensitivity (24.2% for OptiMAL-IT) and 36.4% for FalciVax) but good specificity (99% both for OptiMAL-IT) and FalciVax). Field and laboratory microscopy showed sensitivities of 94% and 91%, respectively. The kappa coefficient was 0.90, indicating a high agreement between field and laboratory microscopy. We conclude that (i) adequate slide reading cannot be substituted by either of the two RDTs in the Venezuelan Amazon and (ii) the use of a light source such as that described above makes slide reading more feasible than hitherto in remote areas without electricity.[Diagnosis of Falciparum malaria by immunochromatographic test].To evaluate the applicability of rapid immunochromatographic test(ICT) for diagnosing falciparum malaria in outpatient clinics in endemic area.With thick blood smear method as control, ICT was used for the detection of P. falciparum.The sensitivity and specificity of ICT in detecting P. falciparum was 94.7% and 90.3%, respectively. No cross-reaction with P. vivax was found (P > 0.05).ICT is much more rapid and simple than thick blood smear method for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, and can be applied in the outpatient clinics in endemic area.An assessment of the usefulness of a rapid immuno-chromatographic test, "Determine trade mark malaria pf" in evaluation of intervention measures in forest villages of central India.Plasmodium falciparum malaria, is a major health problem in forested tribal belt of central India. Rapid and accurate methods are needed for the diagnosis of P. falciparum. We performed a blinded evaluation of the recently introduced Determine trade mark malaria pf test (Abbott, Laboratories, Japan) compared with microscopy and splenomegaly in children in epidemic prone areas of district Mandla to assess the impact of intervention measures.Children aged 2-10 yrs with and without fever were examined for spleen enlargement by medical specialist by establishing a mobile field clinic. From these children thick blood smears were prepared from finger prick and read by a technician. Simultaneously, rapid tests were performed by a field lab attendant. The figures for specificity, sensitivity and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.In all 349 children were examined. The sensitivity and specificity for Determine rapid diagnostic test were 91 and 80% respectively. The positive predictive values (PPV), negative predictive values (NPV) and accuracy of the test were respectively 79, 91 and 85%. On the contrary, the sensitivity and specificity of spleen in detecting malaria infection were 57 and 74 % respectively with PPV of 73%, NPV 59 % and an accuracy of 65%.Determine trade mark malaria rapid diagnostic test is easier and quicker to perform and has other advantages over microscopy in not requiring prior training of personnel or quality control. Thus, highlighting the usefulness of a rapid antigen test in assessing prevailing malaria situation in remote areas.Evaluation of a rapid test for histidine rich protein 2 for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Cameroonian children.[ParaSight F in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria].The ParaSight F is a new diagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum infections and is based on the detection of a trophozoite-derived antigen, the histidine rich protein II (HRP-II). To assess the usefulness of this test, we conducted a prospective study and analyzed 62 blood specimens from 38 patients, using thin blood films, thick blood films and the ParaSight F test. Compared to thick blood film, on samples taken before and during treatment, the ParaSight F test had 86.4% sensitivity and 100% specificity. In 31.5% of P. falciparum infected patients, parasitemia was lower than 1 parasite/1000 red blood cells, with all specimens being positive by the ParaSight F test. In 15 cases, specimens were negative by thin blood film, but were positive by thick blood film and by the ParaSight F test. Two patients had, after their treatment was started, positive results by ParaSight F and negative results by thick blood film. Cross-reactivity occurred neither with other Plasmodium species, nor in cases of severe inflammatory syndrome. Persistence of antigenemia was monitored in 14 patients receiving quinine. At day five of treatment, antigenemia persisted in seven patients. In conclusion, the ParaSight F test does not allow following up the efficacy of treatment, identifying other Plasmodium species, or assessing parasitemia. However, because this test is easy to perform and has good sensitivity and specificity, it is a useful tool in emergent context, in cases of parasitemia lower than the thin blood film threshold, and in cases morphologically difficult to decipher.Monitoring malaria control in Khammouane province, Laos: an active case detection survey of Plasmodium falciparum malaria using the Paracheck rapid diagnostic test.In Khammouane province, Laos, over 5000 slide-positive malaria cases were reported at local health facilities in 1997. To combat the spread of malaria, insecticide-treated nets (ITNs) and community health education were provided to the people in this province by the Lao Ministry of Health and the Japan International Cooperation Agency. In order to document the current malaria situation, an active case detection (ACD) survey using rapid diagnostic tests was conducted at 23 sites from June to July, the rainy season, in 2005. A total of 1711 villagers from 403 households participated in the survey. The proportion of positive cases was 0.7% (12/1711) with a range in each village of 0-8.2%. The low infection rate observed in this ACD survey was consistent with the decrease in the number of slide-positive malaria cases at local health facilities (from over 5000 cases to 536 cases), indicating the substantial progress made in malaria control. Although the reduction of malaria cases can be attributed to multiple factors, continued promotion of the proper use of ITNs as well as community-based testing and treatment services, especially in remote areas, may lead to a further reduction of malaria cases in the province.Bedside diagnosis of imported malaria using the Binax Now malaria antigen detection test.Malaria may be misdiagnosed in non-endemic countries when the necessary experience for rapid expert microscopy is lacking. Rapid diagnostic tests may improve the diagnosis and may play a role as a bedside diagnostic tool. In a multicentre study we recruited patients suspected of malaria over a period of 14 months. The Binax Now Malaria rapid test was used at the bedside and in the clinical microbiology laboratory. The training of clinical staff was monitored and their experience with the use of the test was recorded. 542 patients were included, 80 of whom had malaria diagnosed by microscopy. The rapid test used at the bedside had a sensitivity of 88% for the detection of P. falciparum compared to 95% when the test was performed in the microbiology laboratory. The risk of technical problems and invalid tests was highest when the test was used at the bedside. The rapid diagnostic test may be useful for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria when used by routine laboratory staff, but could lead to misdiagnoses when used at the bedside. Microscopy is still essential in order to identify the few missed diagnoses, to determine the degree of parasitaemia, and to ensure species diagnosis, including mixed infections.Development and evaluation of an immunochromatographic kit for the detection of antibody to Plasmodium vivax infection in South Korea.Malaria is a major parasitic disease in tropical areas. Three to five hundred million people suffer from the disease and it kill a million people per year. Blood smear observation was developed for the diagnosis of malaria, but the examination needs skilled experts and exact diagnosis is time consuming. A kit based on immunochromatography can be a reliable and rapid method for clinical diagnosis, even in the hands of inexperienced personnel. However, all such currently developed kits can only diagnose P. falciparum malaria. In our previous report, the C-terminal region of P. vivax merozoite surface protein 1 (PvcMSP) was cloned and expressed in E. coli. In the present study, we developed an immunochromatographic kit using this PvcMSP for the diagnosis of specific antibody to P. vivax malaria in serum samples. The kit was used to examine sera from vivax malaria patients and non-malaria- infected person and the test showed 100% sensitivity (78/78) and 98.3% specificity (58/59). This result demonstrated that the immunochromatographic kit for P. vivax antibody detection is applicable for the rapid and precise diagnosis of P. vivax malaria.Malaria diagnosis and treatment under the strategy of the integrated management of childhood illness (IMCI): relevance of laboratory support from the rapid immunochromatographic tests of ICT Malaria P.f/P.v and OptiMal.The algorithm developed for the integrated management of childhood illness (IMCI) provides guidelines for the treatment of paediatric malaria. In areas where malaria is endemic, for example, the IMCI strategy may indicate that children who present with fever, a recent history of fever and/or pallor should receive antimalarial chemotherapy. In many holo-endemic areas, it is unclear whether laboratory tests to confirm that such signs are the result of malaria would be very relevant or useful. Children from a holo-endemic region of Tanzania were therefore checked for malarial parasites by microscopy and by using two rapid immunochromatographic tests (RIT) for the diagnosis of malaria (ICT Malaria P.f/P.v and OptiMal. At the time they were tested, each of these children had been targeted for antimalarial treatment (following the IMCI strategy) because of fever and/or pallor. Only 70% of the 395 children classified to receive antimalarial drugs by the IMCI algorithm had malarial parasitaemias (68.4% had Plasmodium falciparum trophozoites, 1.3% only P. falciparum gametocytes, 0.3% P. ovale and 0.3% P. malariae). As indicators of P. falciparum trophozoites in the peripheral blood, fever had a sensitivity of 93.0% and a specificity of 15.5% whereas pallor had a sensitivity of 72.2% and a specificity of 50.8%. The RIT both had very high corresponding sensitivities (of 100.0% for the ICT and 94.0% for OptiMal) but the specificity of the ICT (74.0%) was significantly lower than that for OptiMal (100.0%). Fever and pallor were significantly associated with the P. falciparum asexual parasitaemias that equalled or exceeded the threshold intensity (2000/microl) that has the optimum sensitivity and specificity for the definition of a malarial episode. Diagnostic likelihood ratios (DLR) showed that a positive result in the OptiMal test (DLR = infinity) was a better indication of malaria than a positive result in the ICT (DLR = 3.85). In fact, OptiMal had diagnostic reliability (0.93) which approached that of an ideal test and, since it only detects live parasites, OptiMal is superior to the ICT in monitoring therapeutic responses. Although the RIT may seem attractive for use in primary health facilities because relatively inexperienced staff can perform them, the high cost of these tests is prohibitive. In holo-endemic areas, use of RIT or microscopical examination of bloodsmears may only be relevant when malaria needs to be excluded as a cause of illness (e.g. prior to treatment with toxic or expensive drugs, or during malaria epidemics). Wherever the effective drugs for the first-line treatment of malaria are cheap (e.g. chloroquine and Fansidar), treatment based on clinical diagnosis alone should prove cost-saving in health facilities without microscopy.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria.ParaSight-F test to diagnose malaria in hypo-endemic and epidemic prone regions of Vietnam.The antigen capture ParaSight-F test was evaluated during a drug sensitivity survey in a hypoendemic region of northern Vietnam. When only asexual blood forms of P. falciparum were considered, sensitivity of ParaSight-F was 100%, specificity 88% (95% CI 95-80%), positive predictive value 68% (95% CI 85-50%) and negative predictive value 100%. ParaSight-F proved very convenient for rapid screening and selection of patients to enrol in a drug sensitivity study. In northern Vietnam, the introduction of the test as a routine diagnostic tool is not justified, considering its high cost, the necessity to carry out the treatment of presumptive Plasmodium vivax cases and the persistence of positive reactions following treatment. However, the test will be a valuable tool in remote areas in emergency situations, where rapid confirmation of a P. falciparum outbreak is required.Evaluation of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based colloid gold-immunochromatography assay for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.To establish a colloid gold-immunochromatography assay (GICA) for detecting Plasmodium falciparum.The monoclonal antibodies (mAbs) against lactate dehydrogenase of P. falciparum (LDHpf) were screened for preparation of GICA strips. With microscopic examination of the blood smears and PCR test as control, GICA was evaluated for its sensitivity, specificity and stability in the diagnosis of malaria in the outpatient clinics in China.Four hybridoma cell lines against LDHpf were prepared. Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay demonstrated that the 4 mAbs reacted only with P. falciparum, but not with protein of normal human red cell, P. vivax, Toxoplasma gondii, or Schistosoma japonicam. All the 4 mAbs recognized a 33 kD protein designated as LDHpf as shown by Western blot analysis. Compared with the microscopic examination of blood smears and PCR test, GICA had the sensitivities of 88.37% and 86.67% and the specificities of 95.65% and 97.78%, respectively. Concordance between microscopic examination and GICA for P. falciparum infection was 91.55%.GICA established in this study is simple, rapid, sensitive and specific for detecting P. falciparum, and is potentially useful in developing reagent kits for clinical use.Update on rapid diagnostic testing for malaria.To help mitigate the expanding global impact of malaria, with its associated increasing drug resistance, implementation of prompt and accurate diagnosis is needed. Malaria is diagnosed predominantly by using clinical criteria, with microscopy as the current gold standard for detecting parasitemia, even though it is clearly inadequate in many health care settings. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have been recognized as an ideal method for diagnosing infectious diseases, including malaria, in recent years. There have been a number of RDTs developed and evaluated widely for malaria diagnosis, but a number of issues related to these products have arisen. This review highlights RDTs, including challenges in assessing their performance, internationally available RDTs, their effectiveness in various health care settings, and the selection of RDTs for different health care systems.Rapid diagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum in 32 Marines medically evacuated from Liberia with a febrile illness.Detection and species determination of malaria parasites by PCR: comparison with microscopy and with ParaSight-F and ICT malaria Pf tests in a clinical environment.A rapid procedure for the diagnosis of malaria infections directly from dried blood spots by PCR amplification was evaluated with samples from 52 patients. Plasmodium infections were identified with a genus-specific primer set, and species differentiation between Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax was analyzed by multiplex PCR. The PCR test with any of the three primer sets was able to detect as few as four parasites per microliter by gel electrophoresis or by nonisotopic paper hybridization chromatography. The diagnoses obtained by PCR correlated closely with those obtained by Giemsa staining except for two samples observed to have mixed P. falciparum-P. vivax infections. These were initially missed by microscopic analysis. In comparison with antigen-capture assays for P. falciparum, the PCR assays were able to detect three infections that were missed by the ParaSight-F test. The PCR test was negative for nine ParaSight-F-positive samples and one ICT Malaria Pf-positive sample, and these were confirmed to be false-positive results. The PCR thus gave no false-negative or false-positive results. Patients undergoing antimalarial therapy were also monitored by the PCR assay. Four of seven patients who were PCR positive for P. vivax at the time of discharge were later readmitted to the hospital with a recurrence of P. vivax infection. We would like to propose that PCR is a sensitive and easy method that can serve as a useful addition to microscopy for the diagnosis and the clinical monitoring of treatment of malaria.[Efficiency and specificity of the KAT-test for rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria].A new rapid KAT Quick Malaria test for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, which is based on the detection of a monoclonal antibody-antigen complex of malaria parasites, has been worked out by the KAT Medical CC in South Africa. The efficiency and specificity of the KAT test were compared with those of the microscopic method and with the ICT test for rapid diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax. The polymerase chain reaction was used as a control test. Testing for malaria was performed on 98 blood samples from feverish patients in Vietnam and Tadjikistan and among the persons who had returned to Moscow from endemic regions. The efficiency of the KAT test for falciparum-malaria was found to be 100% versus 90.5% with ICT. The absence of cross-reactions with P. vivax and the presence of pseudopositive results of the KAT test for fever cases of non-malaria origin indicate its high specificity. There was no correlation between the rate of test line colouring and the level of parasitemia. The KAT test yielded positive results only when gametocytes were found in blood specimens.Evaluation of the performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo and Paracheck Pf tests for the diagnosis of malaria in Wondo Genet, southern Ethiopia.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test relative to microscopy for the diagnosis of falciparum and vivax malaria in Ethiopia.668 febrile patients visiting two health centers in Wondo Genet, southern Ethiopia, involved in this study in 2008. Giemsa-stained thin and thick blood smears were prepared and microscopically examined under a 100x oil immersion microscope objective for Plasmodium species identification and determination of parasitaemia, respectively. CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test and Paracheck Pf test were performed as per the manufacturers' instruction.The diagnostic validity of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum were very good with sensitivity of 99.4%, specificity of 98%, positive predictive value of 94.4% and negative predictive value of 99.8%. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test for the diagnosis of P. vivax were 99.4%, 98.2%, 94.5% and 99.8%, respectively. The diagnostic performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test is comparable to that of Paracheck Pf test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum (sensitivity 99.4%, specificity 98.2%).Although CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test and Paracheck Pf test have comparable diagnostic performance for the diagnosis of P. falciparum, CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test has the added advantage of diagnosing P. vivax. Hence, it is preferable to use CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test for the diagnosis of malaria in areas where microscopy is not accessible and where malaria due to P. falciparum and P. vivax are co-endemic as in Ethiopia.Point-of-care testing for malaria outbreak management.A rapid antigen assay for malaria was performed on blood samples collected during a simultaneous outbreak of falciparum malaria and vivax malaria on a remote island in the Indonesian archipelago. During the outbreak, a total of 89 patients (4.3% of the population) were diagnosed with malaria within a week. Microscopic examination revealed 78 malaria slide-positive cases, of whom 49 (62.8%) were identified as P. falciparum, 7 (9.0%) as P. vivax and 22 (28.2%) as mixed P. falciparum and P. vivax infections. The rapid malaria assay showed excellent correlation with expert-confirmed routine microscopy for P. falciparum and P. vivax monoinfections and mixed infections with a parasite density >50 parasites/microl. Several slide-negative blood samples collected from febrile patients with clinical malaria tested positive in the rapid test. The estimated sensitivity calculated for the rapid test (91.0%) was slightly higher than that of microscopy (87.6%). The result indicates that rapid antigen detection for malaria could be a useful alternative to microscopy to reduce the workload during emergency outbreak situations.A comparison of two rapid field immunochromatographic tests to expert microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria.In Myanmar, we tested two rapid malaria immunochromatographic kits: the OptiMAL assay for the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), and the ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. test for histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) and panmalarial antigens. A total of 229 patients were examined, of whom 133 were found to be malaria positive by Giemsa microscopy. Both OptiMAL and ICT gave lower sensitivities than previously reported. ICT sensitivity for Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum parasites were 86.2 and 2.9%, respectively; specificity was 76.9 and 100%, respectively. OptiMAL sensitivity for P. falciparum and non-falciparum parasites were 42.6 and 47.1%, respectively; specificity was 97.0 and 96.9%, respectively. The sensitivity of both tests for the detection of both P. falciparum and non-falciparum parasites increased with parasite density. Several explanations for these results are explored. Our results raise particular concern over batch quality variations of malaria rapid diagnostic devices (MRDDs).Comparative evaluation of four techniques for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections.Four diagnostic techniques for Plasmodium falciparum infection were evaluated against serial parasite dilutions and on identical field samples. These were (i) Giemsa-stained thick blood films (GTF), (ii) acridine orange-stained thick (AOTF) and thin (AOTnF) blood films, (iii) the quantitative buffy coat technique (QBC); and (iv) the ParaSight-F dipstick test (PS). PS had a consistently higher sensitivity and speed, was easiest to learn, and required no laboratory facility. The 100% sensitivity cut-off points against known parasite densities (per mm3) were: PS, 30; GTF, 84; QBC, 84; AOTnF, 84; AOTF, 149. In the field study, test sensitivities compared with examination of 800 microscope fields of a Giemsa-stained thin blood film were PS, 96.6%; AOTF, 93.1%; GTF, 91.4%; QBC, 89.7%; AOTnF, 82.8%. In the dilution study, one false positive result was recorded with QBC; in the field study there was one false positive each with PS, AOTnF and AOTF. When a newly trained microscopist examined samples of the parasite dilutions, the 100% sensitivity cut-off points were AOTF, 84; GTF, 140; QBC, 390. Total handling time was shortest with PS regardless of whether samples were processed individually or in batches of 10 or 100. The ParaSight-F test is recommended as the diagnostic tool for the future.Use of the Parasight-F diagnostic test for imported malaria in a travel clinic.The Parasight-F test based on the detection of a soluble antigen specific for Plasmodium falciparum is designed for the immediate diagnosis of malaria infection. We evaluated its use by clinicians during consultations. This prospective study of its diagnostic utility in febrile patients consulting a travel clinic on their return from areas endemic for malaria was conducted between May 1996 and May 1997. The Parasight-F test was performed by the clinician with confirmation by means of standard microscopic examination of venous blood. One-hundred and forty patients were enrolled. Forty-three (31%) cases of malaria were identified by microscopic examination. Thirty-eight were due to P. falciparum. The Parasight-F tests yielded 6 false-positive and 3 false-negative results compared to the microscopic findings. The specificity and sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria were 94% and 92%. These results show that the Parasight-F test alone cannot replace microscopic diagnosis of malaria in travel clinics.Immunoassays for tropical parasitic infections.Rapid immunochromatography-based detection of mixed-species malaria infection in Pakistan.We report the identification of mixed Plasmodium infections in four recent patients with malaria clinically refractory to empiric chloroquine therapy using the rapid antigen detection kit, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv. A rapid in vitro immunodiagnostic test, the NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit was used for the detection of circulating Plasmodium falciparum (Pf) and Plasmodium vivax (Pv) antigens in whole blood. Peripheral blood microscopy confirmed mixed-species infection in all the cases. Thick and thin peripheral blood films were made and stained with Giemsa stain and examined by both hospital laboratory staff and an experienced parasitologist who was blinded to the results of the rapid malarial antigen tests. Four recent patients (all male; mean age, 24 years) with mixed malarial infection were identified. All the subjects were males working for an oil company in a coastal area of Pakistan, and all had been diagnosed presumptively with malaria based on clinical grounds (without microbiologic confirmation), and were treated empirically with chloroquine without clinical response. Semiquantitative malaria counts via microscopy were as follows: P. vivax, scanty (2 patients) and moderate (2 patients); for P. falciparum--scanty (1 patient), moderate (2 patients), and heavy (1 patient). The present case series, although limited by the small number of patients with proven mixed P. falciparum-P. vivax infection, highlights the usefulness of the rapid antigen test in a highly malarious region of Pakistan where chloroquine resistance is prevalent. Although there was full concordance between the results of blood smear microscopy and rapid antigen testing, these techniques are potentially most useful when there is a discrepancy with microscopy findings. Accurate and rapid diagnosis of parasites, particularly in cases of mixed P. falciparum and P. vivax infection, is of immense importance for individual patient management and in reducing the burden of disease, especially in regions of chloroquine resistance.Field evaluation of malaria rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections.The objective of this study was to evaluate various malaria rapid diagnostic tests as a tool in the detection of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections in field conditions. Four field surveys were conducted in malaria-endemic areas of Palawan and Davao del Norte, Philippines to validate the various rapid diagnostic tests, namely Diamed OptiMAL 48 (DiaMed AG, Switzerland), ParaHIT f (Span Diagnostics, India), Orchid OptiMAL, and Paracheck Pf (both from Orchid Biomedical Systems, India). The results of the various rapid diagnostic tests were compared to those of microscopy. Sensitivity, specificity and detection rates according to the level of parasitemia were used as parameters to describe the performance of the various rapid diagnostic tests in the field. Practical and operational assessments were also done. The results of the study show that the sensitivity and detection rates were generally lower than previously reported, with sensitivities ranging from 4.8% to 20.6%, except for Diamed OptiMAL 48, which had sensitivities of 78.8% to 96.8%, and detection rates of 50.0% to 96.8%. The rest had detection rates ranging from 0.0% to 50.0%. All the specificities ranged from 18.2% to 100.0%. Improper conditions at the time of manufacturing, storage, transport, and utilization may affect the validity of the results. Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria provide practical means of detecting malarial infections, especially in endemic areas. However, issues regarding variability in performance must to be addressed before they can be used as mainstream diagnostic tools.A rapid dipstick antigen capture assay for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria. WHO Informal Consultation on Recent Advances in Diagnostic Techniques and Vaccines for Malaria.Recent advances in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections have made it possible to consider supplementing light microscopy with a standardized dipstick antigen capture assay based on the detection of a parasite-specific protein, which is secreted by the asexual blood stages and immature gametocytes but not by the other stages. Field trials indicate that this dipstick assay provides consistently reproducible results, with a threshold of detection of P. falciparum parasitaemia similar to that obtained by high quality routine malaria microscopy and a specificity and sensitivity of around 90% compared with standard thick blood film microscopy. The stability, reproducibility, and ease of use of the assay clearly indicate that it has potential for application in the management of malaria, particularly at the peripheral health care level, provided its accuracy can be assured and that it can be made affordable. Consideration should be given to its wider use where operational requirements and resources so justify, and where decisions are based on adequate evaluation of the existing health delivery systems.End-user errors in applying two malaria rapid diagnostic tests in a remote area of Sudan.We assessed end-user practice for numerous procedural steps of two types of RDTs: Core Malaria Pf (the cassette format) and OptiMAL IT (the dipstick format). Two types of errors occurred: generic errors common to both types of test and specific errors caused by the test design and manufacturer's instructions. End-user errors were more frequent with OptiMAL IT than Core Pf tests. To improve malaria diagnosis with rapid tests, users require training and better manufacturer's instructions that take into account local conditions.A comparison of three diagnostic techniques for malaria: a rapid diagnostic test (NOW Malaria), PCR and microscopy.Malaria is a common, life-threatening infection in endemic tropical areas and one that presents a diagnostic challenge to laboratories in most non-endemic countries. A rapid and accurate diagnosis is a prerequisite for effective treatment, especially for the potentially fatal cases of Plasmodium falciparum infection. In the present, multi-centre study, the performances of a rapid diagnostic test (NOW) Malaria) and several, commercial, PCR-based assays (AMS61, AMS42, AMS43, AMS4 and AMS45) were compared against the results of microscopical examination of bloodsmears (the current 'gold standard'). The subjects were either non-European immigrants (N=135) or international travellers (N=171). There was good concordance between the results of all the detection methods, with kappa values of >0.8. Although the NOW Malaria rapid test was both sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) in detecting P. falciparum infections, it was less specific (93.1%) and sensitive (90.7%) in identifying the other Plasmodium species. The results from the AMS61 assay, designed to detect any malarial infection, generally parallelled those of the microscopy (kappa = 0.89), giving a specificity of 98.2% and a sensitivity of 91.0%. Although the use of species-specific molecular primers to identify pure infections with P. falciparum and P. vivax gave results that were in good agreement with those of the microscopy, the subjects who had apparently pure infections with P. ovale or P. malariae were always found PCR-negative. Compared with the standard microscopy, both the NOW Malaria test and the PCR-based assays were therefore poor at identifying mixed infections. The NOW Malaria test and the PCR-based assays clearly need to be improved, particularly for the correct identification of infections with Plasmodium spp. other than P. falciparum, including mixed infections. For now, expert microscopy must remain the mainstay of the laboratory diagnosis of malaria.[Evaluation of the Optimal-IT and ICT P.f./P.v. rapid dipstick tests for diagnosing malaria within primary healthcare in the municipality of Manaus, Amazonas].Malaria is routinely diagnosed using the thick blood smear test. However, this technique requires the training of microscopists and may be time-consuming. A concordance study was conducted on two dipstick tests (Optimal-IT and ICT P.f./P.v.) and the thick blood smear test, within primary healthcare in Manaus.Comparison of five methods of malaria detection in the outpatient setting.In eastern Africa where 90% of the malaria is due to Plasmodium falciparum, the accuracy of malaria diagnosis at the outpatient level is becoming increasingly important due to problems of drug resistance and use of alternative, costly antimalarial drugs. The quantitative buffy coat (QBC) technique, acridine orange staining with an interference filter system, and the ParaSight-F test have been introduced as alternative methods to conventional microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria. Two hundred thirteen outpatients were tested using these alternative methods and conventional microscopy by five experienced technologists; two were randomly allocated to read the results of each test. Paired results showed the highest level of agreement with the ParaSight-F test (99%), followed by Field stain (92%). The results of the QBC technique showed the least agreement (73%). Using conventional microscopy as the reference standard, the ParaSight-F test had a sensitivity range of 90-92% and a specificity of 99%, staining with acridine orange had a sensitivity range of 77-96% and a specificity range of 81-98% and the QBC technique had a sensitivity range of 88-98% and a specificity range of 58-90%. All microscopic tests showed lower sensitivities (as low as 20% using staining with acridine orange) in detecting low parasitemias (< or = 320/microl) than the ParaSight-F test (70%). Due to the high cost of the ParaSight-F test, Field-stained blood films remain the most appropriate method for diagnosis of P. falciparum in eastern Africa. The ParaSight-F test may be used in situations where no trained microscopists are available, or where malaria is strongly suspected and the results of microscopy are negative.Comparison of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based immunochromatographic antigen detection assay (OptiMAL) with microscopy for the detection of malaria parasites in human blood samples.Microscopic examination of blood smears remains the gold standard for malaria diagnosis, but is labor-intensive and requires skilled operators. Rapid dipstick technology provides a potential alternative. A study was conducted in The Gambia to compare the performance of OptiMAL, an immunochromatographic antigen detection assay for the diagnosis of malaria using parasite lactate dehydrogenase, against standard microscopy in patients with suspected malaria. For initial diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum, irrespective of stage, this assay had a sensitivity of 91.3%, a specificity of 92%, a positive predictive value of 87.2%, and a negative predictive value of 94.7%. The sensitivity of the test decreased markedly at parasitemias < 0.01%. This assay can be used for the diagnosis of malaria in areas where microscopy is not available and for urgent malaria diagnosis at night and at weekends, when routine laboratories are closed and when relatively inexperienced microscopists may be on duty.Evaluation of different methods for diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria.Rapid diagnosis is a prerequisite for institution of effective treatment and reducing the mortality and morbidity of falciparum malaria. This study was taken up to compare the efficacy of various rapid methods viz, acridine orange, Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen detection and Field's stain with traditional microscopy i.e, Leishman stain for diagnosing falciparum malaria. Thick and thin blood films of 443 consecutive patients with history of fever with chills and rigors were examined by Leishman and Field's method. Acridine orange stained wet mounts of blood were examined under fluorescence microscopy. All films were examined by two independent microbiologists. Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen was detected using commercially available kit, Paracheck Pf. Out of the 443 subjects examined for P.falciparum 18.28% were detected by Leishman stain, 6.32% by Field's stain, 18.28% by acridine orange and 18.1% by antigen based technique. Field's stain missed 53 (65.4%), while Paracheck Pf was negative in 6(7.4%) of the Leishman positive samples. All Field's stain and acridine orange positives were positive by Leishman, but five Paracheck Pf positives were negative. Leishman stain is cost effective but if facilities are available one should use acridine orange for screening. The antigen detection kits are rapid, simple and are useful but to rule out false negatives in clinically suspected cases, Leishman stain is reliable.[Can the thick drop/smear examination for malaria be replaced by a rapid diagnostic test in first intention? The Mayotte experience].Malaria is a public health problem in the French island of Mayotte (160,000 inhabitants) in the Indian Ocean. In the late 1990, resistance to chloroquine greatly increased, and so did the number of malaria cases, so that a new health policy had to be adopted. Since 2001, the initial smear/thick drop examination, the results of which took too long to obtain, has systematically been replaced by a rapid diagnosis test (Optimal IT Diamed) in all hospitals and public health centers.Epidemiological data of malaria on the island was collected and a prospective study was made from March 2005 to February 2006, on two sites (the emergency department of the main hospital and a rural health centre) on all patients presenting with malaria (104 and 139 cases respectively).The first Optimal IT test diagnosed the condition accurately in 88 and 96% of the cases, respectively. Every time symptoms would persist after negative test results and an Optimal IT test was repeated within three days, the parasitemia level was low (0.08 to 0.66%). Very low parasitemia level was very likely to account for a false negative (test result).These results concerning malaria (and its epidemiological data) in Mayotte show that the initial use of an Optimal IT test instead of the thin/thick blood smear results in a faster management of patients with malaria, although the Optimal IT test is slightly less sensitive and requires training/practice.Assessing the economic impact of a rapid on-site malaria diagnostic test.A set of three models has been developed for assessing the economic impact of existing and new malaria diagnostic technology, specifically microscopy of blood slides and rapid on-site diagnostic tests (RDT). The models allow for phased introduction of the new technology in targeted areas. The derived computer software program facilitates evaluation of costs to the supplier, to the consumer and aggregate costs, with comparison among the three models to give relative costs of progressive transition from blood slides to RDT technology. The models and the related software program can assist planners in the health sector in determining costs of current programs and assessing the potential economic impact of introducing rapid on-site diagnosis. Details of the models and the operational software program are available on request.Performance of malaria rapid diagnostic tests as part of routine malaria case management in Kenya.Data on malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) performance under routine program conditions are limited. We assessed the attributes of RDTs performed by study and health facility (HF) staffs as part of routine malaria case management of patients > or = 5 years of age in Kenya. Expert microscopy was used as our gold standard. A total of 1,827 patients were enrolled; 191 (11.6%) were parasitemic by expert microscopy. Sensitivity and specificity of RDTs performed by study staff were 86.6% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 79.8-93.5%) and 95.4% (95% CI: 93.9-96.9%), respectively. Among tests performed by HF staff, RDTs were 91.7% (95% CI: 80.8-100.0%) sensitive and 96.7% (95% CI: 92.8-100.0%) specific, whereas microscopy was 52.5% (95% CI: 33.2-71.9%) sensitive and 77.0% (95% CI: 67.9-86.2%) specific. Our findings suggest that RDTs perform better than microscopy under routine conditions. Further efforts are needed to maintain this high RDT performance over time.Comparison of the ParaSight-F test and the ICT Malaria Pf test with the polymerase chain reaction for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in travellers.Rapid and accurate methods are needed for the diagnosis of imported malaria. The ParaSight-F test and the ICT Malaria Pf test are commercially available kits marketed for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria. Both tests are antigen-capture assays based on the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 in peripheral blood. Using microscopy and a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based method as reference standards, we performed a 'blinded' comparison of these assays for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 200 febrile travellers returning from malaria-endemic areas. As determined by PCR and microscopy, 148 travellers had malaria and, of these patients, 54.7% (81/148) were infected with P. vivax only, 31.1% (46/148) with P. falciparum only, 9.5% (14/148) with P. ovale, 0.7% (1/148) with P. malariae, and 4.1% (6/148) had mixed infections. Compared to PCR, the ParaSight-F and ICT Malaria Pf tests had initial sensitivities of 94% and 90% and specificities of 95% and 97%, respectively, for the detection of P. falciparum malaria. When discrepant samples were retested with day 0 and day 1 bloods, the sensitivities improved to 96% and 94%, respectively. The 2 remaining false negative results with the Para-Sight-F test and 2 of the 3 false negative results with the ICT Malaria Pf test occurred in samples with < 100 parasites/microL. The performance of these kits was not significantly different (P = 0.75) and both are simple, rapid, and accurate tests for the detection of P. falciparum infection in the returned traveller.Paracheck Pf compared with microscopy for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria among children in Tanga City, north-eastern Tanzania.Malaria is a major public health problem particularly in rural Sub-Saharan Africa. In most urban areas, malaria transmission intensity is low thus monitoring trends using reliable tools is crucial to provide vital information for future management of the disease. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) such as Paracheck Pf are now increasingly adopted for Plasmodium falciparum malaria diagnosis and are advantageous and cost effective alternative to microscopy. This cross sectional survey was carried out during June 2005 to determine the prevalence of malaria in an urban setting and compare microscopy diagnosis versus Paracheck Pf for detecting Plasmodium falciparum. Blood samples from a total of 301 children (< 10 years) attending outpatient clinic at Makorora Health Centre, in Tanga, Tanzania were examined for the presence of malaria. Twenty-nine (9.6%) of the children were positive to malaria by microscopy while 30 (10.0%) were positive by Paracheck test. Three out of 30 positive cases detected by Paracheck were negative by microscopy; thus considered to be false positive results. For the 271 Paracheck Pf negative cases, 2 were positive by microscopy; yielding 2 false negative results. Paracheck Pf sensitivity and specificity were 93.1% and 98.9%, respectively. P. falciparum was the only malarial species observed among the 29 microscopy positive cases. The prevalence of anaemia among the children was 53.16%. These findings indicate a low prevalence of malaria in Tanga City and that Paracheck Pf can be an effective tool for malaria diagnosis.Following the course of malaria treatment by detecting parasite lactate dehydrogenase enzyme.Operational trial of ParaSight-F (dipstick) in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria at the primary health care level.The rapid manual ParaSight-F test of Plasmodium falciparum malaria, an antigen capture test for detecting trophozoite-derived histidine rich protein-2 (PF HRP-2), is simple to perform and provides a definite diagnosis within 10 minutes. During an operational trial at health centers and mobile malaria units where microscopical diagnosis is not available and using defined symptom screening criteria, 3,361 subjects were tested yielding 618 positives (18.4%) for PF-HRP-2 by ParaSight-F. Microscopic examination of the same subjects by thick blood film examined 7 days later at a malaria clinic showed 578 falciparum, and 349 vivax and mixed infection (F+V) 41. The technology proved highly effective in detecting falciparum malaria at the peripheral levels where access to malaria laboratory services are difficult, thus allowing immediate administration of a complete course of treatment in the absence of a microscopic examination.Evaluation of a rapid dipstick test, Malar-Check, for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Brazil.The present study was carried out to evaluate the Malar-Check trade mark Pf test, an immunochromatographic assay that detects Plasmodium falciparum Histidine Rich Protein II, does not require equipment, and is easy and rapid to perform. In dilution assays performed to test sensitivity against known parasite density, Malar-Check were compared with thick blood smear (TBS), the gold standard for diagnosis. Palo Alto isolate or P. falciparum blood from patients with different parasitemias was used. The average cut-off points for each technique in three independent experiments were 12 and 71 parasites/mm3 (TBS and Malar-Check, respectively). In the field assays, samples were collected from patients with fever who visited endemic regions. Compared to TBS, Malar-Check yielded true-positive results in 38 patients, false-positive results in 3, true-negative results in 23, and false-negative result in 1. Malar-Check performed with samples from falciparum-infected patients after treatment showed persistence of antigen up to 30 days. Malar-Check should aid the diagnosis of P. falciparum in remote areas and improve routine diagnosis even when microscopy is available. Previous P. falciparum infection, which can determine a false-positive test in cured individuals, should be considered. The prompt results obtained with the Malar-Check for early diagnosis could avoid disease evolution to severe cases.Comparison of clinical, microscopic and rapid diagnostic test methods in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Enugu, Nigeria.To compare the use of clinical, microscopic and immunochromato-graphic methods in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Children with history of fever were consecutively recruited. Information on personal characteristics, and clinical features were obtained with the parental consent before enrolment. Malaria parasite density was done with quantitative microscopy, as well as specie identification in both local and reference laboratories. Rapid diagnostic test (RDT) kits were also used for parasite detection.Eighty three children had clinical diagnosis of malaria, while the remaining 6 had other diagnoses. On microscopy 89 and 26 patients had parasitaemia by the local and reference laboratories respectively. With the RDT, 15 patients had parasitaemia with corresponding minimum densities of 1200 and 716 parasites per ul from the local and reference laboratories. The sensitivity and specificity of the RDT to the reference laboratory were 42.31% and 93.65% respectively, while concordance was 57.69% for RDT, 30.49% for clinical diagnosis (all symptoms), 43.75% for clinical diagnosis (fever alone), and 29.21% for local laboratory.There was a significant deficiency in malaria diagnosis using any of the methods alone. For reliable diagnosis of malaria a combination of the methods of diagnosis is recommended. Degradation of the RDTs might have contributed to its low sensitivity. Training and better quality assurance should be established for the medical and laboratory workers in order to improve malaria diagnosis.False-positive rapid tests for malaria in patients with rheumatoid factor.Comparison of optimal malarial test with light microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria.To evaluate the efficacy of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based immunochromatographic antigen detection assay (optimal) against conventional light microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria at Military Hospital, Rawalpindi and Department of Pathology Army Medical College Rawalpindi from August to October 2002 in patients reporting sick with history suggestive of malaria.The blood samples were collected from 215 patients reporting with symptoms suggestive of malaria. Thick and thin blood films were prepared, stained with Leishman's stain and examined by light microscopy for the presence of malarial parasites. Parasitaemia was estimated on all positive slides. All samples were tested for presence of malarial parasite by optimal dipstick method according to the manufacturer's instructions.A total of 215 cases were studied. Malarial parasites were visualized in 98 (45.5%) cases with light microscopy. Optimal test revealed 93 (43.2%) of these samples as positive. Microscopy showed 61 out of 98 positive cases to be P. vivax and 37 P. falciparum. The Optimal dipstick method revealed that 58 out of 93 were positive for P. vivax and 35 positive for P. falciparum. These results demonstrated that Optimal had sensitivities of 95% and 94.5% for P. vivax and P. falciparum respectively. It has 100% specificity for both malarial species, when compared to conventional microscopy.Optimal test showed excellent correlation with microscopy in the diagnosis of P. vivax and P. falciparum. It is expensive but it has an advantage of being simple, rapid and effective test in the diagnosis of malaria especially where well trained microscopists are not available or work load is too high.The Para Check-PC Test:--a simple rapid Dip stick test to detect Plasmodium falciparum infection.Evaluation of a rapid and inexpensive dipstick assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Rapid, accurate and affordable methods are needed for the diagnosis of malaria. Reported here is an evaluation of a new immunochromatographic strip, the PATH Falciparum Malaria IC Strip, which is impregnated with an immobilized IgM monoclonal antibody that binds to the HRP-II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. In contrast to other commercially available kits marketed for the rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria, this kit should be affordable in the malaria-endemic world. Using microscopy and polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based methods as reference standards, we compared two versions of the PATH test for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 200 febrile travellers. As determined by PCR and microscopy, 148 travellers had malaria, 50 of whom (33.8%) were infected with P. falciparum. Compared with PCR, the two versions of the PATH test had initial sensitivities of 90% and 88% and specificities of 97% and 96%, respectively, for the detection of falciparum malaria. When discrepant samples were retested blindly with a modified procedure (increased sample volume and longer washing step) the sensitivity and specificity of both kits improved to 96% and 99%, respectively. The two remaining false negatives occurred in samples with < 100 parasites per microliter of blood. The accuracy, simplicity and predicted low cost may make this test a useful diagnostic tool in malaria-endemic areas.Performance of the OptiMAL dipstick test for management of severe and complicated malaria cases in a tertiary hospital, central India.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria by village health workers using the rapid manual ParaSight-F test.Malaria diagnosis by dipstick assay in a Honduran population with coendemic Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax.A Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase dipstick designed to separately detect P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria was evaluated in two Honduran populations where both species are endemic. The dipstick was compared to thick film microscopy; the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) was used to analyze discordant results. The dipstick had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 95% compared with microscopy in the diagnosis of Plasmodium infections in a hospital population; the mean parasite density was approximately 590/mm3. In a field sample of mostly asymptomatic volunteers, the sensitivity of the dipstick for Plasmodium infection varied with parasite density. Additionally, the sensitivity and specificity of the dipstick was similar to thick film microscopy in the diagnosis of vivax malaria compared with the PCR. The dipstick was unable to detect P. vivax in the presence of P. falciparum because of cross-reactivity in the pan-specific band. Accurate species identification in mixed infections remains a problem in malaria diagnosis.Paracheck-Pf accuracy and recently treated Plasmodium falciparum infections: is there a risk of over-diagnosis?An assessment of the accuracy of Paracheck Pf, a malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) detecting histidine rich protein 2 was undertaken amongst children aged 6-59 months in eastern Democratic Republic of Congo.This RDT assessment occurred in conjunction with an ACT efficacy trial. Febrile children were simultaneously screened with both RDT and high quality microscopy and those meeting inclusion criteria were followed for 35 days.358 febrile children were screened with 180 children recruited for five weeks follow-up. On screening, the RDT accurately diagnosed all 235 true malaria cases, indicating 100% RDT sensitivity. Of the 123 negative slides, the RDT gave 59 false-positive results, indicating 52.0% (64/123) RDT specificity. During follow-up after treatment with an artemisinin-based combination therapy, 98.2% (110/112), 94.6% (106/112), 92.0% (103/112) and 73.5% (50/68) of effectively treated children were still false-positive by RDT at days 14, 21, 28 and 35, respectively.Results show that though the use of Paracheck-Pf is as sensitive as microscopy in detecting true malaria cases, a low specificity did present a high frequency of false-positive RDT results. What's more, a duration of RDT false-positivity was found that significantly surpassed the 'fortnight' after effective treatment reported by its manufacturer. Though further research is needed in assessing RDT accuracy, study results showing the presence of frequent false positivity should be taken into consideration to avoid clinicians inappropriately focusing on malaria, not identifying the true cause of illness, and providing unnecessary treatment.Evaluation of alternative diagnostic techniques for diagnosis of cerebral malaria in a tertiary referral hospital in Bangladesh.Five alternative techniques for diagnosis of malaria were evaluated in 124 clinically diagnosed cerebral malaria cases admitted in a tertiary hospital in Bangladesh. Clinical diagnosis of cerebral malaria was done by WHO criteria. The tests were conventional routine malaria microscopy; prolonged microscopy; dipstick antigen capture assay (Para Sight TM-F test); pigments in peripheral leucocytes and routine microscopy repeated at 12 hours interval. First four tests were done at 0 hours of hospital admission and repeat routine microscopy was added at 12 hours interval. Diagnostic capability of the test was 64%, 65%, 69%, 27% and 63% respectively. None of the tests except pigments in peripheral leucocytes was superior at initial evaluation. Only the dipstick test added 5% more diagnostic possibility compared with routine microscopy as standard. Stratification of diagnostic capability in different ways improved diagnosis 15% and 11% in smear negative cases by dipstick and prolonged microscopy respectively. It was increased by 50% (5/10 patients) with dipstick test in the smear negative patients with history of anti-malarials prior to hospital admission.Rapid diagnosis of malaria--a new approach.Evaluation of the Makromed dipstick assay versus PCR for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in returned travelers.Microscopy has been the traditional reference standard for malaria diagnosis. However, difficulty in maintaining the required technical skills, particularly in areas where malaria is not endemic, has prompted the development of rapid nonmicroscopic diagnostic assays based on the detection of malaria parasite antigen in whole blood. In this study, we evaluated the performance of one such device, the Makromed dipstick test, blindly compared to PCR and microscopy for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in 200 febrile returned travelers. The Makromed assay detects the presence of P. falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein II with an antigen capture immunochromatographic strip format. Compared to PCR as the reference standard, the dipstick assay had a sensitivity of 97.0% and a specificity of 96.0%. The positive and negative predictive values were 81.2% and 99.5%, respectively. Rapid malaria diagnostic devices may provide a useful diagnostic adjunct in a clinical setting.Detection of Plasmodium ovale by the ICT malaria P.f/P.v. immunochromatographic test.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic card test for Plasmodium falciparum in Ibadan, Nigeria.This short report describes the results of a rapid, simple and cost effective immunodiagnostic test for malaria in Ibadan, Nigeria. A total of 77% patients presenting at the children outpatient clinic, University College Hospital with malaria symptoms were screened for malaria parasites by microscopy using Giemsa stain and by the immunochromatographic card test. The immunodiagnostic test had a sensitivity of 93.1% and a specificity of 95.8%, making a good alternative for malaria diagnosis especially in rural areas without electricity, where microscopy is not possible, and a decision is to be made on when to start treatment.Detection of P. vivax antigens in malaria endemic populations of Nepal by ELISA using monoclonal antibodies raised against Thai isolates.An indirect enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using monoclonal antibody (MAb) originated from the native Thai isolates of P. vivax (McPV1) and the polyclonal antibody (PAb) raised against Nepali isolates of P. vivax was developed for detection of P vivax antigens in red cell lysates. The assay was specific (100%) since it was positive only with P. vivax-infected erythrocytes and was negative when erythrocytes from 40 healthy individuals from malaria non-endemic areas and 40 P. falciparum infected erythrocytes were tested. When the assay was applied to 203 vivax blood samples already proven by microscopic examination collected from Dhanusha district of Nepal, and using the cut-off level of the mean optical density (OD) (0.144) of 40 healthy individuals who had been living in malaria-endemic areas (0.073) + 2 SD (0.016), the assay could detect 189/203 samples, indicating the sensitivity of the test was 93.1% with a detection limit of erythrocytes of 240 parasites/10(6) erythrocytes. In addition, the assay was negative when 40 blood samples with fever of unknown origin, collected from the same malaria-endemic areas, were tested. However, there was a significant correlation between OD values and parasitemia (r=0.649; p=0.018). The results indicate that MAb-PAb indirect ELISA using MAb raised against Thai isolates of P. vivax as the coating antibodies, and polyclonal antibodies raised against local Nepali isolates as the detecting antibody, could detect P. vivax antigens with high degrees of sensitivity and specificity. Furthermore, it seems that the McPV1 MAb raised against Thai isolates of P. vivax could recognize the antigens of Nepali isolates in a wide range of blood samples.Determining cost-effectiveness and cost component of three malaria diagnostic models being used in remote non-microscope areas.This cross-sectional experimental study developed a methodology to analyze the cost-effectiveness of three malaria diagnostic models: microscopy; on-site OptiMAL; and on-site Immunochromatographic Test (on-site ICT), used in remote non-microscope areas in Thailand, from both a public provider and patient perspective. The study covered six areas in two highly malaria-endemic areas of provinces located along the Thai-Myanmar border. The study was conducted between April and October 2000, by purposively recruiting 436 malaria suspected cases attending mobile malaria clinics. Each patient was randomly selected to receive service via the three diagnostic models; their accuracy was 95.17%, 94.48% and 89.04%, respectively. In addition, their true positive rates for all malaria species were 76.19%, 82.61% and 73.83%; for falciparum malaria 85.71%, 80.95% and 80.00%, and for vivax malaria 57.14%, 100% and 50%, respectively, with the parasitemia ranging from 80 to 58,240 microl of blood. Consequently, their costs were determined by dividing into provider and consumer costs, which were consequently classified into internal and external costs. The internal costs were the costs of the public providers, whereas the external costs were those incurred by the patients. The aggregate costs of these three models were 58,500.35, 36,685.91, and 40,714.01 Baht, respectively, or 339.53, 234.39, and 243.93, in terms of unit costs per actual case. In the case of microscopy, if all suspected malaria cases incurred forgone opportunity costs of waiting for treatment, the aggregate cost and unit cost per actual case were up to 188,110.89 and 944.03 Baht, respectively. Accordingly, the cost-effectiveness for all malaria species, using their true positive rates as the effectiveness indicator, was 446.75, 282.40, and 343.56 respectively, whereas for falciparum malaria it was 394.80, 289.37 and 304.91, and for vivax malaria 595.67, 234.39 and 487.86, respectively. This study revealed that the on-site OptiMAL was the most cost-effective. It could be used to supplement or even replace microscopy for this criteria in general. This study would be of benefit to malaria control program policy makers to consider using RDT technology to supplement microscopy in remote non-microscope areas.Diagnostic performance characteristics of rapid dipstick test for Plasmodium vivax malaria.We compared the diagnostic performance characteristics of newly developed method, the rapid dipstick test, which provides colorimetric determination by developing antibody to the lactate dehydrogenase enzyme of parasites, with conventional standard thick-blood film examination. For the rapid test, OptiMAL commercial kits were used. The results were also evaluated with clinical findings from patients. The parasites were determined by microscopic examination of thick-blood films from 81 patients with vivax malaria from southeastern Anatolia, Turkey. The OptiMAL test results were found to be negative in five patients who were diagnosed clinically and through thick-film testing as having vivax malaria. There was no false positivity observed with the OptiMAL test. We concluded that this rapid malaria test has a lower level of sensitivity than the classical thick-blood-film test for malaria, but that these methods have equal specificity.Co-reactivity of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 and aldolase on a combined immuno-chromographic-malaria dipstick (ICT) as a potential semi-quantitative marker of high Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia.The combined immuno-chromographic-malaria dipstick (ICT) for the rapid diagnosis of malaria detects both Plasmodium falciparum (P.f.)-specific, histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and a plasmodial aldolase expressed by all Plasmodium species pathogenic to humans. ICT was applied in 674 febrile returnees from malaria-endemic regions attending our Tropical Diseases Unit. Microscopy confirmed malaria in 69/674 cases, of whom 67/69 had returned from Africa or Madagascar, and 2/69 from the Caribbean. Monoparasitic P.f. infection occurred in 52/69, mixed infection was due to P.f.+ P. ovale (P.o.) in 3/69, and P.f.+P. malariae (P.m.) in 1/69 cases. Monoparasitic P. vivax (P.v.) infection occurred in 8/69 , P.o. in 3/69, and P.m. in 2/69 cases . Whereas a positive HRP-2 band on the test was a highly sensitive indicator for P.f. infection (52/52 patients; sensitivity 100%), this was not the case for a positive aldolase band (25/52 patients; sensitivity 48.1%). Sensitivity of aldolase band for non-falciparum plasmodia was even lower: aldolase was positive in only 3/8 (37.5%) of patients with vivax malaria, and in 0/5 cases with P.o.- or P.m. infection. Co-reaction of both bands occurred more frequently in patients with P.f. parasitaemia of > or =40,000/microl (20/25, 80.0%) as compared to patients with P.f. parasitaemia <40,000/microl (5/27, 18.5%; P<0.00005), and to patients with mixed infection (P.f.+ P.o., P.f.+ P.m.: 2/4, 50.0%; diff. n.s.). In our series, co-reaction of HRP-2 and aldolase indicated monoparasitic falciparum malaria with high P.f. parasitaemia, rather than mixed infection. Whereas the aldolase band is not a reliable qualitative marker for malaria, co-reaction of HRP-2 and aldolase band may have a potential for indicating high parasitaemia in falciparum malaria.Comparative performance of the ParaSight F test for detection of Plasmodium falciparum in malaria-immune and nonimmune populations in Irian Jaya, Indonesia.A comparison was made of the performance of the ParaSight F test (F test) for detection of Plasmodium falciparum in blood from malaria-immune (410 native Irianese) and nonimmune (369 new transmigrants) populations in Irian Jaya, Indonesia, where malaria is hyperendemic and all four species of human malaria occur. There were highly significant differences between populations in the sensitivity (Irianese, 60% versus transmigrants, 84%; P < 0.001) and specificity (Irianese, 97% versus transmigrants, 84%; P < 0.001) of the F test. The test had comparably high levels of sensitivity for Irianese children aged < or = 10 years, both age groups of transmigrants (76-85%), but low sensitivity for Irianese aged > 10 years (40%), among whom only 7% of parasitaemias < 120 per microliter and 69% of those > 120 per microliter were detected. Specificity was comparably high for transmigrant children aged < or = 10 years and both age groups of Irianese (93-98%). The low specificity for transmigrants aged > 10 years (79%) was due to a preponderance of false positives, frequently identified by microscopy as P. vivax. The results suggest that comparison based on microscopy underestimated the performance of the ParaSight F test and that malaria immune status, irrespective of P. falciparum density, may influence the test's sensitivity.The ParaSight F test uses a nonmicroscopic dipstick approach to the rapid detection of Plasmodium falciparum in blood. The performance of this test was assessed in serum samples collected in Irian Jaya, Indonesia, from 410 native Irianese (malaria-immune) and 369 new transmigrants (nonimmune). Of particular interest was the capability of the F test to detect P. falciparum prevalence among children, whose immunity is less than that of adults. There were highly significant differences by population in the F test's sensitivity (60% for Irianese vs. 84% for transmigrants) and specificity (97% for Irianese vs. 84% for transmigrants). The test had high sensitivity levels (76-85%) for Irianese children 10 years of age and under and both child and adult transmigrants, but low sensitivity (40%) for Irianese over 10 years of age. Specificity was comparably high (93-98%) for transmigrant children and both age groups of Irianese. The low specificity (79%) for transmigrants over 10 years of age reflected a preponderance of false positives, frequently identified by microscopy as P. vivax. These findings suggest that microscopy comparisons underestimate the performance of the ParaSight F test and that malaria immune status, regardless of P. falciparum density, may influence the test's sensitivity.ParaSight-F rapid manual diagnostic test of Plasmodium falciparum infection.The ParaSight(R)-F test is a qualitative diagnostic test of Plasmodium falciparum, which is based on the detection by a monoclonal antibody of a species-specific soluble antigen (histidine-rich protein (HRP-II)) in whole blood and which can be performed without special equipment. A visual reading is given by a polyclonal antibody coupled with dye-loaded liposomes; when positive, a pink line appears. The test has been compared with microscopic examination of thin blood smears and with Quantitative Buffy Coat malaria test (QBC(R) in a single-blind study. A total of 358 patients who had returned to France from malarial areas and consulted their doctor with symptoms or for a routine examination were enrolled in the study; 33 of them were found to have a falciparum malaria infection by the diagnostic test. On the day of consultation, the specificity of the ParaSight(R)-F test was 99% and its sensitivity 94%. The follow-up of infected patients after treatment showed that the test became negative later than the other reference tests. There was no correlation between antigen persistence and the intensity of the ParaSight(R)-F signal or circulating parasitaemia. No cross-reaction was noted for seven malaria cases due to other Plasmodium species. The test was performed quickly (10 tests in 20 minutes), was easy to read, and required minimal space. For cases of imported malaria, the test's specificity and low threshold for detection could make it a valuable adjunct test. However, in its present form, it cannot replace microscopic techniques which are species-specific and quantitative. In endemic areas, the test seems to be very promising by its results and ease of use according to published field studies.Comparative diagnostic performance of two commercial rapid tests for malaria in a non-endemic area.In the study reported here, the diagnostic performance of two new rapid tests for the diagnosis of malaria was evaluated in symptomatic patients in a non-endemic area. Of 557 consecutive patients, 109 (19.6%) had documented malaria. For the NOW ICT MALARIA P.f./P.v. (Binax, Portland, ME, USA) and OptiMAL IT (Diamed, Cressier, Switzerland) tests, respectively, sensitivity values were 96.3% and 79.8% (P-value, 0.0001), and specificity values were 98.8% and 98.4%. The NOW ICT test did not detect two of 80 Plasmodium falciparum infections, and it generated false-positive results for five patients. The OptiMAL IT test failed to detect ten of the P. falciparum infections, and it generated seven false-positive results. The results suggest that these rapid diagnostic tests for malaria may be useful, but they cannot replace microscopic examination of blood films.[Tests for rapid diagnosis of malaria].Evaluation of OptiMAL, a dipstick test for the diagnosis of malaria.The ICT Malaria Pf: a simple, rapid dipstick test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria at the Thai-Myanmar border.The ICT Malaria Pf test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection was evaluated in the diagnosis of 305 patients with fever who were admitted to a hospital located on the Thai-Myanmar border. All patients were admitted for at least one week to exclude reinfection. The test was performed using admission blood samples collected into ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of the test were 92.7%, 95.1% and 94.7% respectively, compared to standard microscopic diagnosis. The ICT Malaria Pf test is an accurate method for the diagnosis of P. falciparum infection. Its simplicity and rapidity make it particularly appropriate for use in remote areas where microscopic examination of blood films is unavailable.Persistent histidine-rich protein 2, parasite lactate dehydrogenase, and panmalarial antigen reactivity after clearance of Plasmodium falciparum monoinfection.We tested 240 patients with Plasmodium falciparum monoinfection for persistent parasite antigenemia after successful standardized antimalarial therapy by using the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL-IT assays that detect the malaria antigens Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) and parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), respectively, as well as a panmalarial antigen (PMA). The patients were screened for antigenemia on days 0, 3, 7, and 14 of follow-up. On day 0, all 240 patients showed positive reactivity with both assays. Of the 229 cases with negative parasitemia on day 3, persistent antigenemia was observed in 207 (90.4%) of the cases: 188 (82.1%) for HRP2 antigen and 75 (32.8%) for PMA. There was a gradual decrease in antigenemia on follow-up to day 14; however, the drop in reactivity to PMA was less than that for HRP2 antigen. In contrast to HRP2 antigenemia, there was a significant decrease in pLDH antigenemia to 38.4% and to 14.8% (PMA) on day 3 (P < 0.03). The pLDH antigenemia level dropped further to 14.8% on day 7. There was no significant association of persistent antigenemia with gametocytemia. One case with gametocytemia was negative for both the antigens. In conclusion, the OptiMAL-IT assay is more sensitive than the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test for monitoring therapeutic responses after antimalarial therapy since the LDH activity ceases when the malarial parasite dies.MalaQuick versus ParaSight F as a diagnostic aid in travellers' malaria.In this study we assessed whether travellers can perform malaria rapid tests, following the provided information leaflet, and correctly interpret performed and pre-prepared test strips. Two Plasmodium falciparum testing systems, namely MalaQuick (ICT) and ParaSight F were used. Test performance and test interpretation of pre-prepared tests were compared. There was no significant difference in test performance between the 2 tests. Interpretation of prepared test strips in both test systems was very reliable in blood parasite densities between 0.1% and 2%, but major problems were encountered at low parasitaemia (< 0.1% blood parasites) and also in ParaSight F test strips showing high parasitaemia (> 2% blood parasites). Low parasitaemia ParaSight F test strips were correctly interpreted by 52.1% compared with 10.8% correct interpretations with MalaQuick (P < 0.0001). Correct interpretation of highly positive (> 2% blood parasites) pre-prepared test strips was higher with MalaQuick (96.8%) than with ParaSight F (33.8%), P < 0.0001. Both tests were associated with high levels of false-negative interpretations which render them unsuitable as self-diagnostic kits. Efforts must be made to assist lay individuals in test performance by technical test improvement, by equiping the test strips with an additional reading aid for interpretation, and by providing instruction by a skilled person.Diagnostic performance of two antigen capture tests for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Zimbabwe.The objective was to compare the diagnostic performance of two antigen capture tests, ParaSight-F test and Immunochromatographic test (ICT), for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.A comparative study.Burma Valley, Mutare District, Manicaland in Zimbabwe.Patients attending the local clinic with clinical signs and symptoms associated with malaria infection. A blood film was collected from the patient and at the same time blood for the ParaSight-F test and the ICT was collected too. A total of 123 patients were diagnosed using the ICT test, the ParaSight-F test and microscopy which was used as a "gold" standard.True positives and negatives, false positives and negatives with reference to microscopy.The results indicate that ICT had a higher sensitivity (100%) than the ParaSight-F test (93.94%) but showing a lower specificity. The specificity for ICT (75%) is lower than the ParaSight-F test (81.2%) because of the presence of circulating P. falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) in blood even after two weeks post treatment. Two slides that were negative for ParaSight-F tests showed positive on microscopy. However, 21 and 12 slides which were negative on microscopy, showed positive with ICT and ParaSight-F respectively. The fact that ICT detects very low quantities of PfHRP-2 puts it at a comparative advantage because it detects positives even at very low parasite rates.The availability of these two antigen capture tests, which are easy to perform, will reduce the number of severe cases by providing early diagnosis. The tests will also reduce the number of unnecessary treatments and irrational use of antimalarials.[Interpreteation of immunochromatographic tests with HRP-2 antigen in children under 5 years in an area of high risk of malaria transmission in Papua New Guinea].The immunochromatographic tests with HRP-2 antigen (histidine-rich protein) Vision Biotech Pf Rapid Malaria Test was performed in 291 children under 5 years presenting fever or history of fever (malaria presumptive cases) admitted to Children Out-Patient Department of the Modilon Hospital in Madang, in a high malaria risk area of Papua New Guinea. The results of the tests were compared to the results of the parasitic examination of the peripheral blood with light microscopy (thick and thin smears). The HRP-2 test showed very high sensitivity (95.4%) and specificity (94.1%) for Plasmodiumfalciparum parasitaemia and none or very low sensitivity and specificity for other malaria species. The HRP-2 test detected both asexual and sexual stages of the Plasmodium falciparum parasites. The test did not show significant changes in detection of different levels of parasitaemia. These findings enable to conclude that the HRP-2 immunochromatographic assay can be very helpful to diagnose Plasmodium falciparum malaria when microscopy examination is not available, but as qualitative tests can be difficult for interpretation especially in high malaria risk areas. Therefore it can require re-examination of blood with microscopy to confirm species and development stages of Plasmodium spp. and to assess parasite load.Test characteristics of the SD FK80 Plasmodium falciparum/Plasmodium vivax malaria rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.The SD FK80 P.f/P.v Malaria Antigen Rapid Test (Standard Diagnostics, Korea) (FK80) is a three-band malaria rapid diagnostic test detecting Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2) and Plasmodium vivax-specific lactate dehydrogenase (Pv-pLDH). The present study assessed its performance in a non-endemic setting.Stored blood samples (n = 416) from international travellers suspected of malaria were used, with microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Samples infected by Plasmodium falciparum (n = 178), Plasmodium vivax (n = 99), Plasmodium ovale (n = 75) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 24) were included, as well as 40 malaria negative samples.Overall sensitivities for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax were 91.6% (95% confidence interval (CI): 86.2% - 95.0%) and 75.8% (65.9% - 83.6%). For P. falciparum, sensitivity at parasite densities >or= 100/microl was 94.6% (88.8% - 97.6%); for P. vivax, sensitivity at parasite densities >or= 500/microl was 86.8% (75.4% - 93.4%). Four P. falciparum samples showed a Pv-pLDH line, three of them had parasite densities exceeding 50.000/microl. Two P. vivax samples, one P. ovale and one P. malariae sample showed a HRP-2 line. For the HRP-2 and Pv-pLDH lines, respectively 81.4% (136/167) and 55.8% (43/77) of the true positive results were read as medium or strong line intensities. The FK80 showed good reproducibility and reliability for test results and line intensities (kappa values for both exceeding 0.80).The FK80 test performed satisfactorily in diagnosing P. falciparum and P. vivax infections in a non-endemic setting.Limited level of accuracy provided by available rapid diagnosis tests for malaria enhances the need for PCR-based reference laboratories.The rise of imported malaria cases and the high fatality rate in Europe make the search for new and easy diagnostic methods necessary. Rapid diagnosis tests (RDTs) are, in part, developed to cover the lack of diagnosis experience. Unfortunately, our data suggest that the accuracy of RDTs is insufficient and could increase the number of incorrect malaria diagnoses.Performance appraisal of rapid on-site malaria diagnosis (ICT malaria Pf/Pv test) in relation to human resources at village level in Myanmar.Logistic, economic and technical factors limit rapid access to microscopic confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of malaria in many rural areas in endemic countries such as Myanmar. A study was conducted to evaluate a rapid on-site immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf/Pv) for detection of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in two villages in the Taikkyi region of Myanmar. The ICT Malaria tests were performed by a volunteer health worker (VHW) in Yae-Aye-San village and by a professionally trained midwife (MW) in Kankone village. A total of 1000 symptomatic patients participated in the study by providing blood samples for an ICT test and for microscopy. The ICT performance indices, relative to microscopy, were better for the trained MW compared with the less experienced VHW. For P. falciparum and/or P. vivax infections, the sensitivities were 82.7% for the VHW compared with 93.7% for the MW. For P. falciparum infections, the sensitivities were 82.2% for the VHW and 91.3% for the MW, while the corresponding values for P. vivax infections were 66.7 and 79%, respectively. Although the test kit appeared to perform better in more experienced hands, this study questions whether this difference is related to the use of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit, or related to other factors such as differences in the quality of blood slides prepared by the VHW and MW for microscopic examination. Overall, the results suggest that a rapid diagnostic assay such as the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit can be used in rural settings by relatively inexperienced persons, such as VHWs, with a reasonable degree of sensitivity, thus providing on-site confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of malaria.Rapid diagnostic devices for malaria: field evaluation of a new prototype immunochromatographic assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum Plasmodium.The NOW ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. for Whole Blood (Binax, Inc., Portland, ME) is a new malaria rapid diagnostic device that represents a technical advance over previous assays, such as ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. and ICT Malaria P.f.. We evaluated this device in March 2001 in symptomatic patients at malaria clinics in Maesod, Thailand. Microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood smears was the reference standard. In 246 patients, microscopy showed 32 (13.0%) infected with Plasmodium falciparum, 63 (25.6%) with P. vivax, 6 (2.4%) with mixed infections of P. falciparum and P. vivax, 5 (2.0%) with P. malariae, and 140 (56.9%) negative. Sensitivity for P. falciparum was 100% and specificity was 96.2% (200 of 208; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 92-98). For P. vivax, sensitivity was 87.3% (55 of 63; 95% CI = 77-93) and specificity was 97.7% (173 of 177; 95% CI = 95-99), but all the four false-positive results were microscopically positive for P. malariae; thus, specificity for non-falciparum Plasmodium was 100%. These results suggest improved performance over NOW ICT predecessors.Diagnosis of malaria: a review of alternatives to conventional microscopy.Malaria causes significant morbidity and mortality worldwide, including countries with mainly imported malaria. In developing nations, scarce resources lead to inadequate diagnostic procedures. In affluent countries, poor familiarity with malaria may cause clinical and laboratory misdiagnosis. Microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick and thin films remains the current standard for diagnosis. Although it has good sensitivity and allows species identification and parasite counts, it is time consuming, requires microscopical expertise and maintenance of equipment. Microscopy with fluorescent stains (QBC), dipstick antigen detection of HRP2 and pLDH (Parasight-F, ICT Malaria Pf, OptiMAL), polymerase chain reaction assays and some automated blood cell analysers offer new approaches and are reviewed here, with emphasis on clinical relevance and their potential to complement conventional microscopy, especially in countries with imported malaria.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria parasites.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge to laboratories in most countries. Endemic malaria, population movements, and travelers all contribute to presenting the laboratory with diagnostic problems for which it may have little expertise available. Drug resistance and genetic variation has altered many accepted morphological appearances of malaria species, and new technology has given an opportunity to review available procedures. Concurrently the World Health Organization has opened a dialogue with scientists, clinicians, and manufacturers on the realistic possibilities for developing accurate, sensitive, and cost-effective rapid diagnostic tests for malaria, capable of detecting 100 parasites/microl from all species and with a semiquantitative measurement for monitoring successful drug treatment. New technology has to be compared with an accepted "gold standard" that makes comparisons of sensitivity and specificity between different methods. The majority of malaria is found in countries where cost-effectiveness is an important factor and ease of performance and training is a major consideration. Most new technology for malaria diagnosis incorporates immunochromatographic capture procedures, with conjugated monoclonal antibodies providing the indicator of infection. Preferred targeted antigens are those which are abundant in all asexual and sexual stages of the parasite and are currently centered on detection of HRP-2 from Plasmodium falciparum and parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase or Plasmodium aldolase from the parasite glycolytic pathway found in all species. Clinical studies allow effective comparisons between different formats, and the reality of nonmicroscopic diagnoses of malaria is considered.Field and laboratory comparative evaluation of ten rapid malaria diagnostic tests.The paper reports on a comparative evaluation of 10 rapid malaria tests available in South Africa in 1998: AccuCheck (AC, developmental), Cape Biotech (CB), ICT Malaria Pf (ICT1) and Pf/Pv (ICT2), Kat Medical (KAT), MakroMal (MM), OptiMAL (OP), ParaSight-F (PS), Quorum (Q), Determine-Malaria (DM). In a laboratory study, designed to test absolute detection limits, Plasmodium falciparum-infected blood was diluted with uninfected blood to known parasite concentrations ranging from 500 to 0.1 parasites per microlitre (P/microL). The 50% detection limits were: ICT1, 3.28; ICT2, 4.86; KAT, 6.36; MM, 9.37; CB, 11.42; DM, 12.40; Q, 16.98; PS, 20; AC, 31.15 and OP, 91.16 P/microL. A field study was carried out to test post-treatment specificity. Blood samples from malaria patients were tested with all products (except AC and DM) on the day of treatment and 3 and 7 days thereafter, against a gold standard of microscopy and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). OP and PS produced fewer false-positive results on day 7 (18 and 19%, respectively) than the other rapid tests (38-56%). However, microscopy, PCR, OP and PS disagreed largely as to which individuals remained positive. The tests were further compared with regard to general specificity, particularly cross-reactivity with rheumatoid factor, speed, simplicity, their ability to detect other species, storage requirements and general presentation.Validity, reliability and ease of use in the field of five rapid tests for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Uganda.A study was conducted to measure the overall performance of several rapid diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum infection, in order to select the most appropriate test to be used in the field. A total of 742 patients attending the out-patient department of Mbarara Hospital with a clinical suspicion of malaria were included in the study. For each patient, a thick/thin film and 5 rapid tests based on the detection of histidine-rich protein II (HRP-II) (Paracheck Pf dipstick and device, ParaHIT f, Malaria Rapid and BIO P.F.) were performed. Outcomes were validity, inter-reader reliability and 'ease of use in the field', measured by both the general characteristics of the test and by the opinion of the readers. About half (57%) of the patients were positive for P. falciparum. The Paracheck Pf (dipstick and device) was considered as the most appropriate for the use in the field, being sensitive (97%), moderately specific (88%), reliable (kappa coefficient = 0.97), easy to use and cheap (about US$ 0.5/test). The ParaHIT f represented a good alternative.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test, 'Determine malaria pf', in epidemic-prone, forest villages of central India (Madhya Pradesh).A rapid, immunochromatographic test for malaria diagnosis, 'Determine malaria pf', was evaluated by a field team in the epidemic-affected, forest setting of Chhindwara district, in Madhya Pradesh, central India. In all, 526 fever cases were screened for Plasmodium falciparum in October or November, 1999. Those found to be infected were treated with sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine and primaquine. Using microscopy as the gold standard, the new test had a sensitivity of 98% and a specificity of 87%. The positive and negative predictive values were 88% and 98%, respectively. Although follow-up of 64 subjects on day 7 post-treatment revealed that 20% of those who then appeared smear-negative were still antigenaemic, 34% of the subjects were still smear-positive, for asexual parasites, at that time. The Determine test was found to be very easy to perform and the results could be read reliably by field workers, without any supervision. The ease of use of the test indicates that it could be useful in the management of malaria, particularly in remote and inaccessible areas, provided that its accuracy can be assured and that it can be made affordable.Cross-reactivity in rapid diagnostic tests between human malaria and zoonotic simian malaria parasite Plasmodium knowlesi infections.Plasmodium knowlesi has a relatively broad host range extending to humans, in whom it causes zoonotic malaria. Recent studies have shown that human infection with P. knowlesi is widely distributed in forested areas of Southeast Asia. In the present study, we evaluated commercial rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for human malaria to assess their reactivity and sensitivity in detecting P. knowlesi parasites using blood samples obtained from infected monkeys. The blood samples were assayed using two commercial RDTs based on immunochromatographic assays: (i) the OptiMAL-IT, designed to detect parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) of both P. falciparum and other plasmodia, and (ii) the Entebe Malaria Cassette (MC), designed to detect P. falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) and P. vivax-specific pLDH. Interestingly, when the P. knowlesi-infected blood samples were examined with the RDTs, OptiMAL test results were interpreted as falciparum malaria-positive, while Entebe MC test results were interpreted as vivax malaria-positive. The sensitivities of both tests in detecting P. knowlesi parasite were similar to those for P. falciparum and higher than P. vivax. Thus, commercial RDTs based on detection of pLDH should be used with great caution, and should not replace conventional microscopy in the diagnosis of suspected cases of P. knowlesi malaria.Evaluation of light microscopy and rapid diagnostic test for the detection of malaria under operational field conditions: a household survey in Ethiopia.In most resource-poor settings, malaria is usually diagnosed based on clinical signs and symptoms and not by detection of parasites in the blood using microscopy or rapid diagnostic tests (RDT). In population-based malaria surveys, accurate diagnosis is important: microscopy provides the gold standard, whilst RDTs allow immediate findings and treatment. The concordance between RDTs and microscopy in low or unstable transmission areas has not been evaluated.This study aimed to estimate the prevalence of malaria parasites in randomly selected malarious areas of Amhara, Oromia, and Southern Nations, Nationalities and Peoples' (SNNP) regions of Ethiopia, using microscopy and RDT, and to investigate the agreement between microscopy and RDT under field conditions.A population-based survey was conducted in 224 randomly selected clusters of 25 households each in Amhara, Oromia and SNNP regions, between December 2006 and February 2007. Fingerpick blood samples from all persons living in even-numbered households were tested using two methods: light microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood slides; and RDT (ParaScreen device for Pan/Pf).A total of 13,960 people were eligible for malaria parasite testing of whom 11,504 (82%) were included in the analysis. Overall slide positivity rate was 4.1% (95% confidence interval [CI] 3.4-5.0%) while ParaScreen RDT was positive in 3.3% (95% CI 2.6-4.1%) of those tested. Considering microscopy as the gold standard, ParaScreen RDT exhibited high specificity (98.5%; 95% CI 98.3-98.7) and moderate sensitivity (47.5%; 95% CI 42.8-52.2) with a positive predictive value of 56.8% (95% CI 51.7-61.9) and negative predictive value of 97.6% (95% CI 97.6-98.1%) under field conditions.Blood slide microscopy remains the preferred option for population-based prevalence surveys of malaria parasitaemia. The level of agreement between microscopy and RDT warrants further investigation in different transmission settings and in the clinical situation.[Usefulness of the "OptiMAL Rapid Malaria test" for rapid detection of malaria imported to Poland].In this survey the use of OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of malaria was evaluated. It was proved that this test allowed to diagnose the Plasmodium sp. antigen in 72% of examined blood specimens, 82% for P. falciparum infection and 69% for P. vivax, whereas P. ovale was not detected at all. The test sensitivity depended on the parasitemia level. It showed a sensitivity of 100% for parasitemia density exceeded 1%, 95.4% with the parasitemia ranging from 0.1-0.99%. For lower parasite density, the test's sensitivity was of 32 and 60%. The OptiMAL test showed a 99.1% specificity thus it revealed to be significantly high.Performance of an immunochromatographic test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria.The immunochromatographic test (ICT) for the rapid diagnosis of malaria has been marketed for several years. In a study in which three Centres of Tropical Medicine participated and data were pooled, performance of the test varied considerably when comparing the results between each centre. The sensitivity of ICT in 2,343 patients tested in our services was 100% and the specificity 99.74%. Moreover, two patients with a positive ICT would initially have been missed by expert microscopy, with Plasmodium falciparum malaria being confirmed microscopically some hours later. The principal reasons for the better performance of the test in our series appear to be blood collection in EDTA vials and considerable experience with handling and interpreting the ICT test.[Evaluation of the OptiMal test in the diagnosis of imported malarial outbreak].The OptiMal test is an immuno-chromatographic dipstick test that permits indiscriminate detection of Plasmodium falciparum and other species of human malaria. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of the test for diagnosis of imported malaria. A total of 244 patients with a presumptive diagnosis of imported malaria in France were included during the study period. The reference test, i.e., combined thick and thin blood films, demonstrated infection by Plasmodium falciparum in 58 cases, Plasmodium vivax in 12, P. ovale in 8 and Plasmodium malariae in 2. The OptiMal test detected only 46 of the 55 Plasmodium falciparum cases. The sensitivity of the test for diagnosis of that species was 80%, its specificity was 98%, and its positive and negative predictive values were 95 and 93% respectively. Parsitemia studies showed poor test reliability for densities lower than 150/ul. Detection of other species was accurate in 21 out of 22. The results of this study demonstrate that the current version of the OptiMal test should be used with great caution for the diagnosis of malarial infection in hospital practice.Evaluation of three rapid tests for diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in Colombia.The diagnostic capacity of three malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), NOW-Malaria-ICT, OptiMAL-IT, and Paracheck-Pf, was evaluated against expert microscopy in Colombia. We tested 896 patients, of whom microscopy confirmed 139 P. falciparum, 279 P. vivax, and 13 mixed P.f/P.v infections and 465 negatives. Paracheck-Pf and NOW-malaria-ICT were more accurate in detecting P. falciparum (sensitivities 90.8% and 90.1%, respectively) in comparison with Optimal-IT (83.6%). NOW showed an acceptable Pf detection rate at low densities (< 500/microL), but resulted in a higher proportion of false positives. For P. vivax diagnosis, Optimal-IT had a higher sensitivity than NOW (91.0% and 81.4%, respectively). The choice between the two Pf/Pv detecting RDTs balances P. falciparum and P. vivax detection rates. Considering some degree of P. falciparum overtreatment and failure to detect all P. vivax cases as more acceptable than missing some cases of P. falciparum, we recommend careful implementation of NOW-malaria-ICT in areas where microscopy is lacking. The price is however still a constraint.Clinical trials of a new immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Goa.Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) based immunochromatographic test kit (ICT Malaria Pf) for the rapid diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria was evaluated at the clinic of Malaria Research Centre (Field Station), Goa. Of the 98 febrile patients screened, 22 were ICT positive for P. falciparum. Simultaneous microscopic examination of the blood smears of these ICT positive patients showed that 20 were positive for P. falciparum alone, whereas one had mix infection of both P. vivax and P. falciparum suggesting 100% sensitivity. Only one slide negative patient who had taken 600 mg chloroquine the previous day was positive in the ICT. Out of the remaining 76 blood smears, 41 showed P. vivax infection and none cross-reacted with P. falciparum HRP-2 antigen and were ICT negative except one mix infection case in which P. vivax and P. falciparum infections occurred concomitantly suggesting species specificity of 98.7%. The positive predictive value, negative predictive value and efficacy of the ICT were 95.4, 100 and 98.9% respectively. The band intensity of the ICT positive cases significantly correlated with P. falciparum parasitaemia (p < 0.01). The usefulness and the disadvantages of this diagnostic kit have been discussed in context of prevailing malaria situation in the country.Field evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test for detection of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax in patients with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria in eastern Indonesia.In areas such as eastern Indonesia where both Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax occur, rapid antigen detection tests for malaria need to be able to detect both species. We evaluated the new combined P. falciparum-P. vivax immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria P.f/P.v.) in Radamata Primary Health Centre, Sumba, Indonesia, from February to May 1998 with 560 symptomatic adults and children with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria. Blinded microscopy was used as the "gold standard," with all discordant and 20% of concordant results cross-checked blindly. Only 50% of those with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria were parasitemic. The ICT Malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test was sensitive (95. 5%) and specific (89.8%) for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, with a positive predictive value (PPV) and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 88.1 and 96.2%, respectively. HRP2 and panmalarial antigen line intensities were associated with parasitemia density for both species. Although the specificity and NPV for the diagnosis of vivax malaria were 94.8 and 98.2%, respectively, the overall sensitivity (75%) and PPV (50%) for the diagnosis of vivax malaria were less than the desirable levels. The sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria was 96% with parasitemias of >500/microl but only 29% with parasitemias of <500/microl. Nevertheless, compared with the test with HRP2 alone, use of the combined antigen detection test would reduce the rate of undertreatment from 14.7 to 3.6% for microscopy-positive patients, and this would be at the expense of only a modest increase in the rate of overtreatment of microscopy-negative patients from 7.1 to 15. 4%. Cost remains a major obstacle to widespread use in areas of endemicity.Parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in an endemic area in west Uganda.The measurement of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) has been presented as an easy and rapid method for the diagnosis of malaria in humans. In order to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of such a test we examined blood samples from 429 Ugandan patients. While pLDH activity was significantly linked to parasitaemia, sensitivity and specificity were found to be rather low at 58.8 and 62.2% respectively. The positive and negative predictive values failed to meet necessary standards. We conclude that the methods of measurement of pLDH activity in malaria infection, although potentially useful for the fast diagnosis of malaria, need to be improved to be of true value in endemic areas.Comparison of HRP2- and pLDH-based rapid diagnostic tests for malaria with longitudinal follow-up in Kampala, Uganda.Presumptive treatment of malaria results in significant overuse of antimalarials. Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may offer a reliable alternative for case management, but the optimal RDT strategy is uncertain. We compared the diagnostic accuracy of histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2)- and plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH)-based RDTs, using expert microscopy as the gold standard, in a longitudinal study of 918 fever episodes over an 8-month period in a cohort of children in Kampala, Uganda. Sensitivity was 92% for HRP2 and 85% for pLDH, with differences primarily due to better detection with HRP2 at low parasite densities. Specificity was 93% for HRP2 and 100% for pLDH, with differences primarily due to rapid clearance of pLDH antigenemia after treatment of a previous malaria episode. RDTs may provide an effective strategy for improving rational delivery of antimalarial therapy; in Kampala, either test could dramatically decrease inappropriate presumptive treatments.Performance of a rapid antigen test for the diagnosis of congenital malaria.To assess the performance of OptiMAL, a rapid malaria antigen capture dipstick, in diagnosing congenital malaria.Live newborns aged 0-3 days, delivered at Olabisi Onabanjo University Teaching Hospital, Sagamu, Nigeria between August 2004 and January 2005, were screened for malaria parasitaemia with an immunochromatographic test (OptiMAL) and blood film microscopy. OptiMAL detects plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).Twenty-one of 192 newborns (10.9%) were diagnosed with congenital malaria by blood film microscopy. The OptiMAL test was negative in all infants.OptiMAL rapid malaria antigen capture dipstick might not be useful for diagnosing malaria parasitaemia in newborns. Blood film microscopy remains the gold standard for the diagnosis of congenital malaria.Evaluation of the RealArt Malaria LC real-time PCR assay for malaria diagnosis.PCR-based methods have advantages over traditional microscopic methods for the diagnosis of malaria, especially in cases of low parasitemia and mixed infections. However, current PCR-based assays are often labor-intensive and not readily quantifiable and have the potential for contamination due to a requirement for postamplification sample handling. Real-time PCR can address these limitations. This study evaluated the performance characteristics of a commercial malaria real-time PCR assay (RealArt Malaria LC Assay; Artus GmbH, Hamburg, Germany) on the LightCycler platform for the detection of malaria parasites in 259 febrile returned travelers. Compared to nested PCR as the reference standard, the real-time assay had a sensitivity of 99.5%, specificity of 100%, positive predictive value of 100%, and negative predictive value of 99.6% for the detection of malaria. Our results indicate that the RealArt assay is a rapid (<45 min), sensitive, and specific method for the detection of malaria in returned travelers.Immunochromatographic test for the diagnosis of Falciparum malaria.The diagnosis of malaria poses great difficulty at times due to non-availability of microscope, trained personnel or laboratory set up. We undertook the immunochromatographic test in 98 suspected cases of malaria for the detection of antigen of P. falciparum in the blood and to assess its sensitivity and positive predictive value. The sensitivity was 87.06% (confidence interval 77.57 to 92.55%) and the positive predictive value was 93.67%. This is a simple, sensitive and convenient test which can be performed in remote areas.Field evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax infection in forest villages of Chhindwara, central India.A rapid new immunochromatographic test (ICT malaria P.f/P.v) for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax was evaluated against thick blood smears in forest villages of Chhindwara, Madhya Pradesh, where both Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax are prevalent. 344 symptomatic patients (Gond ethnic tribe) in five villages were screened by field staff of the Malaria Research Centre in October 1999. For P.falciparum, the ICT was 97.5% sensitive and 88% specific, with a positive predictive value (PPV) of 87.6% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 97.6%. For P.vivax the sensitivity was only 72%, the specificity 99%, with a PPV of 92% and an NPV of 96%. Although a negative test result was inadequate to exclude parasitaemia < or = 300/microl for P.falciparum and < or = 1500/microl for P.vivax, the test is potentially useful in remote areas.Non-microscopic methods for diagnosis of malaria.Assessment of three new parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pan-pLDH) tests for diagnosis of uncomplicated malaria.A study to assess the diagnostic capabilities of three parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pan-pLDH) tests, Vistapan), Carestart and Parabank), was conducted in Uganda. An HRP2 test, Paracheck-Pf), and a Giemsa-stained blood film were performed with the pLDH tests for outpatients with suspected malaria. In total, 460 subjects were recruited: 248 with positive blood films and 212 with negative blood films. Plasmodium falciparum was present in 95% of infections. Sensitivity above 90% was shown by two pLDH tests, Carestart (95.6%) and Vistapan (91.9%), and specificity above 90% by Parabank (94.3%) and Carestart (91.5%). Sensitivity decreased with low parasitaemia (chi(2) trend, P<0.001); however, all tests achieved sensitivity >90% with parasitaemia > or =100/microl. All tests had good inter-reader reliability (kappa>0.95). Two weeks after diagnosis, 4-10% of pLDH tests were still positive compared with 69.7% of the HRP2 tests. All tests had similar ease of use. In conclusion, two pLDH tests performed well in diagnosing P. falciparum malaria, and all pLDH tests became negative after treatment more quickly than the HRP2. Therefore the rapid test of choice for use with artemisinin-combination therapies in this area would be one of these new pLDH tests.Comparison of the OptiMAL rapid antigen test with field microscopy for the detection of Plasmodium vivax and P. falciparum: considerations for the application of the rapid test in Afghanistan.To establish the sensitivity and specificity of a batch of 'OptiMAL 48' rapid antigen tests procured by the World Health Organization in Afghanistan, a sample was tested, in parallel with routine, microscopical diagnosis, at basic health units (BHU) within Afghan refugee camps in Pakistan. The results of both methods of field diagnosis were compared with those of cross-checking microscopy at a reference laboratory, which were taken as the 'gold standard'. Out of 499 patients examined, 36% were diagnosed as malaria cases by field microscopy and 34% by the rapid test. For the OptiMAL 48 test, cross-checking of the corresponding smears at the reference laboratory gave a sensitivity of 79.3% and a specificity of 99.7% for Plasmodium falciparum and corresponding values of 86.1% and 98.7% for P. vivax infections. The performance of the field microscopy was better, with a sensitivity and specificity of 85.2% and 99.7% for P. falciparum, and 90.4% and 98.7% for P. vivax, respectively. These results show that the performance of OptiMAL 48 is adequate for acute- and post-emergency situations when the alternative is just clinical diagnosis. However, in the developing health system of Afghanistan, the main focus should be on the expansion of the existing network for microscopical diagnosis and quality control, to meet the needs of a stable situation. Rapid antigen tests are more suited to investigations of outbreaks in remote situations, where health services are deficient or absent.Comparison of the diagnosis of malaria by microscopy, immunochromatography and PCR in endemic areas of Venezuela.Whole blood samples (N = 295) were obtained from different locations in Amazonas and Sucre States, in Venezuela. Malaria was diagnosed by microscopy, OptiMAL and polymerase chain reaction (PCR), with Plasmodium vivax, P. falciparum, and P. malariae being detected when possible. We identified 93 infections, 66 of which were caused by P. vivax, 26 by P. falciparum, and 1 was a mixed infection. No infection caused by P. malariae was detected. The sensitivity and specificity of each diagnostic method were high: 95.7 and 97.9% for microscopy, 87.0 and 97.9% for OptiMAL, and 98.0 and 100% for PCR, respectively. Most samples (72.2%) showed more than 5000 parasites/microL blood. The sensitivity of the diagnosis by microscopy and OptiMAL decreased with lower parasitemia. All samples showing disagreement among the methods were reevaluated, but the first result was used for the calculations. Parasites were detected in the 6 false-negative samples by microscopy after the second examination. The mixed infection was only detected by PCR, while the other methods diagnosed it as P. falciparum (microscopy) or P. vivax (OptiMAL) infection. Most of the false results obtained with the OptiMAL strip were related to the P. falciparum-specific band, including 3 species misdiagnoses, which could be related to the test itself or to genetic variation of the Venezuelan strains. The use of the microscopic method for malaria detection is recommended for its low cost but is very difficult to implement in large scale, population-based studies; thus, we report here more efficient methods suitable for this purpose.Evaluation of a rapid whole blood immunochromatographic assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria.Microscopic examination of blood smears is the 'gold standard' for malaria diagnosis, but is labour intensive and requires skilled operators. Plasmodium vivax malaria accounts for up to 70% of infections in Sri Lanka. The objective of this study was to determine the effectiveness of an immunochromatographic test which can detect both the species of Plasmodium, P. vivax and P. falciparum, present in Sri Lanka.Prospective study from May 2001 to March 2002.All persons above 5 years of age who presented to the Malaria Research Station, Kataragama or the Anti-malaria Clinic, Kurunegala, with a history of fever were recruited to the study. Thick and thin blood smears were examined for malarial parasites. The rapid diagnostic test (RDT), ICT Malaria P.f/P.v (AMRAD ICT, Australia) was performed simultaneously by an independent investigator. The severity of clinical disease of all patients was evaluated.The study sample comprised 328 individuals of whom 126 (38%) were infected, 102 with P. vivax (31.1%) and 24 with P. falciparum (7.3%). The RDT was found to be highly sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) for the diagnosis of P. falciparum when compared with field microscopy. The sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria was only 70%. When P. vivax parasitaemia was greater than 5000 parasites/microL the RDT was 96.2% sensitive. A significant association was noted between the band intensity on the dipstick and both peripheral blood parasitaemia (p < 0.001) and clinical severity of disease with P. vivax (p = 0.011).The ICT Malaria P.f/P.v test can be used in Sri Lanka in the absence of microscopists.False positive ParaSight-F test for malaria in patients with rheumatoid factor.Rapid diagnostic modalities for malaria.[Malaria diagnosis and treatment in a rural Health Centre in Mayotte (Comoro archipelago, 2002)].With a marked increase in both morbidity and mortality, as well as a high level of resistance to chloroquine (CQ), malaria is once again a major public health problem in Mayotte, a French overseas territory in the Comoro archipelago. The object of this study is to assess the contribution in the field of two new antimalarial fight steps taken in 2001-2002: The use of the rapid diagnostic test (RDT) for malaria OptiMAL in the rural health centres and the drop of the CQ alone for the simultaneous administration of CQ and sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP) as the first-line treatment for uncomplicated malaria. All 581 suspected malaria attacks, diagnosed by RDT during the year 2002 in a rural health centre of the island, were registered. The good positive predictive value of the RDT used (97.2%) calculated during the study has permitted an important reduction of the rate of wrongly administer antimalarial treatment. Before RDT was used, through lack of emergency microscopic diagnosis, the antimalarial treatment was presumptive in the isolated health centres and that rate was superior to 90%. It is now below 3%. Before the introduction of the new protocol, in the middle of the year 2002, the rate of therapeutic failures with CQ used alone was 40.2% (33/82). With the simultaneous administration of CQ and SP as a first-line treatment, this rate fell down to 1.8% (6/337). For the time being, this new treatment policy is acceptable in Mayotte. But the experience of the countries who have adopted this therapeutic policy shows that the effectiveness of the association CQ-SP is likely to be temporary. It is necessary to set up a "durable long-term" therapy strategy in Mayotte as soon as possible by adopting as first-line treatment for uncomplicated malaria a combination therapy according to the recommendations of the World Health Organization. It could be the artemether-lumefantrine combination which has already been the subject of an efficacy survey in the island.Accuracy of malaria diagnosis by microscopy, rapid diagnostic test, and PCR methods and evidence of antimalarial overprescription in non-severe febrile patients in two Tanzanian hospitals.The study was aimed to evaluate the malaria over/underdiagnosis and over/underprescription of antimalarial drugs. Between February and March 2007 blood samples were collected from 336 non-severe febrile outpatients attended in two peripheral Tanzanian hospitals. Microscopy and a rapid diagnostic test (RDT) were done locally and the accuracy evaluated by qualitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for Plasmodium spp. The testing was performed at National Institute for Infectious Diseases Lazzaro Spallanzani (INMI), Rome, Italy. As a result of PCR, we identified 26 malaria cases out of 336 (7.7%) patients. Microscopy and RDT accuracies were 93.5% and 97.6%, respectively. Overprescription and underdiagnosis rates were 29.3% and 30.8%, respectively. On-field training, clinical management of febrile illness, and malaria microscopy in remote settings should be considered.The hospital- and field-based performances of the OptiMAL test, for malaria diagnosis and treatment monitoring in central India.The performance of the OptiMAL test, to detect and differentiate Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax, was evaluated in central India. The subjects were either symptomatic patients, who presented at a referral hospital in urban Jabalpur, or the inhabitants of remote, tribal, forested villages where malaria is a major public-health problem. In each setting, the results of conventional microscopy were used as the 'gold standard'. Under hospital conditions, the test had excellent sensitivity (100%), good specificity (97%), a high positive predictive value (98%) and a high negative predictive value (100%). The corresponding values in the field-based study in the tribal villages (100%, 67%, 84% and 100%, respectively) were almost as good. The results of OptiMAL testing reveal the decline in parasitaemias (of P. falciparum or P. vivax) after drug administration. For monitoring the effectiveness of treatment, the test could therefore be a useful alternative to microscopy, particularly (1) in places where the facilities for microscopy are poor or non-existent and (2) among hospitalized patients with severe, complicated malaria (in whom parasitaemia and drug response need to be followed very carefully). Follow-up (within 28 days of diagnosis) of the 58 malaria cases detected in the field revealed that the OptiMAL test can be used to detect re-infection with a different Plasmodium sp. (sensitivity = 100%; specificity = 100%; J-index = 1) or recrudescence/re-infection with the same Plasmodium sp. (sensitivity = 83%; specificity = 100%; J-index = 0.83) accurately. The ability to use the test to distinguish P. falciparum from P. vivax, and to identify mixed infections of these two species, is of great significance in areas where the preferred and effective therapy for P. falciparum malaria differs from that for P. vivax.Comparison of a rapid field immunochromatographic test to expert microscopy for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum asexual parasitemia in Thailand.We assessed a rapid, Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein 2 (PfHRP2)-based immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf Test), for detection of asexual P. falciparum parasitemia in 551 subjects in three groups: (1) symptomatic patients self-referring for diagnosis, (2) villagers in a screening survey, and (3) patients recently treated for P. falciparum malaria. Expert light microscopy was the reference standard. ICT test performance was similar for diagnostic and screening modes. Four findings emerged: (1) test sensitivity correlated directly with parasite density, (2) test band intensity correlated directly with parasite density, (3) persistent test positivity after parasite clearance precludes its use for monitoring early therapeutic responses, and (4) a false negative test at 18,000 parasites/microl is unexplained. We conclude that a strong positive ICT test is highly predictive of falciparum asexual parasitemia for the diagnosis of new cases of falciparum malaria in Thailand, but a negative test result is inadequate to exclude parasitemia < 300/microl, and in some instances, even a higher parasitemia.The ParaSight-F dipstick test as a routine diagnostic tool for malaria in Sri Lanka.Blood from 1053 persons who presented for treatment at outpatient clinics of government health institutions in Sri Lanka, and 250 who took part in a blood survey for malaria, was examined by thick blood film microscopy under routine field conditions, and by the ParaSight-F dipstick method. All the samples were also examined microscopically under laboratory conditions when 4 times the number of microscope fields were examined. Compared with this reference standard, the sensitivity and specificity of the ParaSight-F test were 90.2% and 99.1%, and those of microscopy in the field were 92.4% and 98.4% respectively, there being no statistically significant difference between the 2 methods. The ParaSight-F test reading correlated significantly and positively with the intensity of clinical disease of patients but not with their peripheral parasitaemia, indicating that it may be a more accurate measure of the true parasite load than microscopy, which detects only parasites which are in the peripheral blood and not those which are sequestered in deep organs. The ParaSight-F test, however, failed to detect Plasmodium falciparum infections with only gametocytes in the blood (19.6% of the infected blood samples in this study). The time taken for a patient to revert to negativity by the ParaSight-F test was also significantly longer, up to 14 d. This would make the test unsuitable for checking the response to antimalarial treatment within 14 d. In an endemic area it would therefore fail to detect drug resistant populations of parasites.The ParaSight-F rapid dipstick antigen capture assay for monitoring parasite clearance after drug treatment of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Three methods for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection in peripheral blood were compared during antimalarial treatment and follow-up in 32 Burundian patients: dipstick antigen capture assay, standard (TBF) and prolonged thick blood film examination (PTBF) (3 x 5 min and 3 x 20 min examination respectively). Parasitaemia was determined daily by comparison with total white blood cell counts (determined by Coulter counter) until no parasite was detected on 2 consecutive days by PTBF. Cumulatively, 231 observations were made with each assay: 64 were negative and 167 positive by PTBF (59 had parasite counts < or = 100/microL). Compared to PTBF, the sensitivities of TBF and the dipstick assay were 1.0 for parasite counts > 100/microL and 0.458 and 0.966 respectively for counts < or = 100/microL. Overall, the dipstick assay was significantly more sensitive (0.988 vs. 0.808; P < 0.001) but less specific (P = 0.013) than TBF. The dipstick assay is of potential use for monitoring response to drug treatment and for detecting low parasitaemias.Malaria diagnosis by field workers using an immunochromatographic test.A rapid immunodiagnostic test (ICT Malaria PfTest) has been developed by ICT Diagnostics (Sydney, Australia) for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection. The test is an antigen capture assay based on the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 in peripheral blood. This study was undertaken to assess the performance and usefulness of the test as a diagnostic method in highly malarious, inaccessible forested villages of Mandla district, central India. In all, 353 patients with fever were scanned by the test in parallel with thick blood film examination. The sensitivity and specificity were 100% and 84.5%, respectively. The whole test took about 5 min. The test results became negative in most cases (70%) within 7 d after initiation of curative chemotherapy. The test is simple, easy to learn and accurate, and may prove to be an important tool in the battle against falciparum malaria.Use of malaria rapid diagnostic test to identify Plasmodium knowlesi infection.Reports of human infection with Plasmodium knowlesi, a monkey malaria, suggest that it and other nonhuman malaria species may be an emerging health problem. We report the use of a rapid test to supplement microscopic analysis in distinguishing the 5 malaria species that infect humans.Comparison of three antigen detection tests for diagnosis and follow-up of falciparum malaria in travellers returning to Berlin, Germany.We determined the sensitivity and specificity of three rapid immunochromatographic malarial antigen detection test systems (RDTs) for the detection of Plasmodium falciparumand assessed the quality of follow-up results. ParaSight-F and ICT Malaria detect histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2), whereas OptiMal detects plasmodial lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH). ParaSight-F performed with 95.1% sensitivity and 97.1% specificity (554 patients tested of whom 144 had falciparum malaria). ICT Malaria performed with 95.7% sensitivity and 99.2% specificity (718 patients tested of whom 184 had falciparum malaria). OptiMal performed with 76.2% sensitivity and 99.7% specificity (539 patients tested of whom 130 had falciparum malaria). In follow-up investigations, HRP-2 did not appear to be a useful antigen due to its long half-life, whereas pLDH offers a reasonable correlation with the presence of viable parasites in those cases initially detected. We therefore conclude that a combination of both antigens might be the best option for creating a reliable RDT for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria.Diagnosis of malaria in non-endemic countries by the ParaSight-F test.QBC, examination of thin blood smears, and Parasight-F were performed for every case of malaria suspected between May 1997 and December 1998. Data from 310 patients were reported. Fifty had malaria infection diagnosed by QBC and thin blood film, among whom 39 had Plasmodium falciparum infection. Three of these 39 were negative with the Parasight-F test. Eleven patients had a positive ParaSight-F test but microscopic diagnosis methods were negative. Interpretation of these 11 positive ParaSight-F results is proposed to depend on clinical criteria.Relative utility of dipsticks for diagnosis of malaria in mesoendemic area for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in northeastern India.For diagnosis of malaria, popular brands of rapid test kits collectively termed as "dipsticks" were subject to field evaluation in northeastern India for their comparative sensitivity and specificity vis-à-vis conventional microscopic results. Dipsticks based on Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein (Pf HRP-2) antigen capture assay revealed 100% sensitivity and high specificity (94-100%); thus, they were concluded to be reliable tools for confirmed diagnosis of malarial infection. However, an advanced version of the same kit, having incorporated additional pan-malarial monoclonal antibody, was found to be less sensitive (71%) for non-falciparum infections. Besides, Pf HRP-2-based kits continued to show positive results up to day 7, even after clearance of parasitemia on account of persistent antigenemia. This very limitation seemed to have been overcome by parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) enzyme-based kit. This kit was observed to have high sensitivity (81-89%) and specificity (100%) for both falciparum and non-falciparum malaria, but cannot distinguish mono-infection from mixed infections. It is concluded that the rational use of these kits would accord health benefits in terms of early detection and prompt treatment, reduce drug pressure, and possibly delay the emergence and spread of multi-drug-resistant strains of malarial parasites.Rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria by detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen.Malaria is a resurging problem all over the country and rapid diagnosis is mandatory to decrease the morbidity and mortality and for control of malaria. In the current study the aim was to evaluate the usefulness of rapid Plasmodium falciparum antigen detection and to compare its utility over conventional peripheral thick and thin smear examination.Three hundred fifty seven randomly selected patients with pyrexia and or atypical presentations of malaria, found initially negative for malaria were subjected to thick and thin smear examination and Plasmodium falciparum antigen detection test by using commercially available Parasight F. kit.54.6% of cases presented with pyrexia, while other presentations of falciparum malaria were less frequently encountered (162/357). Eighty five patients (23.8%) were diagnosed as having falciparum malaria based on smear/Parasight F. Test. Eighty- four of these patients were positive for Parasight F. test and only 34.51% of these cases were also positive on smear examination.The antigen detection test for Plasmodium falciparum is useful for rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria. It could detect 65.5% cases of falciparum malaria which were initially negative by peripheral smear examination. Hence, this technique is superior to peripheral smear staining and helps early diagnosis.Trial of the ParaSight-F test for malaria diagnosis in the primary health care system, Zimbabwe.Rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria remains one of the main limitations to prompt treatment. Diagnosis based on clinical symptoms is decidedly unreliable, especially in areas of seasonal transmission like Zimbabwe. In view of this, the Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein (HRP-II) antigen detection assay (ParaSight-F test) was tried at 10 health centres in 3 malaria endemicity zones of Zimbabwe, as a malaria diagnostic tool for primary health care. Parasitological evaluations were conducted using thick and thin film microscopy as gold standard, and ease of test operation and practicability to nurses were ascertained by questionnaire. The sensitivity of the test did not vary substantially by endemicity zone and was approximately 93%. Specificities were 85, 72 and 92% in the hyperendemic, mesoendemic and hypoendemic zones, respectively. Positive predictive values varied considerably with endemicity, the lowest being in the hypoendemic zone (56%). However, negative predictive values did not change significantly, with a mean of 94%. It was found that the ParaSight-F test reduced mistreatment for malaria, relative to clinical diagnosis, by up to 81%, especially in the hypoendemic region. Test acceptability evaluations were good.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria.False-positive results of a Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2-detecting malaria rapid diagnostic test due to high sensitivity in a community with fluctuating low parasite density.The persistence of parasite histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) in the circulation after parasite clearance has been considered a drawback for rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) targeting HRP2 and a major cause of false-positive results. This paper reports results of a study into whether a proportion of RDT HRP2 false-positive cases carried parasites using polymerase chain reaction analysis as the gold standard rather than microscopy. The high rate of RDT false-positive parasitemia results in comparison with microscopy was shown to predominantly represent cases that had a parasite density below the threshold for detection by microscopy. Despite the generally low disease-endemic prevalence of malaria in the area, there was a high prevalence of chronic infections with low, fluctuating, parasite densities that were better detected by RDT. Our results suggest that in areas known to have low-density parasitemias, RDTs targeting HRP2 may increase diagnostic sensitivity in comparison with microscopy. While microscopy remains the standard for comparison of malaria diagnostic accuracy, the limitations of microscopy, and the possibility that RDTs may have superior accuracy in some circumstances, should be taken into account when interpreting results of diagnostic trials.Short communication: An assessment of the use of malaria rapid tests by village health volunteers in rural Laos.Rapid malaria diagnosis, a key component of malaria control strategies, is hampered by the expense and training requirements of reliable microscopy. Rapid malaria antigen tests may improve the diagnosis of malaria in the rural tropics. After 1 h training 64 village health volunteers (VHVs) from rural Laos, with no previous laboratory experience, performed two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (ParacheckPf and OptiMAL) accurately. The reliability of six VHVs was assessed longitudinally, over 10 months with different frequencies of retraining. Compared with microscopy, error rates in dipstick interpretation were low (<2%) for both tests and were not associated with retraining frequency (P>0.2). Previously untrained Lao VHVs performed malaria rapid tests reliably with high sensitivity and specificity after minimal training.Feasibility and acceptability of home-based management of malaria strategy adapted to Sudan's conditions using artemisinin-based combination therapy and rapid diagnostic test.Malaria remains a major public health problem especially in sub-Saharan Africa. Despite the efforts exerted to provide effective anti-malarial drugs, still some communities suffer from getting access to these services due to many barriers. This research aimed to assess the feasibility and acceptability of home-based management of malaria (HMM) strategy using artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) for treatment and rapid diagnostic test (RDT) for diagnosis.This is a study conducted in 20 villages in Um Adara area, South Kordofan state, Sudan. Two-thirds (66%) of the study community were seeking treatment from heath facilities, which were more than 5 km far from their villages with marked inaccessibility during rainy season. Volunteers (one per village) were trained on using RDTs for diagnosis and artesunate plus sulphadoxine-pyrimethamine for treating malaria patients, as well as referral of severe and non-malaria cases. A system for supply and monitoring was established based on the rural health centre, which acted as a link between the volunteers and the health system. Advocacy for the policy was done through different tools. Volunteers worked on non-monetary incentives but only a consultation fee of One Sudanese Pound (equivalent to US$0.5).Pre- and post-intervention assessment was done using household survey, focus group discussion with the community leaders, structured interview with the volunteers, and records and reports analysis.The overall adherence of volunteers to the project protocol in treating and referring cases was accepted that was only one of the 20 volunteers did not comply with the study guidelines. Although the use of RDTs seemed to have improved the level of accuracy and trust in the diagnosis, 30% of volunteers did not rely on the negative RDT results when treating fever cases. Almost all (94.7%) the volunteers felt that they were satisfied with the spiritual outcome of their new tasks. As well, volunteers have initiated advocacy campaigns supported by their village health committees which were found to have a positive role to play in the project that proved their acceptability of the HMM design. The planned system for supply was found to be effective. The project was found to improve the accessibility to ACTs from 25% to 64.7% and the treatment seeking behaviour from 83.3% to 100% before- and after the HMM implementation respectively.The evaluation of the project identified the feasibility of the planned model in Sudan's condition. Moreover, the communities as well as the volunteers found to be satisfied with and supportive to the system and the outcome. The problem of treating other febrile cases when diagnosis is not malaria and other non-fever cases needs to be addressed as well.Parasight F test compared with the polymerase chain reaction and microscopy for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in travelers.Imported malaria is an increasing problem worldwide. A rapid and accurate test for Plasmodium falciparum infection would facilitate the diagnosis of malaria in the returned traveler. The ParaSight F antigen capture assay (dipstick test) is a new diagnostic test for P. falciparum based on detection of circulating histidine-rich protein-2 antigen. We performed a blinded evaluation of this assay compared with microscopy and the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 151 febrile travelers. Compared with the PCR, the dipstick test had a sensitivity of 88% and a specificity of 97%. The ability of the dipstick test to detect P. falciparum was similar with that of microscopy (88% versus 83%) since the species of Plasmodium in 14 of 133 malaria-infected patients could not be determined by microscopy due to low parasite numbers. The dipstick test was 40% sensitive for infections with < 50 parasites/microliter, 89% with 50-100 parasites/microliter, and > or = 93% with > 100 parasites/microliter. Circulating antigen was detectable in 68% of the patients seven days after initiation of treatment and in 27% at day 28. The dipstick test represents a simple and accurate test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum infection in the returned traveler.Parasight-F dipstick antigen test in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Ethiopia.To determine the shelf life, rapidity and diagnostic performance of ParaSight-F.Prospective randomised study.Malaria diagnostic and treatment posts and health centres in central-southern part of the Ethiopian Rift Valley.Three hundred and eighty two subjects randomly selected.Double blind evaluation of the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of PFT versus CBF.The point prevalence was found to be 29.7% with species dominance of P. falciparum to P. vivax in the ratio of 4:1. The ParaSight-F test showed, considering P. falciparum only, a sensitivity of 92.5% and specificity of 93%. A remarkably high positive predictive value (PPV) of 82% as well as a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99% was obtained. Considering all species of Plasmodium, sensitivity was 78.6% and specificity 93%, with PPV and NPV of 82% and 91% respectively. Moreover, PFT was found to be rapid with a batch of ten-strips--a rack completed in 30 to 50 minutes, which was five to six times faster than CBF reading. In shelf-life studies, after one year of storage at room temperature, results were found similar to the original readings, indicating the stability and long durability of the test strips.In their durability and high diagnostic performances, both the microscopic slide readings and PFT were found comparable and interchangeable, and advantage in endemic areas where laboratory facilities are not available. The rapidity of PFT may be of greater value during malaria epidemics. But during non-epidemic seasons, the inability of PFT not to detect all forms of malaria remains a draw back.Evaluation of the KAT-Quick Malaria Rapid Test for rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Thailand.In recent years, several rapid diagnostic tests for falciparum malaria have been developed. KAT test results were compared with microscopy on 90 consecutive patients hospitalized at the Hospital for Tropical Diseases, Bangkok, Thailand. Fifty-one patients had P. falciparum infections while 49 had malaria due to other plasmodium species. For a geometric mean +/-SD (Min;Max;range) parasitemia of 11,481 +/- 5.0 (88;713,838;713,750), the sensitivity of the KAT test was 96% (95% CI = 86-99.5), the specificity was 92% (95% CI = 80-99), the accuracy was 94% and the reliability was 85%. These findings suggest that the KAT test is of potential interest in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Thailand.Modeling the financial and clinical implications of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in the case-management of older children and adults in Kenya.Using data on clinical practices for outpatients 5 years and older, test accuracy, and malaria prevalence, we model financial and clinical implications of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) under the new artemether-lumefantrine (AL) treatment policy in one high and one low malaria prevalence district in Kenya. In the high transmission district, RDTs as actually used would improve malaria treatment (61% less over-treatment but 8% more under-treatment) and lower costs (21% less). Nonetheless, the majority of patients with malaria would not be correctly treated with AL. In the low transmission district, especially because the treatment policy was new and AL was not widely used, RDTs as actually used would yield a minor reduction in under-treatment errors (36% less but the base is small) with 41% higher costs. In both districts, adherence to revised clinical practices with RDTs has the potential to further decrease treatment errors with acceptable costs.Trial with ParaSight-F in the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Chennai (Tamil Nadu), India.Efficacy of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein (HRP-II) based diagnostic test ParaSight-F, was evaluated for diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria at the Malaria Clinic in Malaria Research Centre (Field Station), Chennai, Tamil Nadu. A total of 93 febrile patients were screened in parallel by microscopy and by ParaSight-F. The sensitivity and specificity of the test were 100% for the detection of P. falciparum infection.A field trial of the ParaSight-F test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection.The rapid manual ParaSight-F test for Plasmodium falciparum is an antigen capture test detecting trophozoite-derived histidine rich protein II, is simple and provides a definitive diagnosis within 10 min. Compared with 913 thick blood film examinations, the ParaSight-F test had 93.4% sensitivity and 98.2% specificity. Compared with 520 blood samples within the same study examined with the aid of the polymerase chain reaction, the ParaSight-F test had 91.6% sensitivity and 99.4% specificity. The ParaSight-F test could be a valuable diagnostic tool for falciparum malaria in any situation requiring rapid diagnosis in the absence of microscopical examination.Comparison of methods for the rapid laboratory assessment of children with malaria.Rapid diagnosis and accurate quantification of Plasmodium falciparum parasitemia are important for the management of malaria. The assessment of disease severity also depends on evaluation of metabolic indexes such as blood glucose and lactate concentrations. Here we describe an accurate and rapid alternative to conventional thick film examination (Lambaréné method). We also assess near-patient methods for measuring blood glucose (OneTouch) and lactate (Accusport). The accuracy of the Lambaréné method is similar to that of thin films. Results from the OneTouch glucose meter also are in good agreement with a YSI 2300 reference meter. Overall, the Accusport lactate meter agrees poorly with the YSI 2300 reference meter. However, the sensitivity and specificity to detect hyperlactatemia (blood lactate > or = 5 mmol/L) are 0.94 and 0.98, respectively.Detection of histidine rich protein 2 and panmalarial ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test antigens after chloroquine treatment of uncomplicated falciparum malaria does not reliably predict treatment outcome in eastern Indonesia.In regions with drug-resistant malaria, the ability to rapidly detect or predict treatment failure (TF) soon after a course of standard therapy for Plasmodium falciparum malaria would facilitate the prompt institution of second-line therapy. We thus evaluated longitudinally the ability of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv immunochromatographic test to predict treatment outcome. Sixty-six Sumbanese Indonesians with uncomplicated falciparum malaria were treated with chloroquine and followed for 28 days by use of 1997 World Health Organization criteria for assessment of therapeutic efficacy of antimalarial drugs. The ICT Pf/Pv testing could be compared with microscopy in approximately half of the patients on each day of follow-up. Although strongly positive histidine rich protein 2 (HRP2) line intensities (equal to or greater than the control band) in convalescence were highly predictive of TF, any degree of positivity for the HRP2 and panmalarial antigens in convalescence was only moderately predictive of TE Positive predictive values of the HRP2 and panmalarial antigens for TF were 76.9% and 87.0%, respectively, on Day 3, 82.4% and 87.5% on Day 7, and 78.9% and 78.9% on Day 14. Negative HRP2 and panmalarial antigen results in convalescence were even less predictive of an adequate clinical response, and false-negative HRP2 and panmalarial antigen test results were found in one-sixth (6 of 37) of recrudescent infections diagnosed by microscopy among patients with late treatment failure. To reliably predict treatment outcome with rapid antigen tests, further development appears necessary to improve sensitivity for viable asexual parasites while avoiding detection of both gametocytes and persistent antigen in convalescence.Diagnosis of malaria by detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen with a rapid dipstick antigen-capture assay.Two field studies in Kenya and an experimental challenge study in the USA were done to assess the accuracy of a dipstick antigen-capture assay based on qualitative detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2) in peripheral blood for diagnosis of P falciparum infection. In these studies, the assay was 96.5-100% sensitive for detection of greater than 60 P falciparum asexual parasites/microL blood, 70-81% sensitive for 11-60 parasites/microL blood, and 11-67% sensitive for 10 parasites or less/microL blood. Specificity was 95% (95% CI 85-105%; n = 20) among naive American volunteers, 98% (96-101%; n = 112) among volunteers exposed to the bite of P falciparum-infected mosquitoes, and 88% (84-92%; n = 285) among Kenyans living in an area with holoendemic malaria. Our results also indicated that PfHRP-2 antigen was not detectable in blood 6 days after initiation of curative chemotherapy, and suggest that such circulating antigens rarely lead to false-positive tests. The dipstick assay's sensitivity, specificity, simplicity, and speed may make it an important tool in the battle against malaria.Performance of the OptiMAL test for malaria diagnosis among suspected malaria patients at the rural health centers.The OptiMAL test detects both Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax malaria infections. In this study, we evaluated the performance of the OptiMAL test at the Basic Health Units (BHUs) and the District Health Quarter (DHQ) Center in rural villages of Punjab, Pakistan that provide minimal health services. Two sets of blood specimens obtained from 930 suspected malaria patients attending these BHUs were tested at BHUs and the DHQ Center by microscopy and the OptiMAL test. At the BHUs, 231 (25%) of the patients were positive by microscopy and 278 (30%) patients tested positive by the OptiMAL test. At the DHQ Center, microscopic analysis of a second set of specimens from the same patients confirmed the malaria infection in 386 (42%) patients and the OptiMAL test result was positive in 300 (32%) patients. To determine the performance of OptiMAL test at the BHUs and the DHQ Center, all data were compared with microscopy results obtained at the DHQ Center. The OptiMAL test results for P. falciparum at the BHUs were comparable to those of the OptiMAL test at the DHQ Center. However, the sensitivity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) of the OptiMAL test were considerably lower for P. vivax infections than for P. falciparum infections, irrespective of whether the test was performed at the BHUs or at the DHQ Center (P. falciparum: sensitivity = 78-85%, PPV = 89-97%, NPV = 96-98%; P. vivax: sensitivity = 61-76%, PPV = 88-95%, NPV = 90-93%). The OptiMAL test also detected a number of false-positive and false-negative results at both the BHUs and the DHQ Center. The false-positive results ranged from 1% to 2%; however, the number of false-negative results was much higher (BHUs: P. falciparum = 22%, P. vivax = 39%; DHQ Center: P. falciparum = 15%, P. vivax = 24%). In conclusion, these results, when combined with other advantages of the OptiMAL test, suggest that this test can be used by relatively inexperienced persons to diagnose malaria infection in rural areas where facilities for microscopy are not available.Evaluation of diagnostic methods of re-emerging malaria in Korean patients.Malaria is one of the most important parasitic diseases especially in tropical areas. Over 300 million people are affected and the condition causes 1-3 million deaths each year. It is transmitted by the bite of infected Anopheles mosquitoes. Although Korea was declared to be free of Malaria by the WHO in 1979, malaria re-emergence has been apparent since 1993 amongst soldiers located near the De-Militarized Zone (DMZ) in the northern part of the country. Conventional microscopic examination of thin and thick blood films demonstrates the presence of the parasite and thus this method has been used to confirm the diagnosis of malaria, but it is a labor-intensive procedure and relies upon subjective interpretation. To overcome these limitations, fast and reliable methods for malaria detection have been recently introduced. In this study, we compared three kinds of antibody detection kits and one biochemical test kit that determines the presence of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) with conventional peripheral blood smears. The antibody detection methods examined were, two rapid test pack format methods and a single microplate format enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) kit, as manufactured by Korean companies. The sensitivities of the three commercial antibody detection kits in the early stage of malaria were 70.8%, 77.4%, and 63.6%, their corresponding specificities 90.5%, 91.8%, and 80.9%, and their accuracies 87.6%, 87.0%, and 76.7%. The sensitivity and specificity of the pLDH assay were 100% apiece and the results were in 100% concordance with the microscopy of thick blood films. Thus, the pLDH assay may be used as an alternative for conventional microscopic blood film examination, especially in emergency situations when prompt treatment is necessary.Field evaluation of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv immunochromatographic test for the detection of asymptomatic malaria in a Plasmodium falciparum/vivax endemic area in Thailand.Rapid antigen assays provide an effective tool for the detection of malaria in symptomatic patients. However, the efficacy of these devices for detecting asymptomatic malaria, where parasite levels are normally significantly lower than in symptomatic patients, is less well established. We evaluated the efficacy of a new combined Plasmodium falciparum-Plasmodim vivax immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf/Pv) in a cross-sectional malaria survey of the village of Ban Kong Mong Tha, Kanchanaburi Provice, Thailand, from August to December 2000. A total of 1,976 bleeds were made from 559 individuals over the course of the study. Blinded microscopy of thick and thin blood films was used as the gold standard; all discordant and 10% of concordant results were cross-checked. Of 1,976 ICT Malaria Pf/Pv dipsticks tested, 98.3% (n = 1,943) performed as expected, as evidenced by the appearance of the control line. The ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test was both sensitive (100.0%) and specific (99.7 %) for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria with parasitemias of > or = 500 trophozoites/microL; however, only 15.9% (13/82) of infected individuals had parasitemia rates this high. When P. falciparum parasitemia rates were < 500/microL, the sensitivity of the diagnosis was only 23.3%, with a positive predictive value (PPV) and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 76.2 and 97.2%, respectively. The ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test was specific, but not sensitive, for the diagnosis of vivax malaria with parasite rates of > or = 500 trophozoites/microl, with sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of 66.7%, 99.9%, 66.7%, and 99.9%, respectively. At parasite rates of < 500/microL, corresponding values were 0.0%, 99.9%, 0%, and 95.1%. Because of the relatively high cost of these assays, low parasite rates found in the majority of asymptomatic individuals, and low sensitivity of this assay with rates of < 500/microl, use of this assay as a tool for active case detection is of limited value in western Thailand.[Rapid immunochromatographic tests for detection of malaria: principles and strategies for use].Malaria is a parasitological emergency requiring safe quick accurate diagnosis so that appropriate therapy can be implemented. A number of rapid diagnostic tests based on detection of HRP2 Ag, enzymes, LDH or aldolase are now available. However the use of these tests is restricted to trained, experienced staff in special situations. The purpose of this report is to describe the different tests on the market and clarify the limitations for their use.Rapid diagnostic tests compared with malaria microscopy for guiding outpatient treatment of febrile illness in Tanzania: randomised trial.To compare rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria with routine microscopy in guiding treatment decisions for febrile patients.Randomised trial.Outpatient departments in northeast Tanzania at varying levels of malaria transmission.2416 patients for whom a malaria test was requested.Staff received training on rapid diagnostic tests; patients sent for malaria tests were randomised to rapid diagnostic test or routine microscopyProportion of patients with a negative test prescribed an antimalarial drug.Of 7589 outpatient consultations, 2425 (32%) had a malaria test requested. Of 1204 patients randomised to microscopy, 1030 (86%) tested negative for malaria; 523 (51%) of these were treated with an antimalarial drug. Of 1193 patients randomised to rapid diagnostic test, 1005 (84%) tested negative; 540 (54%) of these were treated for malaria (odds ratio 1.13, 95% confidence interval 0.95 to 1.34; P=0.18). Children aged under 5 with negative rapid diagnostic tests were more likely to be prescribed an antimalarial drug than were those with negative slides (P=0.003). Patients with a negative test by any method were more likely to be prescribed an antibiotic (odds ratio 6.42, 4.72 to 8.75; P<0.001). More than 90% of prescriptions for antimalarial drugs in low-moderate transmission settings were for patients for whom a test requested by a clinician was negative for malaria.Although many cases of malaria are missed outside the formal sector, within it malaria is massively over-diagnosed. This threatens the sustainability of deployment of artemisinin combination treatment, and treatable bacterial diseases are likely to be missed. Use of rapid diagnostic tests, with basic training for clinical staff, did not in itself lead to any reduction in over-treatment for malaria. Interventions to improve clinicians' management of febrile illness are essential but will not be easy.Clinical trials NCT00146796 [ClinicalTrials.gov].Short report: Failure of the OptiMAL rapid malaria test as a tool for the detection of asymptomatic malaria in an area of Thailand endemic for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax.We evaluated the efficacy of the OptiMAL assay in a cross-sectional malaria survey in western Thailand from April to August 2001. Expert microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick and thin blood films was used as the gold standard. Positive control lines were evident in 99% (1,128 of 1,137) of the assays tested. However, 34% (384 of 1,128) of assays produced an aberrant result (a positive P. falciparum-specific line and a negative panmalarial line). False-positive panmalarial and Plasmodium falciparum-specific lines occurred in 25.9% (270 of 1,042) and 60.3% (628 of 1,042) of microscopy-negative samples, respectively. Due to the preponderance of false-positive test results, it was necessary to develop subjective criteria for test positivity based on line intensity. For determination of assay performance during this study, we therefore considered all test lines that were scored as intermediate or strong as positive and lines that were faint as negative. Using these criteria, we determined that the sensitivity of the OptiMAL assay for P. falciparum was 25% with > 500 parasites/microl and 10.5% with > 100 parasites/microl, while for P. vivax, the sensitivity at the same parasite rates was 100% and 41.7%, respectively. Further studies are required to determine whether the problems we identified are limited to this particular lot of OptiMAL assays.ParaSight-F test results in cerebral malaria patients before and after treatment in Chittagong Medical College Hospital, Bangladesh.Performance of a commercial immunochromatographic test for the diagnosis of vivax malaria in Turkey.Assessing the Parasight-F test in northeastern Papua, Indonesia, an area of mixed Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax transmission.User-friendly, reliable, and inexpensive methods for diagnosing malaria are needed at the primary health care level. During a randomized treatment trial, the Parasight-F test was assessed on days 0, 3, 7, and 28 against standard light microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick blood smears for diagnosing Plasmodium falciparum parasitemia in patients with P. falciparum (n = 84) or P. vivax (n = 59) malaria. The median P. falciparum parasite count on day 0 was 2,373/microL (range = 20-74,432/microL). At the start of treatment, the Parasight-F test had a sensitivity of 95.2% (80 of 84; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 88.2-98.7), and a specificity of 94.9% (56 of 59; 95% CI = 85.8-98.9). On day 7, this test showed false-positive results in 17 (16.3%) of 104 patients (95% CI = 9.8-24.9). The Parasight-F test performed well when compared with light microscopy in detecting P. falciparum parasitemia in patients presenting with clinical malaria. However, the high false-positive rate on day 7 limits its use for patient follow-up.Colorimetric detection of Plasmodium falciparum and direct sequencing of amplified gene fragments using a solid phase method.A rapid colorimetric assay for the detection of DNA from Plasmodium falciparum malaria is described, allowing direct sequencing of amplified fragments in the positive samples. The method is based on amplification by the polymerase chain reaction (PCR), with incorporation of biotin and a lac operator sequence in the amplified target DNA. The PCR product was immobilized on streptavidin-coupled magnetic beads, and detected by the specific binding of an Escherichia coli lac repressor beta-galactosidase fusion protein. Positive samples were subsequently treated with alkali to generate single stranded templates, which were used for solid phase genomic sequencing. As targets for amplification and sequencing we selected a region of the gene for the antigen Pf155/RESA and a region of the parasite dihydrofolate reductase gene (PfDHFR/TS). We show here that both of these gene targets can be used for specific detection of P. falciparum in patient blood samples. Genomic sequencing of five patient isolates revealed no variation in the Pf155/RESA gene fragment. In a comparison of this sequence with conserved protein domains, a marked similarity to the src homology region 3 was detected. A point mutation was found in the PfDHFR/TS gene fragment of one of the clinical samples, replacing Ser108 with Asn. This mutation has earlier been described in pyrimethamine and cycloguanile-resistant strains of P. falciparum.Evaluation of the rapid diagnostic test OptiMAL for diagnosis of malaria due to Plasmodium vivax.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of the rapid diagnostic test OptiMAL for diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax malaria.We included all the patients who sought medical attention in the San Martin Pangoa Hospital, Junin, an area endemic for vivax malaria in Peru, between October and December 1998, who had fever during the previous 72 hours and who were older than 12 months. The gold standard for diagnosis was thick blood film microscopy. We determined the parasitemia rate for each of the positive slides. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test.We included 72 patients; 39 of them were positive for P. vivax by microscopic examination. The sensitivity of the Optimal test was 92.3%, the specificity 100%, the positive predictive value 100% and the negative predictive value 91.6%. The accuracy of the test was 95.8%. The sensitivity of the OptiMAL test progressively decreased when parasitemia was lower than 1,000 parasites/microliter.the OptiMAL test has a high sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of P. vivax malaria. However, its sensitivity decreased when parasitemia levels were lower. It is a very simple technique, which makes it a good alternative for malaria diagnosis in remote places, although its elevated cost is still a problem.Performance of OptiMAL-IT compared to microscopy, for malaria detection in Burkina Faso.To compare the performance of OptiMAL-IT, a rapid diagnostic test for malaria, with that of microscopy in Burkina Faso.Finger-prick blood samples of 464 children attending hospital for suspected malaria were tested for malaria by microscopy and OptiMAL-IT.The sensitivity and specificity of OptiMAL-IT were 98.7% (CI 95% = 97.6-99.8) and 96.2% (CI 95% = 94.3-98.1) respectively, with a high positive likelihood ratio (25.97).OptiMAL-IT can be considered a good method to diagnose malaria in Burkina Faso, particularly in remote areas with little or no access to microscopy services.The diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Gambian children, by field staff using the rapid, manual, ParaSight-F test.A rapid immunodiagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum, the ParaSight-F test, was evaluated in the diagnosis of malaria in 139 children with uncomplicated malaria, who presented at the Medical Research Council's clinic at Basse in Upper River division, The Gambia. The aim was to evaluate the performance and usefulness of the test as a diagnostic method in a malaria-endemic area, when performed by a field worker. Compared with microscopy, the test had a sensitivity of 96.5%, a specificity of 90.5%, a negative predictive value of 94.2% and a positive predictive value of 94.3%. Because of its sensitivity, specificity and simplicity, the ParaSight-F test will be of value in situations where microscopy is not possible.Comparison of different diagnostic techniques in Plasmodium falciparum cerebral malaria.Plasmodium falciparum cerebral malaria remains a major health problem in India. The efficacy of treatment of cerebral malaria lies in its early diagnosis through rapid diagnostic methods. ParaSights-F test detects HRP-2 antigen secreted by parasitised red blood cells and quantitative buffy coat assay (QBC) is examination of buffy coat for the presence of malarial parasite stained with acridine orange. This study was performed to evaluate the effectiveness of ParaSight-F test and QBC assay as diagnostic methods in the patients of cerebral malaria.Fifty clinically diagnosed patients of cerebral malaria were included in the study. ParaSight-F test, QBC and conventional blood smear examination was done. Patients who were in coma and there were no obvious features of bacterial or viral etiology were investigated for cerebral malaria by these diagnostic methods.ParaSight-F test, QBC and peripheral blood smears were examined. Patients were followed-up for signs of clinical recovery. ParaSight-F test was positive in 47 patients, QBC in 46 while blood smear examination was positive in 28 cases.Sensitivity and specificity of ParaSight-F test were found to be 96.6 and 94% while QBC showed 97.8 and 100% respectively. ParaSight-F test and QBC were found to be novel methods for diagnosis of cerebral malaria especially in the cases where diagnosis can not be made by conventional blood smear examination due to low parasitaemia. These rapid diagnostic methods help in early therapeutic intervention.Multicentre study, in patients with imported malaria, on the sensitivity and specificity of a dipstick test (ICT Malaria P.f./P.v.) compared with expert microscopy.A prospective, multicentre study was carried out in Italy to assess the sensitivity and specificity of a rapid dipstick test (ICT Malaria P.f./P.v.) in the diagnosis of imported malaria caused by Plasmodium falciparum and other Plasmodium spp. The test is based on the detection of histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2) from P. falciparum and 'panmalarial' antigen in peripheral blood. The 241 subjects were international travellers or immigrants from areas where malaria is endemic. When compared with the microscopical examination of bloodsmears (used as the 'gold standard'), the dipsticks were found to be 94.4% sensitive and 94.5% specific for pure infections with P. falciparum. The performance of the tests when used on patients infected with species other than P. falciparum or more than one Plasmodium spp. showed a high degree of variability. Although the dipsticks represent a very simple, rapid, and valuable diagnostic aid, they should not be considered a complete substitute for direct microscopical diagnosis using stained bloodsmears.Comparison with the Pan Malaria IgG assays for malaria diagnosis and direct microscopy among suspected malaria patients in Sanliurfa.In this study, we evaluated the usage of the Pan Malaria IgG CELISA test in the diagnosis of malarial infections in Siverek-Sanliurfa, Turkey, where malarial infection is endemic and there are minimal health services available. The Pan Malaria IgG CELISA (Cellabs) test, which uses recombinant antigens and detects exposure to all four forms of malaria (P. falciparum, P. vivax, P. ovale and P. malariae) was used as individuals. Using the consensus microscopy results as the standard, sensitivity of ELISA for detection of any malarial infection in the rural populations was 83%, specificity was 85%. These results show that the performance of ELISA for the detection of any malarial infection is adequate for acute- and post-emergency situations and rural populations when the alternative is just clinical diagnosis.Diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in pregnancy in sub-Saharan Africa: the challenges and public health implications.Plasmodium falciparum malaria in pregnancy is a major public health problem in sub-Saharan Africa and represents enormous diagnostic challenge. The objective of this report was to review scientific data from studies conducted in sub-Saharan Africa on the diagnosis of malaria in pregnancy within the last two decades (1987 to 2007), to highlight the challenges and the public health implications. Using the Medline Entrez-Pubmed search, relevant publications were identified for the review via combinations of key words such as Malaria, Pregnancy, and Sub-Saharan Africa, which yielded 777 entries as of September 2007. The results from the various studies were discordant, due to differences in the techniques of sample collection and analysis, based on the differences in the definition of clinical, peripheral, and placental malaria. Definitions were based on the presence of malaria parasite and/or pigments in blood smear from peripheral/placental blood, on histological placental findings, on the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Nonspecific clinical presentation of malaria, lack of efficient diagnostic facilities and trained personnel, and absence of regulatory standards for diagnostic tests, are some of the major diagnostic challenges. Increased allocation of resources to development and application of accurate diagnostics will improve malaria diagnosis in pregnancy.Evaluation of Plasmodium-lactate dehydrogenase based immunochromatographic kit for the diagnosis of malaria.Rapid diagnosis of vivax malaria by the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test when thrombocytopenia is present.An easy and reliable diagnostic method for malaria is highly desirable. We examined the recently introduced SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test, which detects Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase, with the additional aid of the presence or absence of thrombocytopenia to diagnose vivax malaria. We enrolled 732 patients with clinically suspected malaria in an area where vivax malaria is endemic. We performed microscopic examination of thin film, applied the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test, and checked platelet counts. One hundred ninety-five patients were smear positive for vivax malaria. The sensitivity of the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test was 96.4%, and its specificity was 98.9%. We found that 95.4% of malaria patients had thrombocytopenia, and the proportion with malaria increased as platelet counts decreased. A positive SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test when thrombocytopenia was present showed a 100% positive predictive value for vivax malaria. In conclusion, the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test is a rapid and accurate diagnostic method for vivax malaria, and a platelet count can facilitate a rapid diagnosis of malaria.A comparison of antigen dipstick assays with polymerase chain reaction (PCR) technique and blood film examination in the rapid diagnosis of malaria.Early diagnosis of malaria for military personnel training in the field is crucial in providing proper treatment for the infected and in taking appropriate preventive measures for the non-infected. Present preliminary diagnosis of malaria in the field depends on the clinical symptoms of the patients and there is a need for rapid diagnosis of malaria in the field. The presence of drug-resistant strains of the Plasmodium species in the region also increases the urgency of finding a quick and sensitive way of identifying the different strains. This study evaluated current methods available for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. The dipstick assays, the ParaSight F test and the OptiMAL malaria rapid test were compared with the methods of microscopic examination of blood film and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). On comparison to the blood film and PCR methods, the ParaSight F test has specificity of 98.6% and sensitivity of 91% for P. falciparum detection. The OptiMAL malaria rapid test has a specificity of 100% and 98.6% and sensitivity of 92.8% and 92.6% for P. vivax and P. falciparum detection respectively. We conclude that both tests are suitable for use for rapid malaria diagnosis in the field but the OptiMAL rapid malaria test, which can detect both vivax and falciparum malaria, would be more useful.[Evaluation of two rapid diagnostic tests, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL, for diagnosis of malaria].To increase the accessibility of malaria diagnosis, the Instituto Nacional de Salud de Colombia undertook a field trial to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of two rapid diagnostic tests.The sensitivity, specificity and concordance was compared for two rapid diagnostic tests for malaria, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL.A descriptive and concordance study was performed with 214 patients in the southwestern coastal city of Tumaco, Colombia, each of whom presented at least one of the symptoms of the classical malaria triad. Two strategies were applied for patient recruitment-one by passive search and a second through local health brigades.NOW ICT showed a general sensitivity of 98.4% (95%CI: 90.3-99.9), and a general specificity of 98.0% (95%CI: 93.9-99.5). For Plasmodium falciparum, the sensitivity was 98.2% (95%CI: 89.4-99.9) and the specificity 98.1% (95%CI: 94.1-99.5). The sensitivity was lower (80.0%) when parasitemia ranged from 200 to 4,000 parasites/microl. The sensitivity and specificity of the NOW ICT for P. vivax malaria were 100%. The sensitivity for this test was not affected for the established ranges of parasitemia for P. vivax. The overall figures for OptiMAL were 95.2% (95%CI: 85.8-98.8) sensitivity and 99.3% (95%CI: 95.8-100.0) specificity. For P. falciparum malaria OptiMAL showed 94.7% (95%CI: 84.5-98.6) sensitivity and 99.4% (95%CI: 96.0-100.0) specificity. The sensitivity was lower (60.0%) when samples with 200-4,000 parasites/microl were tested. For P. vivax, OptiMAL presented a 66.7% (95%CI: 24.1-94.0) sensitivity, which diminished to 50% with a parasitemia between 300-2.500 parasites/microL.Good results for sensitivity and specificity were obtained for malaria diagnosis using NOW ICT and OptiMAL, with NOW ICT showing higher sensitivity and specificity values than OptiMAL.Evaluation of the OptiMAL rapid antigen test and species-specific PCR to detect placental Plasmodium falciparum infection at delivery.During pregnancy, Plasmodium falciparum infection of the placenta frequently occurs in the absence of parasites in peripheral blood. We investigated the abilities of the OptiMAL rapid immunochromatographic strip test for P. falciparum lactate dehydrogenase and species-specific PCR performed on peripheral blood to detect placental infection or malaria-associated low birth weight. Of 509 Malawian women screened by microscopy, 76 had malaria infection. Among these 509 women, the frequency of peripheral blood parasitemia was low. The OptiMAL test gave positive results in 37 of 171 women tested (one of whom had placental but not peripheral blood parasitemia) and had sensitivities of 71% for peripheral parasitemia and 38% for placental parasitemia compared to the microscopy values. The specificity for peripheral parasitemia was 94%. In 135 women, PCR had sensitivities of 94% for peripheral blood malaria detected by microscopy and 72% for placental infection. In samples examined by PCR, the prevalence of malaria in peripheral blood increased from 26.7% by microscopy to 51.9%. Women with placental malaria and women with malaria in peripheral blood samples by microscopy or OptiMAL testing, but not women with malaria detected only by PCR, had lower-birth-weight babies than did women without malaria by these criteria. Positive results by PCR in the absence of microscopic parasitemia were not associated with low birth weight. Neither OptiMAL nor PCR testing of peripheral blood is adequately sensitive to detect all placental malaria infection, but a positive result by OptiMAL testing identifies women with a high proportion of low-birth-weight babies.A bedside dipstick method to detect Plasmodium falciparum.We conducted this study to determine efficacy of Parasight-F (an HRP-II antigen dipstick method to detect P. Falciparum) in children. A total of 30 children were enrolled in the age group of 2 months to 12 years whose peripheral smear showed asexual forms of Plasmodium falciparum. All patients were tested for presence of HRP-II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum in their blood by the Parasight-F dipstick test by either an EDTA sample or a finger prick blood sample. The sensitivity of Parasight-F was 83.3 % However, the sensitivity of Parasight-F to detect Plasmodium Falciparum in case of mixed Plasmodium (Vivax + Falciparum) infection was only 25 %. Also, all patients less than 6 months of age had a negative Parasight-F test. Parasitic index, prior treatment with antimalarials or severity of Falciparum malaria have no effect on the sensitivity of Parasight-F test. We conclude that Parasight-F is an effective tool for diagnosis of Plasmoduim falciparum malaria in children.Role of ICT malaria immunochromatographic test for rapid diagnosis of malaria.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of immunochromatographic test (ICT) malaria p.f/p.v using microscopy as the gold standard diagnosis.Five hundred and sixty patients of both sexes and all age groups with clinical suspicion of malaria were studied. Venous blood was collected for microscopy and ICT. Thick and thin films prepared and stained with Leishman's stain were examined. ICT malaria test was performed and interpreted according to manufacturer's instructions. Data was analyzed using Epi-6.A total of 560 cases were studied, 339 males and 221 females with age ranges between 2 to 73 years. Seventy two (12.85%) cases had parasitaemia (with or without sexual forms). On microscopy 65 (11.6%) cases had asexual-stage parasitaemia and 7 (1.25%) cases had P. falciparum gametocytes only. Thirty two cases were infected with P. falciparum, 29 with P. vivax and 4 had mixed infection. For P. falciparum the ICT was 97.0% sensitive, 98.3% specific, with positive predictive value (PPV) of 78.0% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99.8%. For P. vivax the sensitivity was only 89.7%, specificity 97.9%, PPV was 70.3% and NPV 99.4%.Our results are in concordance with previous studies. Rapid tests though expensive are simple to perform and effective diagnostic tools of malaria. They can be used selectively, though microscopy remains the gold standard diagnosis, economical and accurate if performed by skilled technologists.Use of dipstick tests for the rapid diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune travelers.Swift diagnosis of falciparum malaria in nonendemic areas is frequently complicated by lack of experience on the side of involved laboratory personnel. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) (ICT Malaria P.f. (R)) and parasite-specific lactate-dehydrogenase (pLDH) (OptiMal(R)), respectively, have become available for the qualitative detection of falciparum malaria.In order to evaluate currently available assays, a series of studies was conducted: sensitivity and specificity were evaluated by investigation of specimens from 231 febrile returnees from endemic areas, cross reactivity in patients with rheumatoid factor (RF) was assessed among 92 patients from a rheumatology unit, and the quality of dipstick self-use by febrile travelers was tested in Kenya.Whereas the test kit based on the detection of HRP-2 performed with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 98.3%, the kit for the detection of pLDH showed a sensitivity of 88.5% and a specificity of 99.4%. Cross-reactions with sera positive for rheumatoid factor occurred in 6.6% with the ICT Malaria P.f.(R), and in 3.3% with the OptiMal(R) test. Only ICT Malaria P.f.(R) was tested for quality of self-use among travelers. This dipstick assay was performed successfully by 67 patients (68.4%), but 31 (31.6%) were unable to obtain a result.Dipstick tests have the potential of enhancing speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, especially if nonspecialized laboratories are involved. However, microscopical testing remains mandatory in every single patient with the possible diagnosis of malaria. Self-use of dipstick tests for malaria diagnosis by travelers should only be recommended after appropriate instruction and training, including a successful performance of the test procedure.The reliability of diagnostic techniques in the diagnosis and management of malaria in the absence of a gold standard.The accuracy of techniques for the diagnosis of malaria are usually compared with optical microscopy, which is considered to be a gold standard. However, microscopy is prone to error and therefore makes it difficult to assess the reliability of other diagnostic techniques. We did a systematic review to assess the specificity and sensitivity of diagnostic techniques in different settings, using a statistical method that avoided defining a gold standard. Performance varied depending on species of the malaria parasite, level of parasitaemia, and immunity. Overall, histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2)-based dipsticks showed a high sensitivity (92.7%) and specificity (99.2%) for Plasmodium falciparum in endemic areas. The acridine orange test was more sensitive (97.1%) in detecting P falciparum in epidemiological studies, with a specificity of 97.9%. In the absence of a gold standard, HRP2 dipsticks and acridine orange could provide an alternative for detecting falciparum infections in endemic areas and epidemiological studies, respectively. Microscopy still remains more reliable in detecting non-falciparum infections.Evaluation of a malaria rapid diagnostic test for assessing the burden of malaria during pregnancy.Plasmodium falciparum infection during pregnancy may cause placental malaria and subsequently low birth weight, primarily through the placental sequestration of infected red blood cells. Measuring the burden of malaria during pregnancy usually involves determining the prevalence of placental malaria infection through microscopic examination of placental blood films, a difficult and error-prone process. A number of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria have been developed, most of them immunochromatographic dipstick assays. However, none have been tested for the direct determination of malaria antigen in placental blood. We undertook an evaluation of the Malaria Rapid Test (MAKROmed in determining placental malaria infection. The prevalence of placental parasitemia was 22.6% by microscopy, 51.0% by a polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and 43.1% by RDT. When the PCR was used as the gold standard, RDTs had a sensitivity of 89% and a specificity of 76%. The MAKROmed RDT was highly sensitive in the detection of placental malaria, but had lower than expected specificity.Use of a histidine-rich protein 2-based rapid diagnostic test for malaria by health personnel during routine consultation of febrile outpatients in a peripheral health facility in Yaounde, Cameroon.The role of a rapid diagnostic test (RDT) in the case management of Plasmodium falciparum malaria infections has not been determined in Africa. Our study was conducted during November 2007-January 2008 to assess test accuracy of an RDT in the management of febrile outpatients in a peripheral urban health facility in Cameroon. We found the overall sensitivity to be 71.4% and a specificity of 82.2%; the positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 73.8% and 80.4%, respectively. False-negative and false-positive cases represented 11.8% and 10.5% of all febrile patients. Malaria alone (31.3%) was the first cause of fever; 33.5% of fever cases were of unknown origin. Acute respiratory infections were common among children 0-2 years of age (25.5%) and decreased with age. The risk of having a clinical failure with the presumptive treatment of febrile children was seven times greater than that of the RDT-oriented management (relative risk = 6.8, 95% confidence interval = 0.88-53.4, P = 0.03) because of the delay of appropriate treatment of non-malarial febrile illness. Our results suggest that the RDT may be of limited utility for children greater than five years of age and adults and that diagnosis based on microscopic examination of blood smears should be recommended for these patient populations, as well as in areas of low transmission.[Serum HRP-2 antigens and imported Plasmodium falciparum malaria: comparison of ParaSight-F and ICT malaria P.f].Serum levels of HRP-2 antigens against Plasmodium falciparum in 568 venous blood samples collected at two general hospitals were evaluated using the ParaSight-F (Becton-Dickinson) alone (568/568 samples) or in combination (156/568 samples) with the new ICT-Malaria P.f. (ICT-diagnostic). Comparison with the reference method (thin and thick blood smears assessed by two experienced parasitologists) showed that both tests were highly sensitive (93% and 96% respectively) and specific (98% and 98% respectively). The positive predictive values of the two tests were equal (96%) and the negative predicative values were close (96% and 98% respectively). Although both tests provided results within 10 minutes and required no special equipment for interpretation, the ICT-Malaria P.f. test seemed simpler and easier to use than the ParaSight-F test. The ParaSight-F test alone was used to monitor serum antigen levels after treatment in 24 patients. Antigen levels remained positive for at least three days after disappearance of circulating parasites (range: 3 to 28 days). Evaluation of serum levels of HRP-2 antigens can be useful for emergency diagnosis, especially in patients with low circulating parasite levels. The ICT-Malaria P.f. test seems especially suited for in-field use.Rapid immunochromatographic diagnosis and Rolling Back Malaria--experiences from an African control program.Malaria is a re-emerging disease in much of Africa. In response, the World Health Organization launched the Roll Back Malaria (RBM) initiative. One of six key principles adopted is the early detection of malaria cases. However, the importance of definitive diagnosis and potential value of field deployment of rapid malaria tests in RBM has been largely ignored. The Lowveld Region of Mpumalanga Province, South Africa, is home to a predominantly non-immune population, of approximately 850000 inhabitants, who are at risk of seasonal Plasmodium falciparum malaria. Malaria treatment in this area is usually only initiated on detection of malaria parasites in the peripheral bloodstream, as many other rickettsial and viral febrile illness mimic malaria. The malaria control programme traditionally relied on light microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick blood films for malaria diagnosis. This review summarizes operational research findings that led to the introduction of rapid malaria card tests for primary diagnosis of malaria throughout the Mpumalanga malaria area. Subsequent operational research and extensive experience over a four-year period since introducing the ICT Malaria Pf test appears to confirm the local appropriateness of this diagnostic modality. A laboratory is not required and clinic staff are empowered to make a prompt definitive diagnosis, limiting delays in initiating correct therapy. The simple, accurate and rapid non-microscopic means now available for diagnosing malaria could play an important role in Rolling Back Malaria in selected areas.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria at sites of varying transmission intensity in Uganda.In Africa, fever is often treated presumptively as malaria, resulting in misdiagnosis and the overuse of antimalarial drugs. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria may allow improved fever management.We compared RDTs based on histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) and RDTs based on Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) with expert microscopy and PCR-corrected microscopy for 7000 patients at sites of varying malaria transmission intensity across Uganda.When all sites were considered, the sensitivity of the HRP2-based test was 97% when compared with microscopy and 98% when corrected by PCR; the sensitivity of the pLDH-based test was 88% when compared with microscopy and 77% when corrected by PCR. The specificity of the HRP2-based test was 71% when compared with microscopy and 88% when corrected by PCR; the specificity of the pLDH-based test was 92% when compared with microscopy and >98% when corrected by PCR. Based on Plasmodium falciparum PCR-corrected microscopy, the positive predictive value (PPV) of the HRP2-based test was high (93%) at all but the site with the lowest transmission rate; the pLDH-based test and expert microscopy offered excellent PPVs (98%) for all sites. The negative predictive value (NPV) of the HRP2-based test was consistently high (>97%); in contrast, the NPV for the pLDH-based test dropped significantly (from 98% to 66%) as transmission intensity increased, and the NPV for expert microscopy decreased significantly (99% to 54%) because of increasing failure to detect subpatent parasitemia.Based on the high PPV and NPV, HRP2-based RDTs are likely to be the best diagnostic choice for areas with medium-to-high malaria transmission rates in Africa.Evaluation of two tests based on the detection of histidine rich protein 2 for the diagnosis of imported Plasmodium falciparum malaria.The ParaSight-F dipstick test (Becton Dickinson, USA) and the ICT Malaria Pf test (ICT, Australia) both detect histidine rich protein 2 (HRP-2), a water-soluble antigen expressed by Plasmodium falciparum trophozoites. The present study compared the diagnostic performance of both tests in persons returning to Belgium from countries endemic for malaria. During a period of 18 months both tests were performed on all patients returning from the tropics with a positive malaria blood film. Patients with fever without an obvious cause were used as controls. For the ParaSight-F test, considering P. falciparum trophozoites only, sensitivity was 95% and specificity 90%. Considering trophozoites of all species of Plasmodium, sensitivity was 71% and specificity 87%. Finally, considering patients with clinical malaria, the sensitivity of the test was 72% and specificity 87%. For the ICT Malaria Pf test, sensitivity was 95% and specificity 89% for P. falciparum trophozoites only, 71% and 86% for trophozoites of all species, and 72% and 87% for clinical malaria. Both tests gave highly comparable results. However, antigen detection assays cannot replace conventional microscopy in diagnosing imported malaria. Thick blood film examination is more sensitive and more specific, it allows estimation of parasitaemia and distinction between parasite growth stages, and it covers all species. Moreover, with treated patients the use of antigen tests might lead to problems in determining the efficacy of therapy.Accuracy and reliability of malaria diagnostic techniques for guiding febrile outpatient treatment in malaria-endemic countries.The main purpose of this study was to assess the accuracy of various techniques available for diagnosis of malaria. Blood samples were collected from 313 patients with clinical suspicion of uncomplicated malaria in 2 primary health centers in Madagascar. The presence of Plasmodium parasites was assessed by conventional microscopy, 2 rapid diagnostic tests (one HRP2-based test, PALUTOP(+4), and one pLDH-based test, OptiMAL-IT), and real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR), which is used as the "gold standard" method. The degree of agreement observed was very high for microscopy (0.99) and the HRP2-based test (0.93) and high for the pLDH-based test (0.82). Public-health implications are also discussed in this paper.Cost-effectiveness of malaria diagnostic methods in sub-Saharan Africa in an era of combination therapy.To evaluate the relative cost-effectiveness in different sub-Saharan African settings of presumptive treatment, field-standard microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) to diagnose malaria.We used a decision tree model and probabilistic sensitivity analysis applied to outpatients presenting at rural health facilities with suspected malaria. Costs and effects encompassed those for both patients positive on RDT (assuming artemisinin-based combination therapy) and febrile patients negative on RDT (assuming antibiotic treatment). Interventions were defined as cost-effective if they were less costly and more effective or had an incremental cost per disability-adjusted life year averted of less than US$ 150. Data were drawn from published and unpublished sources, supplemented with expert opinion.RDTs were cost-effective compared with presumptive treatment up to high prevalences of Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia. Decision-makers can be at least 50% confident of this result below 81% malaria prevalence, and 95% confident below 62% prevalence, a level seldom exceeded in practice. RDTs were more than 50% likely to be cost-saving below 58% prevalence. Relative to microscopy, RDTs were more than 85% likely to be cost-effective across all prevalence levels, reflecting their expected better accuracy under real-life conditions. Results were robust to extensive sensitivity analysis. The cost-effectiveness of RDTs mainly reflected improved treatment and health outcomes for non-malarial febrile illness, plus savings in antimalarial drug costs. Results were dependent on the assumption that prescribers used test results to guide treatment decisions.RDTs have the potential to be cost-effective in most parts of sub-Saharan Africa. Appropriate management of malaria and non-malarial febrile illnesses is required to reap the full benefits of these tests.Evaluation of malaria screening in newly arrived refugees to the United States by microscopy and rapid antigen capture enzyme assay.Before an empiric malaria treatment program, >60% of Liberian refugees had malaria on arrival to Minnesota. We compared microscopy with rapid antigen testing for detecting asymptomatic parasitemia. Nine of 103 (8.7%) had malaria by polymerase chain reaction (blood smear and rapid testing had a sensitivity of 22%). The empiric treatment program has decreased the rate of imported asymptomatic malaria. Blood film and rapid antigen testing are poor screening tests.Sensitivity and specificity of dipstick tests for rapid diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune travelers.Swift diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in areas where the disease is not endemic is frequently complicated by the lack of experience on the side of involved laboratory personal. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), respectively, have become available for the qualitative detection of P. falciparum malaria. In order to evaluate two of the currently available assays, specimens from 231 patients were screened during a prospective multicenter study. Among the screened specimens, samples from 53 patients (22.9%) were positive for P. falciparum malaria by microscopy and/or PCR. While the test kit based on the detection of HRP-2 performed with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 98.3%, the kit for the detection of pLDH showed a sensitivity of 88.5% and a specificity of 99.4%. Dipstick tests have the potential of enhancing speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria, especially if nonspecialized laboratories are involved.Diagnosis of malaria in a remote area of the Philippines: comparison of techniques and their acceptance by health workers and the community.To compare the efficacies of remote symptom-based diagnosis of malaria, rapid diagnostic tests and microscopy in an area of low endemicity in the Philippines.In Trial I, 350 symptomatic patients were tested within their villages using malaria Plasmodium falciparum (Pf)/Plasmodium vivax (Pv) immunochromatographic tests (ICT tests) and blood films stored and read under local conditions. The slides were later restained and read. In Trial II, unsupervised volunteer barangay health workers prepared ICT tests and slides after brief training. These slides were read at rural health units. Twenty-seven barangay health workers and 72 community members were later questioned about the three diagnostic strategies.A history of fever alone was sensitive (95.4%) but poorly specific (16.5%) for predicting parasitaemia. The inclusion of other symptoms reduced the sensitivity to below 85%, while specificity remained low. The axillary temperature was poorly predictive. ICT tests achieved high sensitivity (97.9%) but many cases indicated as positive by ICT tests were negative by microscopy. Further analysis of these cases in Trial I indicated that ICT tests were detecting low-level parasitaemias missed by microscopy, and that local microscopy had poor accuracy. ICT tests were well accepted and accurately performed by barangay health workers.These tests meet a strong desire in the community for blood-based diagnosis and may increase the compliance and treatment-seeking behaviour of patients.A review of malaria diagnostic tools: microscopy and rapid diagnostic test (RDT).The absolute necessity for rational therapy in the face of rampant drug resistance places increasing importance on the accuracy of malaria diagnosis. Giemsa microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) represent the two diagnostics most likely to have the largest impact on malaria control today. These two methods, each with characteristic strengths and limitations, together represent the best hope for accurate diagnosis as a key component of successful malaria control. This review addresses the quality issues with current malaria diagnostics and presents data from recent rapid diagnostic test trials. Reduction of malaria morbidity and drug resistance intensity plus the associated economic loss of these two factors require urgent scaling up of the quality of parasite-based diagnostic methods. An investment in anti-malarial drug development or malaria vaccine development should be accompanied by a parallel commitment to improve diagnostic tools and their availability to people living in malarious areas.Quick detection of malaria.Comparison of three antigen detection methods for diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of malaria: a field study from southern Vietnam.To compare the sensitivity, specificity and post-treatment persistence of three commonly used rapid antigen detection methods.We studied 252 Vietnamese patients aged from 4 to 60 years, 157 with falciparum and 95 with vivax malaria and 160 healthy volunteers. An initial blood sample was taken for microscopy, and OptiMAL, immunochromatographic test (ICT) malaria P.f./P.v. and Paracheck-Pf tests. Patients with falciparum malaria were treated with an artesunate-based combination regimen and those with vivax malaria received chloroquine. Eighty-seven patients with falciparum malaria who were initially positive for one of the antigen tests and who remained blood smear-negative underwent follow-up testing over 28 days.Paracheck-Pf was the most sensitive test for Plasmodium falciparum (95.8% vs. 82.6% for ICT malaria P.f./P.v. and 49.7% for OptiMAL). Specificities were all 100%. For vivax malaria, OptiMAL performed better than ICT malaria P.f./P.v. (sensitivities 73.7% and 20.0%, respectively), with 100% specificity in both cases. All tests had low sensitivities (< or = 75.0%) at parasitaemias < 1000/microl regardless of malaria species. During follow-up, Paracheck-Pf remained positive in the greatest proportion of patients, especially at higher parasitaemias (> 10,000/microl). Residual OptiMAL positivity occurred only in a relatively small proportion of patients (< 10%) with parasitaemias > 10,000/microl during the first 2 weeks after treatment.Although microscopy remains the gold standard for malaria diagnosis, Paracheck-Pf may prove a useful adjunctive test in uncomplicated falciparum malaria in southern Vietnam. OptiMAL had the lowest sensitivity for P. falciparum but it might have a use in the diagnosis of vivax malaria and perhaps to monitor efficacy of treatment for falciparum malaria where microscopy is unavailable.Diagnosis of imported malaria by Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) and histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2)-based immunocapture assays.This study was conducted to evaluate the performance of two rapid non-microscopic assays: Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) assay (OptiMAL) and Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2) assay (ICT Malaria). The assays were used to detect malaria infection in 515 immigrants living in Kuwait. The performance of both assays was compared to that of microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick blood films and to each other. Of the 515 patients tested, 163 were positive for malaria parasites by microscopy of thick blood film. Of these, 87 were infected with Plasmodium vivax parasites, 63 with P. falciparum, 1 with Plasmodium malariae, and 12 had mixed infections of P. falciparum and P. vivax. The PfHRP-2 assay detected 53 P. falciparum infections and, as expected, failed to detect all but one case of P. vivax. Three cases of mixed infections were also not detected by this assay. The pLDH assay detected 56 P. falciparum cases and 77 P. vivax infections but failed to detect 4 cases of mixed infections. Compared to microscopy, the performance of both the assays to diagnose P. falciparum infection was comparable. The sensitivity for the PfHRP-2 assay was 82% with a specificity of 99.0% and for the pLDH assay the sensitivity was 89% with a specificity of 99.5%. The PfHRP-2 assay detected 4 false positive cases, 2 of which were also detected by the pLDH assay. These patients reported treatment with chloroquine in the last 2-5 weeks. Though the immunocapture diagnostic assays may be helpful in certain situations, microscopy of thick blood film is still the method of choice in diagnosing imported malaria.Rapid diagnosis of Falciparum malaria by using the ParaSight F test in travellers returning to the United Kingdom: prospective study.Which malaria rapid test for Madagascar? Field and laboratory evaluation of three tests and expert microscopy of samples from suspected malaria patients in Madagascar.Field and laboratory studies were carried out in October and November 2005 to provide a comparative evaluation of the performance of three rapid malaria detection tests, two of which were recently introduced (the CareStart Malaria test and the SD Malaria Antigen Bioline test) and the well-known OptiMAL-IT test. Compared with microscopy, the sensitivity of the three tests to detect Plasmodium falciparum malaria was 97% for the CareStart Malaria test, 89.4% for the SD Malaria Antigen Bioline test, and 92.6% for the OptiMAL-IT test. The three tests were less sensitive in detecting non-P. falciparum infections, and the sensitivity decreased at levels of parasitemia<or=500 parasites/microL for P. falciparum and<or=5,000 parasites/microL for other Plasmodium spp. On the basis of World Health Organization recommendations, only the CareStart Malaria test and the OptiMAL-IT test had sensitivities greater than 95% for samples with parasitemias>or=100 parasites/microL.Multicenter study to evaluate the OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of malaria in U.S. hospitals.More than 1,000 cases of malaria are diagnosed each year in the United States. Reported numbers, however, may be artificially low because many clinicians fail to consider the diagnosis on presentation, U.S. hospital laboratory technologists have very limited experience in detecting and identifying malaria parasites, and reporting of malaria to state health departments is sporadic in many states. In this study, a rapid malaria diagnostic test, the OptiMAL test (DiaMed; under license from Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.) was evaluated in six U.S. hospitals and compared with results of microscopy. The OptiMAL test is a 15-min rapid immunochromatographic test that both identifies and differentiates Plasmodium falciparum from non-P. falciparum malaria parasites on the basis of the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase in a drop of patient blood. A total of 216 specimens from patients suspected of having malaria were tested. Results indicated that 43 samples (20%) were positive for malaria parasites by microscopy (32 P. falciparum, 11 non-P. falciparum) while 42 (19%) were positive by OptiMAL (31 P. falciparum, 11 non-P. falciparum). The sensitivity of the OptiMAL test was 98%; its specificity was 100%, with positive and negative predictive values of 100 and 99%, respectively. Participating hospital physicians and laboratory directors independently reported that the OptiMAL rapid malaria test was accurate, easy to use, and well accepted by those working in their diagnostic laboratories. The overall conclusion was that integration of the OptiMAL rapid malaria test into the U.S. health care infrastructure would provide an important and easy-to-use tool for the timely diagnosis of malaria.Application of the ParaSight-F dipstick test for malaria diagnosis in a district control program.A rapid test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections based on the detection of histidine-rich-protein II, the ParaSight-F test, was evaluated after introduction in a district malaria control program in Uganda. Suspected treatment failures, pregnant women and infants with clinical malaria and general fever cases were tested at health facilities in malaria hypo-, meso- and holoendemic areas. A total of 1326 tests were carried out by health unit staff, cross read by experienced laboratory staff and results compared with thick film microscopy as the standard. Rater agreement in reading the dipstick result between health unit staff and laboratory staff was high, kappa index 0.94 (0.88-0.99). Sensitivity was 99.6% (99.0-100) for parasite densities above 500/microl, 98.6% (97.7-99.6) for densities above 50/microl and 22.2% (8.6-42.3) for densities below 10/microl. With the applied testing strategies no differences were found between endemicity levels or patient categories. Specificity was 86.2% (83.3-88.8) overall, but significantly higher in general fever cases (92.7%) compared to the other patient groups (84.3%, P=0.009). At the given prevalences positive predictive values (ppv) were above 80% and negative predictive values (npv) above 90% in all cases except in pregnant women (ppv: 77.8%). We conclude that in certain situations this test is an alternative to microscopy to improve diagnostic facilities for case management in malaria control programs in endemic African countries.Influence of rapid malaria diagnostic tests on treatment and health outcome in fever patients, Zanzibar: a crossover validation study.The use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for Plasmodium falciparum malaria is being suggested to improve diagnostic efficiency in peripheral health care settings in Africa. Such improved diagnostics are critical to minimize overuse and thereby delay development of resistance to artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACTs). Our objective was to study the influence of RDT-aided malaria diagnosis on drug prescriptions, health outcomes, and costs in primary health care settings.We conducted a cross-over validation clinical trial in four primary health care units in Zanzibar. Patients of all ages with reported fever in the previous 48 hours were eligible and allocated alternate weeks to RDT-aided malaria diagnosis or symptom-based clinical diagnosis (CD) alone. Follow-up was 14 days. ACT was to be prescribed to patients diagnosed with malaria in both groups. Statistical analyses with multilevel modelling were performed. A total of 1,887 patients were enrolled February through August 2005. RDT was associated with lower prescription rates of antimalarial treatment than CD alone, 361/1005 (36%) compared with 752/882 (85%) (odds ratio [OR] 0.04, 95% confidence interval [CI] 0.03-0.05, p<0.001). Prescriptions of antibiotics were higher after RDT than CD alone, i.e., 372/1005 (37%) and 235/882 (27%) (OR 1.8, 95%CI 1.5-2.2, p<0.001), respectively. Reattendance due to perceived unsuccessful clinical cure was lower after RDT 25/1005 (2.5%), than CD alone 43/882 (4.9%) (OR 0.5, 95% CI 0.3-0.9, p = 0.005). Total average cost per patient was similar: USD 2.47 and 2.37 after RDT and CD alone, respectively.RDTs resulted in improved adequate treatment and health outcomes without increased cost per patient. RDTs may represent a tool for improved management of patients with fever in peripheral health care settings.(Clinicaltrials.gov) NCT00549003.Evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v and the OptiMal rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in febrile returned travellers.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are less reliant on expert microscopy and have the potential to reduce errors in malaria diagnosis but have not been extensively evaluated in nonimmune persons or in countries where infection is not endemic. We evaluated the ICT P.f/P.v (ICT-Amrad, Sydney, Australia) and OptiMal (Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.) assays prospectively for the diagnosis of malaria in 158 specimens from 144 febrile returned travellers in Australia by using expert microscopy and PCR as reference standards. Malaria was diagnosed in 93 specimens from 87 patients by expert microscopy, with 3 additional specimens from recently treated patients testing positive for Plasmodium falciparum by PCR. For the diagnosis of asexual-stage P. falciparum malaria, the sensitivity and specificity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay were 97 and 90%, respectively, and those of the OptiMal assay were 85 and 96%, respectively. The ICT P.f/P.v assay missed one infection with a density of 45 parasites/ micro l, whereas the OptiMal assay missed infections up to 2,500/ micro l; below 1,000/ micro l, its sensitivity was only 43%. For the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria, the sensitivity and specificity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay were 44 and 100%, respectively, and those of the OptiMal assay were 80 and 97%, respectively. Both assays missed infections with parasite densities over 5,000/ micro l: up to 10,000/ micro l with the former and 5,300/ micro l with the latter. Despite the high sensitivity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay for P. falciparum malaria, caution is warranted before RDTs are widely adopted for the diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune patients or in countries where malaria is not endemic.Use of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in an emergency situation after the flood disaster in Mozambique.To determine how diagnosis of malaria may be improved by combining the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for Plasmodium falciparum malaria with clinical diagnosis by the presence or history of fever compared with clinical diagnosis alone in emergency situations with flood-affected displaced populations in Mozambique.A cross-sectional study conducted at the emergency outpatient clinic in a village in the Chòkwè district of Gaza Province, 3 weeks after Cyclone Eline hit Mozambique in February 2000.A hundred and thirty children aged less than 15 years with clinical malaria were selected for examination by RDT and fluorescent microscopy using acridine orange as a reference test. The diagnosis of clinical malaria was made by a history of fever in the last three days or axillary temperature above 37.0 degrees C at the time of attending the emergency outpatient clinic. Two positive predictive values were calculated; RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis and clinical diagnosis alone.Positive predictive values of RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis by the presence of fever or history of fever were 87.6% (92/105) (95% confidence interval (CI) 80.8-92.8) compared with 74.6% (97/130) (95% CI 66.2-81.8) for clinical diagnosis alone. Five patients were diagnosed false negative.RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis has sufficient positive predictive value to be used in emergency situations, while RDTs could result in increasing failure to treat when they are used for decisions of treatment compared with clinical diagnosis alone.[Malaria diagnosis: thickdrop and bloodsmear examination, and rapid test].Comparison of blood-film microscopy, the OptiMAL dipstick, Rhodamine-123 fluorescence staining and PCR, for monitoring antimalarial treatment.In an attempt to see if the OptiMAL dipstick (Flow Inc., Portland, OR) can be used to monitor antimalarial treatment, a pilot study of 17 patients with Plasmodium falciparum malaria, admitted to the Hospital for Tropical Diseases in London, U.K., was conducted. Sequential, follow-up, blood specimens were obtained from day 1 to day 3, 4 or 5 post-admission. Thin and thick films prepared from these samples were examined for the presence of malarial parasites, and the intensities of parasitaemia were estimated. In addition, each specimen was tested with the OptiMAL dipstick, Rhodamine-123 fluorescence staining and, on specimens collected on day 1 and the last follow-up before discharge, by a PCR-based test. The results showed that OptiMAL has good sensitivity for the initial diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria and also mirrors the decline in viability of the parasites on treatment, giving the potential to follow the efficacy of drug treatment. The results of the PCR-based tests were still positive when the blood film and OptiMAL result were negative. The OptiMAL dipstick compared well with blood-film microscopy for monitoring antimalarial treatment and could be a useful replacement for microscopy to monitor treatment in places where facilities for microscopy are either lacking or inadequate. In developed countries it could be a useful adjunct to blood-film microscopy, and it might permit a reduction in the duration of hospitalization and give an early warning of treatment failure.Rapid immunochromatographic malarial antigen detection unreliable for detecting Plasmodium malariae and Plasmodium ovale.In order to determine the reliability of two commercial tests for the rapid detection of plasmodial antigen in cases of infection with Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae, the products were evaluated in four centers and a search of the relevant literature was performed. The results of the present and previous studies were compared. With overall sensitivities ranging between 18.8% and 47.6% for Plasmodium malariae and between 20% and 31.3% for Plasmodium ovale, it is evident that neither test is reliable for the detection of Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae infections.[Comparative study of four malaria diagnostic techniques used in Ivory Coast].The biological diagnosis of malaria plays an important part in the patients' treatment for malaria. Thus, many techniques have been developed to reach this purpose. We have compared four of them concerning 196 patients from October, 1996 to January, 1997 in Abidjan. Thick blood film has been chosen as the technique for reference. It has come out that the plasmodic index was 18.3%. The Plasmodium falciparum has been the only encountered species. The different sensitivities of the QBC test and of the Parasight F test reached 100% against 83.3% in the case of the thin blood film. The QBC test and the thin blood film had each a specificity of 100% against 88.1% for the Parasight F test. Unlike the QBC test, the thick blood film and the thin blood film have remained the most difficult to be realised. Therefore, the analysis of parameters of credibility (sensitivity, specificity), predictable values and the time involved will allow in a given situation to use the appropriate biological diagnosis technique.[Rapid diagnostic test for malaria: preliminary study in Madagascar in 2003].This study was conducted in 2003 as part of the training of laboratory technicians in the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria and to evaluate these tests in Madagascar in field conditions for the first time. Two types of RDT were used separately. The dipstick (Optimal-I) that detects circulating pLDH was tested in 168 patients with clinically suspected malaria (fever or recent history of fever) at primary health centers. Microscopy confirmed malaria in 93/168 (55.4%) cases. Monoparasitic P. falciparum infection was identified in 86/93, P. malariae in 3/93, P. vivax in 3/93 and P. ovale in 1/93. A positive Optimal-I test was a highly sensitive indicator of P. falciparum infection with parasitemia exceeding 500 trophozoites/mul (sensitivity of 97.2%; with a specificity of 100%); it also confirmed 6/7 cases of non-P. falciparum malaria. A community malaria survey used the Malaria Hexagon dipstick (detecting P. falciparum-specific HRP2) for 273 patients: 17 (6.2%) RDT tests were positive, and 16 (5.9%) microscopic tests. Although this dipstick did not detect the only case of infection with P. vivax, its specificity was 100% for detection of P. falciparum infection. Installing microscopes and qualified microscopists in the health centers of the one hundred and eleven districts in Madagascar would be extremely difficult, but our results show that RDT is an effective alternative diagnostic tool for daily use as well as for sporadic malaria epidemics. The revised antimalarial treatment policy, involving a drug ten to twenty times more expensive than chloroquine, demonstrates the need to improve malaria diagnosis: presumptive treatment has become prohibitively expensive. RDT can be used to improve malaria case management at the primary heath centers in Madagascar. We discuss the choice of RDTs.[Rapid methods for the diagnosis of tropical malaria].A comparison of three malaria diagnostic tests, under field conditions in North-west Thailand.A hospital-based trial to compare the clinical diagnosis of malaria; microscopy, and a rapid diagnostic antigen capture detection dipstick (ParaSight-F) was conducted in North-west Thailand. 301 people who presented themselves at the hospital were selected. 204 (68%) were presumptively diagnosed as having malaria by the triage nurses; 64 (21.3%) were P. falciparum parasite positive, and 94 (32%) tested positive for P. falciparum with the ParaSight-F test strips. There was no association between hemoglobin levels (<10g/dl and > or = 10g/dl) and malaria, and although there was a good statistical association between temperature and malaria the specificity, sensitivity and positive predictive values were all low, indicating that temperature alone is a poor indicator of the disease. Based on the microscopy results, we found that a presumptive clinical diagnosis dramatically over-diagnosed malaria, and similarly there were a large number of false positives using the ParaSight-F test. We believe that many of the patients had received some form of malaria treatment prior to presentation at the hospital, and that the high number of false positives are explained by persistent antigenemia and the possibility of there being sequestered parasites following incomplete chemotherapy.Evaluation of an immunochromatography test for malaria diagnosis under different storage conditions.This study aimed to evaluate the second-generation OptiMal test for malaria diagnosis under various storage conditions. It detected all the positive samples, except for two Plasmodium malariae samples. Further research evaluating diverse environmental conditions are important for ICT test applicability in Brazilian malaria areas.[Diagnosis of falciparum malaria using ICT].Operational response to malaria epidemics: are rapid diagnostic tests cost-effective?To compare the cost-effectiveness of malaria treatment based on presumptive diagnosis with that of malaria treatment based on rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs).We calculated direct costs (based on experience from Ethiopia and southern Sudan) and effectiveness (in terms of reduced over-treatment) of a free, decentralised treatment programme using artesunate plus amodiaquine (AS + AQ) or artemether-lumefantrine (ART-LUM) in a Plasmodium falciparum epidemic. Our main cost-effectiveness measure was the incremental cost per false positive treatment averted by RDTs.As malaria prevalence increases, the difference in cost between presumptive and RDT-based treatment rises. The threshold prevalence above which the RDT-based strategy becomes more expensive is 21% in the AS + AQ scenario and 55% in the ART-LUM scenario, but these thresholds increase to 58 and 70%, respectively, if the financing body tolerates an incremental cost of 1 euro per false positive averted. However, even at a high (90%) prevalence of malaria consistent with an epidemic peak, an RDT-based strategy would only cost moderately more than the presumptive strategy: +29.9% in the AS + AQ scenario and +19.4% in the ART-LUM scenario. The treatment comparison is insensitive to the age and pregnancy distribution of febrile cases, but is strongly affected by variation in non-biomedical costs. If their unit price were halved, RDTs would be more cost-effective at a malaria prevalence up to 45% in case of AS + AQ treatment and at a prevalence up to 68% in case of ART-LUM treatment.In most epidemic prevalence scenarios, RDTs would considerably reduce over-treatment for only a moderate increase in costs over presumptive diagnosis. A substantial decrease in RDT unit price would greatly increase their cost-effectiveness, and should thus be advocated. A tolerated incremental cost of 1 euro is probably justified given overall public health and financial benefits. The RDTs should be considered for malaria epidemics if logistics and human resources allow.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test specific for Plasmodium vivax.Plasmodium vivax is the only human malaria indigenous to the Republic of Korea (ROK). A rapid and sensitive diagnostic test (RDT) that detects P. vivax is appropriate for evaluating suspected malaria patients with no travel history abroad. The RDTs, SD Malaria Antigen P.v (SD diagnostic, Kyonggi, ROK) specific for P. vivax and the well documented OptiMAL (DiaMed, Cressier, Switzerland) were compared among 282 volunteers for specificity and sensitivity of P. vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria infections against Giemsa-stained blood smears read by an experienced microscopist. A total of 137 volunteers were diagnosed with P. vivax, 45 cases (returned travellers from overseas) were diagnosed with P. falciparum and 100 healthy volunteers were diagnosed as negative for malaria. Correspondingly, the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test identified P. vivax infections in 128/137 malaria patients (93.4%) and 0/100 (0%) healthy volunteers. Three patients identified with P. falciparum also were interpreted as P. vivax by the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test; however, these patients were later confirmed as mixed infections of P. vivax and P. falciparum by polymerase chain reaction. OptiMAL interpreted the three mixed infections only as P. falciparum and detected 130/137 (94.9%) patients with P. vivax. The sensitivity of the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test decreased from 100% (>5000 parasite/microl) to 81.3% (1-100 parasites/microl) as parasitaemia levels declined. For the regions where P. vivax is the primary malaria parasite, the SD P. vivax-specific rapid diagnostic test may be useful for screening suspected malaria patients when sufficient material and human resources (e.g. trained microscopists) are unavailable for malaria diagnosis.Dispensary level pilot implementation of rapid diagnostic tests: an evaluation of RDT acceptance and usage by providers and patients--Tanzania, 2005.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may assist in diagnosis, improve prescribing practices and reduce potential drug resistance development. Without understanding operational issues or acceptance and usage by providers and patients, the costs of these tests may not be justified.To evaluate the impact of RDTs on prescribing behaviours, assess prescribers' and patients' perceptions, and identify operational issues during implementation.Baseline data were collected at six Tanzanian public dispensaries. RDTs were implemented for eight weeks and data collected on frequency of RDT use, results, malaria diagnoses and the prescription of antimalarials. Patients referred for RDTs completed a standardised exit interview. Qualitative methods assessed attitudes toward and satisfaction with RDTs, perceptions about the test and operational issues related to implementation.Of 595 patients at baseline, 200 (33%) were diagnosed clinically with malaria but had a negative RDT. Among the 2519 RDTs performed during implementation, 289 (11.5%) had a negative result and antimalarials prescribed. The proportion of "over-prescriptions" at baseline was 54.8% (198/365). At weeks four and eight this decreased to 16.1% (27/168) and 16.4% (42/256) respectively.A total of 355 patient or parent/caregiver and 21 prescriber individual interviews and 12 focus group discussions (FGDs) were conducted. Patients, caregivers and providers trusted RDT results, agreed that use of RDTs was feasible at dispensary level, and perceived that RDTs improved clinical diagnosis. Negative concerns included community suspicion and fear that RDTs were HIV tests, the need for additional supervision in interpreting the results, and increased work loads without added compensation.Overprescriptions decreased over the study period. There was a high degree of patient/caregiver and provider acceptance of and satisfaction with RDTs. Implementation should include community education, sufficient levels of training and supervision and consideration of the need for additional staff.The role of rapid diagnostic tests in managing malaria.Field studies on the sensitivity and specificity of an immunochromatographic test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in tribal areas of Orissa.A rapid immunodiagnostic test developed by an Australian Biotechnology company for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum in the peripheral blood has been evaluated in the field for its sensitivity, specificity and efficacy in comparison to microscopic examination. The results showed that the tests sensitivity, specificity and efficacy were 98.2, 96.9 and 97.5 per cent respectively. The positive and negative predictive values of the test were 96.4 and 98.4 per cent respectively. The test when compared to the conventional microscopy did not show any statistically significant difference suggesting that the two diagnostic methods are equally good. The test performed did not show cross-reactions with other parasite species. It is a simple and rapid field diagnostic method, which does not require any expensive laboratory equipment or skilled personnel.Evaluation of a new Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase assay (OptiMAL-IT) for the detection of malaria.The new OptiMAL-IT(R) rapid diagnostic test for malaria was evaluated in 271 patients in Thailand with uncomplicated malaria between June and July 2002. The sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum parasites were 88% and 92%, respectively. For species other than P. falciparum, the sensitivity was 65% and specificity was 99%. The performance of the new test decreased markedly at low levels of parasitaemia.Evaluation of two new immunochromatographic assays for diagnosis of malaria.We assessed the performance of two new commercially available rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria (SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf test and Ag Pf/Pan test) in 200 patients with uncomplicated malaria between August and October 2007 in Madagascar. Results of the two RDTs were compared with those obtained by microscopy and real-time polymerase chain reaction. The sensitivity and specificity for detection of Plasmodium falciparum were 93% and 98.9%, respectively, for the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf test and 92.9% and 98.9% for the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf/Pan test. The sensitivity of the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf/Pan test was much lower for detection of other species (63.6%). The sensitivity of the two new assays decreased to 77.3% at parasitemia levels < 100 parasites/microL for detection of P. falciparum.Inter-test comparison between filter paper absorbed blood eluate and serum for malaria serology by enzyme immunoassay: an operational feasibility.Antimalarial IgG and IgM were detected by enzyme immunoassay in finger-stick blood samples collected in capillary tubes and also spotted onto Whatman filter paper. Assay was performed in 92 blood samples obtained from 53 falciparum malaria patients, representing 23 fever cases (malaria negative) and 16 healthy individuals. A simple indirect ELISA was done using Plasmodium falciparum lysate and MSP1(19) peptide as antigens. Total IgG and IgM contents were also estimated in individual sera and filter paper eluate by single radial immunodiffusion (SRID). Assay results of both serum and filter paper eluates were compared. The sensitivity and specificity of the assays for IgG measurement were comparable between serum and filter paper eluates (P < 0.001), whereas, in case of IgM, detection level was poor in filter paper eluates as observed by ELISA and SRID. The filter paper eluates may serve the purpose of antigen-specific IgG detection in seroepidemiological surveys.Evaluation of the OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria.The development of rapid and specific diagnostic tests to identify individuals infected with malaria is of paramount importance in efforts to control the severe public health impact of this disease. This study evaluated the ability of a newly developed rapid malaria diagnostic test, OptiMAL (Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.), to detect Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria during an outbreak in Honduras. OptiMAL is a rapid (10-min) malaria detection test which utilizes a dipstick coated with monoclonal antibodies against the intracellular metabolic enzyme parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH). Differentiation of malaria parasites is based on antigenic differences between the pLDH isoforms. Since pLDH is produced only by live Plasmodium parasites, this test has the ability to differentiate live from dead organisms. Results from the OptiMAL test were compared to those obtained by reading 100 fields of traditional Giemsa-stained thick-smear blood films. Whole-blood samples were obtained from 202 patients suspected of having malaria. A total of 96 samples (48%) were positive by blood films, while 91 (45%) were positive by the OptiMAL test. The blood films indicated that 82% (79 of 96) of the patients were positive for P. vivax and 18% (17 of 96) were infected with P. falciparum. The OptiMAL test showed that 81% (74 of 91) were positive for P. vivax and 19% (17 of 91) were positive for P. falciparum. These results demonstrated that the OptiMAL test had sensitivities of 94 and 88% and specificities of 100 and 99%, respectively, when compared to traditional blood films for the detection of P. vivax and P. falciparum malaria. Blood samples not identified by OptiMAL as malaria positive normally contained parasites at concentrations of less than 100/microl of blood. Samples found to contain P. falciparum were further tested by two other commercially available rapid malaria diagnostic tests, ParaSight-F (Becton Dickinson, Cockeysville, Md.) and ICT Malaria P.f. (ICT Diagnostics, Sydney, Australia), both of which detect only P. falciparum. Only 11 of the 17 (65%) P. falciparum-positive blood samples were identified by the ICT and ParaSight-F tests. Thus, OptiMAL correctly identified P. falciparum malaria parasites in patient blood samples more often than did the other two commercially available diagnostic tests and showed an excellent correlation with traditional blood films in the identification of both P. vivax malaria and P. falciparum malaria. We conclude that the OptiMAL test is an effective tool for the rapid diagnosis of malaria.Usefulness of a rapid on-site Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis (Paracheck PF) in forest migrants and among the indigenous population at the site of their occupational activities in central India.Logistic, economic, and technical factors limit rapid access to microscopic confirmation of malaria in many tropical countries, including India. The occurrence of high-grade fever and three deaths during the hot summer months in some forest migrants created an emergency situation in Jabalpur in central India. A cheap and rapid malaria test, Paracheck Pf, was tested in this group of migrants in parallel with microscopy. The indigenous population at the site of occupational activities of these migrants approximately 250 km from Jabalpur was also screened by both methods. The results of this field investigation are very encouraging. Among migrants, the test had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 67%. The positive and negative predictive values were 94% and 100%, respectively. Among indigenous population, the corresponding values were 100%, 97.3%, 98.4%, and 100%, respectively, indicating the usefulness of test as a diagnostic tool for providing on-site confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Performance of the OptiMAL malaria antigen capture dipstick for malaria diagnosis and treatment monitoring at the Hospital for Tropical Diseases, London.We report here the sensitivity and specificity of OptiMAL for the diagnosis of acute malaria in patients presenting to the Hospital for Tropical Diseases (HTD), a tertiary referral centre for Tropical and Infectious diseases. A sensitivity of 95.3% and a specificity of 100% for Plasmodium falciparum and a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 100% for Plasmodium vivax was obtained. The ability to follow the course of the parasitaemia using OptiMAL during treatment and its significance for use in areas where expert microscopy is not available is discussed.Persistent ICT malaria P.f/P.v panmalarial and HRP2 antigen reactivity after treatment of Plasmodium falciparum malaria is associated with gametocytemia and results in false-positive diagnoses of Plasmodium vivax in convalescence.A problem with rapid Plasmodium falciparum-specific antigen histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) detection tests for malaria is the persistence of antigen in blood after the disappearance of asexual-stage parasitemia and clinical symptoms, resulting in false-positive (FP) test results following treatment. The ICT P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test detects both HRP2 and a panmalarial antigen (PMA) found in both P. falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. To examine posttreatment antigen persistence with this test and whether persistent sexual-stage forms (gametocytes) are a cause of FP tests after treatment, we compared serial antigen test results with microscopy results from patients symptomatic with P. falciparum malaria in Indonesia for 28 days following treatment with chloroquine (CQ; n = 66), sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP; n = 36), and artesunate plus sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (ART + SP; n = 15). Persistent FP antigenemia following SP treatment occurred in 29% (HRP2) and 42% (PMA) of the patients on day 7 and in 10% (HRP2) and 23% (PMA) on day 14. The high rates of persistent HRP2 and PMA antigenemia following CQ and SP treatment were strongly associated with the presence of gametocytemia, with the proportion with gametocytes on day 7 posttreatment being significantly greater in those with FP results than in those with true-negative PMA and HRP2 results. Gametocyte frequency on day 14 post-SP treatment was also greater in those with FP PMA results. Following SP treatment, PMA persisted longer than HRP2, giving an FP diagnosis of P. vivax in up to 16% of patients on day 14, with all FP P. vivax diagnoses having gametocytemia. In contrast, PMA was rapidly cleared following ART + SP treatment in association with rapid clearance of gametocytemia. Gametocytes appear to be an important cause of persistent posttreatment panmalarial antigenemia in areas of endemicity and may also contribute in part to persistent HRP2 antigenemia following treatment.Methods used in the diagnosis of malaria: where do we stand?In developing nations, limited resources lead to inadequate malaria diagnosis. In wealthy countries, poor familiarity with malaria may lead to clinical and laboratory misdiagnosis. Giemsa thick and thin blood films remain the current standard for diagnosis. Although it has good sensitivity and allows species identification and parasite counts, it is time consuming, requires microscopic expertise and maintenance of equipment. Microscopy with fluorescent stains (QBC), dipstick antigen detection of HRP2 and pLDH (Parasight-F, ICT Malaria Pf, OptiMAL), polymerase chain reaction assays and some automated blood cell analyzers offer new approaches and are reviewed here, with emphasis on clinical relevance and the potential to complement conventional microscopy.Diagnostic performance of rapid diagnostic tests versus blood smears for malaria in US clinical practice.Approximately 4 million US travelers to developing countries are ill enough to seek health care, with 1500 malaria cases reported in the United States annually. The diagnosis of malaria is frequently delayed because of the time required to prepare malaria blood films and lack of technical expertise. An easy, reliable rapid diagnostic test (RDT) with high sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV), particularly for Plasmodium falciparum, would be clinically useful. The objective of this study was to determine the diagnostic performance of a RDT approved by the US Food and Drug Administration compared with traditional thick and thin blood smears for malaria diagnosis.This prospective study tested 852 consecutive blood samples that underwent thick and thin smears and blinded malaria RDTs at 3 hospital laboratories during 2003-2006. Polymerase chain reaction verified positive test results and discordant results.Malaria was noted in 95 (11%) of the 852 samples. The RDT had superior performance than the standard Giemsa thick blood smear (p = .003). The RDT's sensitivity for all malaria was 97% (92 of 95 samples), compared with 85% (81 of 95) for the blood smear, and the RDT had a superior NPV of 99.6%, compared with 98.2% for the blood smear (p = .001). The P. falciparum performance was excellent, with 100% rapid test sensitivity, compared with only 88% (65 of 74) by blood smear (p = .003).This operational study demonstrates that the US Food and Drug Administration-approved RDT for malaria is superior to a single set of blood smears performed under routine US clinical laboratory conditions. The most valuable clinical role of the RDT is in the rapid diagnosis or the exclusion of P. falciparum malaria, which is particularly useful in outpatient settings when evaluating febrile travelers.Evidence behind the WHO guidelines: hospital care for children: what is the precision of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria?The evaluation of a dipstick test for Plasmodium falciparum in mining areas of Venezuela.A field trial comparing a dipstick test, an antigen-capture test detecting trophozoite-derived histidine-rich protein-II, and the quantitative buffer coat (QBC) (acridine orange staining technique) assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum was carried out on a population of 1,398 suspected malaria patients in gold mining areas of Venezuela. Sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive values were higher for the dipstick test than for the acridine orange staining compared with the thick blood smear. The sensitivity for the dipstick method was 86.7% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 82-90%), the specificity was 99.3% (95% CI = 98.5-99.7%), and the positive predictive value was 97.1% (95% CI = 94-98%) as compared with the thick blood smear. The sensitivity for acridine orange staining was 82.2% (95% CI = 77-86%), the specificity was 98.5% (95% CI = 97.6-99.1%), and the positive predictive value was 94.1% (95% CI = 90-97%); with a P. falciparum asexual parasitemia higher than 21 parasites/microliter, the dipstick was 100% sensitive, when parasitemia was 10-20/microliter, sensitivity was 88%, and when parasitemia was less than 10/microliter, it was only 13.4%. The dipstick assay meets the criteria for an appropriate, rapid, and reliable test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and has advantages over the acridine orange staining method. Nonetheless, its effectiveness seems limited in areas with low prevalence and among patients with low levels of parasitemia.Test characteristics of two rapid antigen detection tests (SD FK50 and SD FK60) for the diagnosis of malaria in returned travellers.Two malaria rapid diagnostic tests were evaluated in a travel clinic setting: the SD FK50 Malaria Ag Plasmodium falciparum test (a two-band test) and the SD FK60 Malaria Ag P. falciparum/Pan test (a three-band test).A panel of stored whole blood samples (n = 452 and n = 614 for FK50 and FK60, respectively) from returned travellers was used. The reference method was microscopy with PCR in case of discordant results.For both tests, overall sensitivity for the detection of P. falciparum was 93.5%, reaching 97.6% and 100% at parasite densities above 100 and 1,000/microl respectively. Overall sensitivities for Plasmodium vivax, Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae for the FK60 test were 87.5%, 76.3% and 45.2%, but they reached 92.6% and 90.5% for P. vivax and P. ovale at parasite densities above 500/microl. Specificities were above 95% for all species and both tests when corrected by PCR, with visible histidine-rich protein-2 lines for P. malariae (n = 3) and P. vivax and P. ovale (1 sample each). Line intensities were reproducible and correlated to parasite densities. The FK60 tests provided clues to estimate parasite densities for P. falciparum below or above 1,000/microl.Both the FK50 and FK60 performed well for the diagnosis of P. falciparum in the present setting, and the FK60 for the diagnosis of P. vivax and P. ovale at parasite densities > 500/microl. The potential use of the FK60 as a semi-quantitative estimation of parasite density needs to be further explored.Performance and usefulness of the Hexagon rapid diagnostic test in children with asymptomatic malaria living in the Mount Cameroon region.Rapid and correct diagnosis of malaria is considered an important strategy in the control of the disease. However, it remains to be determined how well these tests can perform in those who harbour the parasite, but are asymptomatic, so that rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) could be used in rapid mass surveillance in malaria control programmes.Microscopic and immunochromatographic diagnosis of malaria were performed on blood samples from the hyperendemic Mount Cameroon region. Thin and thick blood films were stained with Giemsa and examined under light microscopy for malaria parasites. The RDT was performed on the blood samples for the detection of Plasmodium species. In addition, the performance characteristics of the test were determined using microscopy as gold standard.Results revealed 40.32% to be positive for microscopy and 34.41% to be positive for the RDT. Parasites were detected in a greater proportion of samples as the parasite density increase. Plasmodium falciparum was the predominant Plasmodium species detected in the study population either by microscopy or by the RDT. Overall, the test recorded a sensitivity and specificity of 85.33% and 95.05% respectively, and an accuracy of 91.40%. The sensitivity and specificity of the RDT increased as parasite densities increased.The Hexagon Malaria Combi test showed a high sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing malaria in asymptomatic subjects and so could be suitable for use in mass surveillance programmes for the management and control of malaria.Devices for rapid diagnosis of Malaria: evaluation of prototype assays that detect Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 and a Plasmodium vivax-specific antigen.The ParaSight F test was developed as a pioneer industry effort in the large-scale, process-controlled production of a device for the rapid diagnosis of malaria. This device performed well in field settings but was limited to the detection of a single malaria species, Plasmodium falciparum. The ParaSight F+V assay advanced upon the ParaSight F test format by incorporating a monoclonal antibody directed against a proprietary Plasmodium vivax-specific antigen, in addition to the antibody directed against P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2, which was used in the ParaSight F assay. The modified assay was developed to add the capability to detect P. falciparum and P. vivax in a single-test-strip format. The present study evaluated three distinct ParaSight F+V prototypes with samples from symptomatic patients in regions of Thailand and Peru where malaria is endemic. Over a 2-year enrollment period (1998 and 1999), a total of 4,894 patients consented to participation in the study. Compared with the results for duplicate microscopic examinations of Giemsa-stained blood smears as the reference diagnostic standard, each successive prototype showed substantial improvement in performance. The final ParaSight F+V prototype, evaluated in 1999, had an overall sensitivity for detection of asexual P. falciparum parasites of 98%. The sensitivity of the device was 100% for P. falciparum densities of >500 parasites/ micro l, with a sensitivity of 83% for parasite densities of </=500/ micro l. The specificity for the exclusion of P. falciparum was 93%. For P. vivax, the overall sensitivity was 87% for the final 1999 prototype. The sensitivities calculated for different levels of P. vivax parasitemia were 99% for parasite densities of >5,000/ micro l, 92% for parasite densities of 1,001 to 5,000/ micro l, 94% for parasite densities of 501 to 1,000/ micro l, and 55% for parasite densities of 1 to 500/ micro l. The specificity for the exclusion of P. vivax was 87%. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves for the diagnostic performance of the assay for the detection of P. falciparum and P. vivax were 0.8907 and 0.8522, respectively. These findings indicate that assays for rapid diagnosis have the potential to enhance diagnostic capabilities in those instances in which skilled microscopy is not readily available.Performance characteristics of a rapid diagnostic test for malaria, when used to confirm cerebral malaria in children and young adults.Serial ParaSight-F test in patients with severe malaria.Evaluation & usefulness of a immunochromatographic test for rapid detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection.Rapid test (Parachek Pf) based on detection of HRP-2 protein specific to Plasmodium falciparum by immunochromatographic technique was evaluated. Prevalence of infection was 8.5%. The test was 100% sensitive & 99.5% specific on comparison with light microscopy. The test is useful for making 'on the spot' diagnosis.Immunocapture diagnostic assays for malaria using Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).We have developed two diagnostic assays based on the specific detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) activity. These assays exploit a panel of monoclonal antibodies that capture the parasite enzyme and allow for the quantitation and speciation of human malaria infections. An immunocapture pLDH activity assay (ICpLDH) allows for the rapid purification and measurement of pLDH from infected blood using the NAD analog APAD, which reacts specifically with Plasmodium LDH isoforms. An immunochromatographic test (the OptiMAL assay) was also formatted and allowed the detection of parasite infections of approximately 200 parasites/microl of blood. By using a combination of antibodies, both tests can not only detect but differentiate between P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum malaria. Both assays show a sensitivity comparable with other commercial nonmicroscopic tests; importantly, we found very few instances of false-positive samples, especially with samples from patients recently cleared of malaria infection. Furthermore, we find that when one uses the quantitative ICpLDH assay, the levels of pLDH activity closely mirror the levels of parasitemia in both initial diagnosis and while following patient therapy. We conclude that diagnostic tests based on the detection of pLDH are both sensitive and practical for the detection, speciation, and quantitation of all human Plasmodium infections and can also be used to indicate drug-resistant infections.A rapid immunochromatographic test (ICT) for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.A field study was conducted to assess the sensitivity and specificity of rapid immunodiagnostic test based on detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) in peripheral blood for diagnosis of P. falciparum infection. Evaluation in 173 patients showed that the assay was 98.59% sensitive and 97.1% specific. There was no cross-reactivity with P. vivax. The test was positive in few patients who were found to be negative by microscopy showing the presence of antigen after curative chemotherapy. The test is a valuable diagnostic tool for falciparum malaria, especially in emergency/field situations requiring rapid diagnosis.Usefulness of an inexpensive, Paracheck test in detecting asymptomatic infectious reservoir of plasmodium falciparum during dry season in an inaccessible terrain in central India.The performance of a new indigenous rapid diagnostic test, Paracheck Pf was evaluated in detection of Plasmodium falciparum in asymptomatic children in remote forest villages of Mandla district, central India to determine the lower limits of sensitivity and specificity of rapid test.A finger prick blood sample was collected to prepare blood smear and for testing with the Paracheck test. The blood smears were read by an experienced technician blinded to the Paracheck results. The figures for specificity, sensitivity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.The new diagnostic test had a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 89%. The positive and negative predictive values were 71% and 98%, respectively. The J -index was 0.83%.The rapid test was found to be very easy to perform and the result could be read reliably by field workers. The field evaluation with this new inexpensive test, ($0.65/test) indicates that it could be used as an epidemiological tool in the management of malaria particularly in areas where microscopy is not operationally feasible to attain the goal of the roll back malaria initiative.Evaluation of ParaHITf strip test for diagnosis of malarial infection.This study sought to determine whether dip stick strip test containing antibody for Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein-II (PfHRP-II) antigen could be used for identification of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in man. The results obtained were also compared with the results of standard microscopic examination. A total of 150 cases were included for the study. Fifty cases were non-febrile cases with no history of malaria acting as control group and the rest 100 cases were having fever and formed the test group. All the cases in the control group was found to be negative for both microscopic examination and strip test. In the test group, all samples that showed positive for P. falciparum by microscopy was also found to be positive for strip test. Whereas, all those samples that were positive for P. vivax in microscopic examination was found to be negative for strip test indicating species specificity of the strip test. In addition, two other cases that were negative for microscopic examination were found to be positive for the strip test. Statistical analysis was done to compare the validity of the results of strip test with that of the results of microscopic examination.Evaluation of Paracheck pf o and Parascreen pan/pf o tests for the diagnosis of malaria in an endemic area, South Ethiopia.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria is limited in peripheral health care services and mainly depends on non-specific clinical examination until the advent of Rapid Diagnostic Tests.Evaluation of the effectiveness of Paracheck pf and Parascreen pan/pf tests for the diagnosis of malaria.A Health Center based cross-sectional study was conducted in Kella and Bussa Health Centers, Wondo-Genet area, South Ethiopia where malaria is endemic. Microscopy of Giemsa stained thick blood film was used as gold standard.The sensitivity and specificity of Paracheck Pf test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum were 96.7% and 76%, respectively, with positive predictive value of 67.1% and negative predictive value of 97.9%. The sensitivity and specificity of the Parascreen Pan/pf test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum were 100% and 65.1%, respectively, while its positive and negative predictive values were 67.9 and 100% respectively. Its sensitivity and specificity for Plasmodium vivax were 100 and 42.3%, respectively, with a positive predictive value of 33.3% and a negative predictive value of 100%.Although further study is needed to evaluate their specificities, both tests were found to be effective for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria at peripheral health care unit where skilled personnel and laboratory facilities are not available for blood film examination.Effect of malaria rapid diagnostic tests on the management of uncomplicated malaria with artemether-lumefantrine in Kenya: a cluster randomized trial.Shortly after Kenya introduced artemether-lumefantrine (AL) for first-line treatment of uncomplicated malaria, we conducted a pre-post cluster randomized controlled trial to assess the effect of providing malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) on recommended treatment (patients with malaria prescribed AL) and overtreatment (patients without malaria prescribed AL) in outpatients >/= 5 years old. Sixty health facilities were randomized to receive either RDTs plus training, guidelines, and supervision (TGS) or TGS alone. Of 1,540 patients included in the analysis, 7% had uncomplicated malaria. The provision of RDTs coupled with TGS emphasizing AL use only after laboratory confirmation of malaria reduced recommended treatment by 63%-points (P = 0.04), because diagnostic test use did not change (-2%-points), but health workers significantly reduced presumptive treatment with AL for patients with a clinical diagnosis of malaria who did not undergo testing (-36%-points; P = 0.03). Health workers generally adhered to RDT results when prescribing AL: 88% of RDT-positive and 9% of RDT-negative patients were treated with AL, respectively. Overtreatment was low in both arms and was not significantly reduced by the provision of RDTs (-12%-points, P = 0.30). RDTs could potentially improve malaria case management, but we urgently need to develop more effective strategies for implementing guidelines before large scale implementation.Comparison of blood smear microscopy to a rapid diagnostic test for in-vitro testing for P. falciparum malaria in Kenyan school children.To compare the diagnostic performance of microscopy using Giemsa-stained thick and thin blood smears to a rapid malaria dipstick test (RDT) in detecting P. falciparum malaria in Kenyan school children.Randomised, controlled feeding intervention trial from 1998-2001.Rural Embu district, Kenya. The area is considered endemic for malaria, with four rainy seasons per year. Chloroquine resistance was estimated in 80% of patients. Children had a spleen rate of 45%.A sample of 515 rural Kenyan primary school children, aged 7-11 years, who were enrolled in a feeding intervention trial from 1998-2001.Percent positive and negative P. falciparum malaria status, sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of RDT.For both years, the RDT yielded positive results of 30% in children compared to microscopy (17%). With microscopy as the "gold standard", RDT yielded a sensitivity of 81.3% in 1998 and 79.3% in 2000. Specificity was 81.6% in 1998 and 78.3% in 2000. Positive predictive value was 47.3% in 1998 and 42.6% in 2000, and negative predictive value was 95.6% in 1998 and 94.9% in 2000.Rapid diagnostic testing is a valuable tool for diagnosis and can shorten the interval for starting treatment, particularly where microscopy may not be feasible due to resource and distance limitations.Evaluation of the OptiMAL test for diagnosis of malaria in Venezuela.We evaluated the OptiMAL rapid dipstick test by comparing it with the conventional standard thick-blood film method, for the detection of malaria in two groups of individuals from different Venezuelan endemic areas. One of the groups consisted of individuals with malaria-like symptoms (n = 113) and the other of asymptomatic individuals (n = 89). The classical microscopy analysis of these populations determined that 67.5% were infected with P. vivax, 31.3% with P. falciparum, and 1.2% with mixed infections. The OptiMAL test showed 96.4% sensitivity, 100% specificity, 100% positive predictive value, 97.5% negative predictive value and optimal concordance (kappa = 0.97), capable of detecting any malaria infection in the evaluated population. However, these parameters were lower when the parasitaemia was < or = 300 parasites/microL. Freezing of the samples did not affect the sensitivity and specificity of the test. We concluded that this rapid malaria test is sensitive and specific for rapid diagnosis of malaria in the field and it is a complement to conventional microscopy.Plasmodium falciparum parasite infection prevalence from a household survey in Zambia using microscopy and a rapid diagnostic test: implications for monitoring and evaluation.This paper presents estimates of P. falciparum infection prevalence in children under 5 years old in the context of a population-based household survey in Luangwa District (Lusaka Province), Zambia, an area where greater than 75% of households possess at least one insecticide-treated mosquito net (ITN). The sensitivity and specificity of an HRP-2 rapid diagnostic test (RDT) (ICT Malaria Pf((R))) compared to microscopy, as well as factors associated with discordant diagnostic results are also presented. P. falciparum infection prevalence was estimated at 7.0% (95% CI 4.9-9.0%) using microscopy. Using microscopy as the gold standard, the sensitivity of the HRP-2 RDT was 100% and specificity was 91.5%; positive predictive value was estimated to be 46.7% (95% CI 36.3-57.4%). RDT discordance, or HRP-2 false positivity, was highest among older children, those in the northern part of Luangwa District, and those with a reported history of antimalarial treatment. These data suggest microscopy should remain the gold standard for estimating malaria parasite point prevalence from household surveys for monitoring and evaluation purposes.[Diagnosis of malaria with immunochromatographic test The Novara experience].Microscopic detection of parasites has been the reference standard for malaria diagnosis for decades. Recently rapid antigen assays provide an effective tool for the detection of malaria in symptomatic patients. In Novara Maggiore della Carità Hospital we evaluated the efficacy of the ParaSight F test in patients with malaria.[Establishment and evaluation of colloid gold labeled immunochromatographic strip test for rapid diagnosis of malaria].To establish and evaluate a gold immunochromatographic strip test for detection and differentiation of Plasmodium vivax and P. falciparum.The monoclonal antibodies, F4H12, G4C9 and D8F7, were conjugated with colloid gold as detecting reagent; monoclonal antibody B2G10 (against P. vivax/ P. falciparum) and D6A7 (only against P. falciparum) were immobilized on nitrocellulose in proper position. Blood samples from 107 febrile patients from endemic area of malaria and 17 patients with visceral leishmaniasis were used for evaluating the specificity. Blood samples of malaria patients (110 with P. vivax and 54 with P. falciparum) were used for evaluating the sensitivity.5 samples out of 107 febrile patients and 17 patients with visceral leishmaniasis showed false positive reaction with a specificity of 96.0% (119/124), all the 17 samples from patients with visceral leishmaniasis were negative. 164 blood samples of malaria patients showed a sensitivity of 92.3% (153/164), 92.7% (102/110)and 94.4% (51/ 54) for patients infected with P. vivax or P. falciparum, respectively.The immunochromatographic strip test based on antigen-capturing is a sensitive, specific, simple and rapid assay for malaria diagnosis.Use of rapid diagnostic tests for diagnosis of malaria in the UK.Malaria is currently diagnosed almost exclusively by microscopy in clinical laboratories. The introduction of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may be useful in achieving rapid detection of malaria parasites, especially in situations where malaria is not often seen or where staff are inexperienced.To explore the use of RDT in UK laboratories.The current use of RDTs was surveyed in UK laboratories subscribing to the United Kingdom National External Quality Assessment Scheme blood parasitology and haematology schemes.An overall survey response rate of 60.3% was seen. RDTs were found to be the preferred choice, either alone or in conjunction with microscopy in 31.2% of the samples examined during normal working hours and in 44.3% of the specimens examined on call.During on-call hours, the use of RDTs was observed to increase and RDTs changed the diagnosis in 12% of laboratories. No established protocol for RDT use was, however, observed in the UK. A protocol that needs to be validated in the laboratory setting is suggested.Non-microscopic method for malaria diagnosis using OptiMAL IT, a second-generation dipstick for malaria pLDH antigen detection.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria are now a commonly used procedure for malaria diagnosis. New or improved devices need to be evaluated against a recognised gold-standard procedure and subjected to conditions of temperature and humidity that may affect their performance. The OptiMAL 48 RDT has now been available commercially for several years and a second-generation OptiMAL IT test is now coming onto the market. In this study the problems associated with the routine use of OptiMAL 48 is investigated and its performance compared with a second-generation individual test, OptiMAL IT. Sensitivity and specificity for detection of all malaria species for both tests were comparable but loss of sensitivity of the test strips due to humidity or temperature found with the routine use of OptiMAL 48 was not seen with the individual OptiMAL IT. False-positive results for Plasmodium falciparum, seen in two negative blood samples, were attributed to the presence of high levels of heterophile antibodies.The usefulness of a new rapid diagnostic test, the First Response Malaria Combo (pLDH/HRP2) card test, for malaria diagnosis in the forested belt of central India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in tribal belt of central India where two Plasmodium species, Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax, are prevalent. In these areas, rapid detection of the malaria parasites and early treatment of infection remain the most important goals of disease management. Therefore, the usefulness of a new rapid diagnostic (RDT), the First Response(R) Combo Malaria Ag (pLDH/HRP2) card test was assessed for differential diagnosis between P. falciparum with other Plasmodium species in remote villages of Jabalpur district.A finger prick blood sample was collected to prepare blood smear and for testing with the RDT after taking informed consent. The figures for sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.Analysis revealed that overall, the RDT was 93% sensitive, 85% specific with a positive predictive value (PPV) of 79%, and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 95%. The accuracy 88% and J-index was 0.74. For P. falciparum, the sensitivity and specificity of the test were 96% and 95% respectively, with a PPV of 85% and a NPV of 99%. The RDT accuracy 95% and J-index was 0.84. For non-falciparum malaria, the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 83%, 94% and 92% respectively with a PPV of 69% and a NPV of 97%.The RDTs are easy to use, reliable and simple to interpret. RDTs are more suited to health workers in situations where health services are deficient or absent. Therefore, the test can be used as an epidemiological tool for the rapid screening of malaria.[Comparison of two techniques for detection of anti-Plasmodium falciparum antibodies: Falciparum-spot IF (Biomérieux) and Malaria IgG Celisa (BMD). Preliminary results].We compared a new Elisa assay to detect malaria antibodies: Malaria IgG Celisa (BMD) with the IFAT technique Falciparum-spot IF (Biomérieux): sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were 81%, 99%, 95%, 95%, respectively. Eight patients had positive thick blood smear out of 23 performed. For these eight confirmed acute malaria cases, the Elisa assay was negative in five instances. For two recent malaria attacks both Elisa and IFI were negative. With blood donors, two sera were IFAT positive and Elisa negative; 16 were IFAT doubtful and Elisa negative. Doubtful results rose up to 13.5% by IFAT against 1.5% by Elisa assay. We preferred kappa coefficient instead of chi 2 test for data analysis, which measures the concordance degree between the two techniques. Here concordance is moderate. Choosing an Elisa assay to detect the transmission of malaria for at-risk blood donors collides with the method sensitivity compared with IFAT as reference.Rapid malaria diagnostic tests vs. clinical management of malaria in rural Burkina Faso: safety and effect on clinical decisions. A randomized trial.To assess if the clinical outcome of patients treated after performing a Rapid Diagnostic Test for malaria (RDT) is at least equivalent to that of controls (treated presumptively without test) and to determine the impact of the introduction of a malaria RDT on clinical decisions.Randomized, multi-centre, open clinical trial in two arms in 2006 at the end of the dry and of the rainy season in 10 peripheral health centres in Burkina Faso: one arm with use of RDT before treatment decision, one arm managed clinically. Primary endpoint: persistence of fever at day 4. Secondary endpoints: frequency of malaria treatment and of antibiotic treatment.A total of 852 febrile patients were recruited in the dry season and 1317 febrile patients in the rainy season, and randomized either to be submitted to RDT (P_RTD) or to be managed presumptively (P_CLIN). In both seasons, no significant difference was found between the two randomized groups in the frequency of antimalarial treatment, nor of antibiotic prescription. In the dry season, 80.8% and 79.8% of patients with a negative RDT were nevertheless diagnosed and treated for malaria, and so were 85.0% and 82.6% negative patients in the rainy season. In the rainy season only, both diagnosis and treatment of other conditions were significantly less frequent in RDT positive vs. negative patients (48.3% vs. 61.4% and 46.2% vs. 59.9%, P = 0.00 and 0.00, respectively).Our study was inconclusive on RDT safety (clinical outcome in the two randomized groups), because of an exceedingly and unexpectedly low compliance with the negative test result. Further research is needed on best strategies to promote adherence and on the safety of a test based strategy compared with the current, presumptive treatment strategy.Performance of OptiMAL(R) in the diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum infections in a malaria referral center in Colombia.Alternative, non-microscopic methods for the diagnosis of malaria have recently become available. Among these, rapid dipstick methods stand out. One such test, OptiMAL(R), is based on the immunochromatographic detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) and has the capacity to detect and distinguish infections caused by P. falciparum and Plasmodium sp. This capacity is particularly important in countries where different species of Plasmodium co-exist. In this study we evaluated the performance of OptiMAL(R) in an urban referral center for malaria diagnosis. Two sets of patients were included: one (n = 112) having predetermined infections with P. falciparum or P. vivax and individuals with negative blood smears; and another consisting of all eligible consecutive patients (n = 80) consulting for diagnosis at the referral center during one month. The overall diagnostic efficiency of OptiMAL(R) for both sets of patients was 96.9%. Efficiency was higher for P. vivax (98.1%) than for P. falciparum (94.9%). These results corroborate the diagnostic utility of OptiMAL(R) in settings where P. vivax and P. falciparum co-exist and support its implementation where microscopic diagnosis is unavailable and in circumstances that exceed the capacity of the local microscopic diagnosis facility.Malaria overdiagnosis and burden of malaria misdiagnosis in the suburbs of central Sudan: special emphasis on artemisinin-based combination therapy era.Accuracy of diagnosis is central for malaria control. Although microscopy is gold standard in malaria diagnosis, its reliability is largely dependent on user skill. In this study, we evaluated practitioners' clinical and microscopists' technical skills in diagnosis of malaria in central Sudan. In a retrospective study, 3203 blood smears from 95 peripheral health facilities (each represented by a general practitioner [GP] and general microscopist [GM]) were reexamined by expert microscopist. Furthermore, in a prospective study, 410 patients had their malaria diagnosis rechecked by rapid diagnostic test for validation of the microscopic diagnosis. Results showed that the rate of false-positive diagnosis of malaria was 75.6% and false-negative diagnosis was 0.01%. The study disclosed poor skills of the GPs and GMs in malaria diagnosis because 43% of the GPs and 44% of the GMs failed to make a single true-positive malaria diagnosis. The false-positive malaria diagnosis showed bias toward adult females. Economically, the calculated cost of diagnosis and treatment of malaria in Sudan in year 2000 is US$100 million, whereas the calculated cost of true malaria is approximately US$14 million. In conclusion, malaria overdiagnosis was widely recognized in central Sudan, with high economic burden during the era of artemisinin-based combination therapy. Finally, different scenarios were suggested for improvement of malaria diagnosis.The diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection using a new antigen detection system.With the widespread emergence of drug-resistant Plasmodium falciparum infection, febrile patients in the tropics can no longer be empirically treated with inexpensive yet effective antimalarials. The substitution of newer and more costly drugs brings with it the need for rapid, accurate, and inexpensive diagnostic procedures so that directed therapy can be used. We report a field trial comparing standard microscopic malaria diagnosis and quantitative buffy coat analysis to a new P. falciparum antigen detection system. The ParaSight F test (PFT) was found to be easy to learn, rapid to perform, and highly accurate. If confirmed, the use of the PFT in endemic areas may aid in the identification of patients requiring therapy for drug-resistant malaria.Feasibility of a rapid dipstick antigen-capture assay for self-testing of travellers' malaria.This open comparative study sought to determine whether, and with what level of instruction, travellers can successfully use and interpret the rapid whole blood malaria diagnostic test, ParaSight F. 160 visitors to the Zürich University Travel Clinic took part in the study. One group received written instructions only, while another group was given combined oral and written instructions on how to test their own blood for malaria infection and interpret a series of 5 prepared test strips. Each volunteer also completed a questionnaire targeted at assessing performance in using the diagnostic, interpretation of the results and acceptability of the concept of self-testing for malaria infection. The main outcome measures were successful performance of the test, correct interpretation of prepared test strips and acceptability of the test. In the group which received only written instructions, 60/80 (75%) were successful, whilst in the group which received written and oral instructions, 72/80 (90%) successfully performed the test (P < 0.02). Overall, 565 (70.6%) test strips were correctly and 165 (20.6%) incorrectly interpreted with 113 (14.1%) false negative interpretations. No prepared test strip was interpreted as false positive. Seventy (8.8%) test strips were not interpreted. Some 91. 9% of all candidates would use such a test if it were available. While it is possible for lay persons to successfully perform the test, interpretation of results poses a problem. In particular, the proportion of false negative interpretations is unacceptable. A combination of written and oral instructions leads to a significantly higher level of successful test performance. If such a test is to be made available to the general public, written instructions must be made concise and foolproof and the test endpoint clearly defined, as the currently available test is more suitable for trained laboratory personnel. In the meantime other candidate diagnostics have become available and these should now be assessed for their suitability in the context of travellers' malaria.ParaSight-F test for the detection of treatment failure in multidrug resistant Plasmodium falciparum malaria.The ParaSight-F test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum was evaluated for its accuracy and usefulness in predicting treatment outcome in 75 patients (70 males, 5 females) with acute uncomplicated malaria who attended a malaria clinic in Mae Sot, Tak province, on the Thai-Myanmar border. All patients were admitted to the clinic for 28 d to exclude reinfection. The test was performed using blood samples collected into ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid from the patients on admission, and on days 1, 2, 7, and 14. The presence of microscopically detectable parasitaemia was used as the reference for sensitivity and specificity of the test. The reappearance of parasites on day 28 was used to determine the accuracy of predicting the outcome of artemether treatment on day 14. The sensitivity of the ParaSight-F test on admission, and on days 1, 2, 7, and 14, was 98.7%, 96.7%, 100%, 100% and 100%, respectively, with corresponding specificities of 50%, 24.2%, 47.1% and 72.9%. The sensitivity for predicting recrudescence by using the test on day 14 was 100%, with 97.7% specificity, and the sensitivity of predicting a sensitive response on day 14 was 97.7%, with 100% specificity. The test seems to permit more precise detection of treatment failure under 'field' conditions if used on day 14 after the start of treatment.[Efficacy of a rapid test to diagnose Plasmodium vivax in symptomatic patients of Chiapas, Mexico].To evaluate, under laboratory conditions, the sensitivity and specificity of a rapid diagnostic test (OptiMAL), based on immunoreactive strips, to detect Plasmodium vivax infection in febrile patients in Southern Chiapas, Mexico.The presence of parasites in blood samples of 893 patients was investigated by Giemsa-stained thick blood smear microscopic examination (gold standard). A blood drop from the same sample was smeared on immunoreactive strips to investigate the presence of the parasite pLDH. Discordant results were resolved by PCR amplification of the parasite's 18S SSU rRNA, to discard infection.OptiMAL had an overall sensitivity of 93.3% and its specificity was 99.5%. Its positive and negative predictive values were 96.5% and 98.9%, respectively. Signal intensity in OptiMAL strips correlated well with the parasitemia density in the blood samples (r = 0.601, p = 0.0001).This rapid test had acceptable sensitivity and specificity to detect P. vivax under laboratory conditions and could be useful for malaria diagnosis in field operations in Mexico.Comparison of the Paracheck-Pf test with microscopy, for the confirmation of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Tanzania.Paracheck-Pf is a rapid, qualitative immuno-assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein-2 in samples of human blood. The assay has now been evaluated, against the usual 'gold standard', microscopy, using blood samples from 1655 individuals in five districts of Tanzania, four of which experience frequent malaria outbreaks. The aim was to verify whether Paracheck-Pf could be a reliable tool for the confirmation of malaria outbreaks in such areas. The overall measurements of the assay's performance were good, with a sensitivity of 90.0%, a specificity of 96.6%, a positive predictive value of 88.9%, and a negative predictive value of 97.0% (with an estimated malaria prevalence of 23.3%). There was, however, marked variation between the study districts, the assay's performance being relatively poor where the test had been stored for 12 months at room temperature (23.5+/-3.5 degrees C). The assay was easy to perform in the field and could clearly be a valuable tool in remote areas and in emergency situations, such as the early detection of malaria outbreaks. The cost of the assay (U.S.$0.62/test at the time of the present study) is sufficiently low that its routine use in the confirmation of P. falciparum malaria might also be cost-effective, particularly in areas where there are no facilities for microscopy and/or where the first-line treatment of malaria is based on relatively expensive artemisinin-based combinations.Evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests: malaria.A comparison of thick smears, QBC malaria, PCR and PATH falciparum malaria test trip in Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis.Blood samples from 182 patients presenting at the out-patient clinic in Richard-Toll. Senegal were analysed by Thick smear microscopy, the QBC, PCR and the new dipstick PATH Malaria assay which detects the histidine rich protein II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. Thick smear microscopy was used as the reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were 100%, 83.6%, 93.4% and 100% QBC respectively; 100%, 72.7%, 89.4% and 100% for PCR; 96%, 92.7%, 96.8% and 91% for the PATH assay. PATH assay failed to detect one positive sample with Plasmodium malariae. Assays were also compared with regard to the expense of equipment and reagents and speed and ease of use. The rapid PATH assay can be performed with minimal training and may be specially useful in areas where P. falciparum is the predominant malaria species, in epidemic malaria regions, and where skilled microscopy is not readily available.[Value of rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum using indirect monoclonal immunofluorescence].Development and use of murine specific monoclonal antibodies associated with an indirect immunofluorescent assay allows a rapid detection of P. falciparum antigens. This work compares the results obtained by interpretation of Giemsa staining technique on blood smears, to the use of a commercial reagent (Monofluo Kit P. falciparum). This monoclonal indirect immunofluorescent assay (I.F.I.M.) provides the clinician with a precious aid to diagnosis as well by its specificity and sensitivity, better than conventional staining techniques; particularly in pauciparasitaemia induced by prime-infestation or partial anti-malarial drug resistance.Paracheck-Pf: a new, inexpensive and reliable rapid test for P. falciparum malaria.We compared the performance of Paracheck-Pf, a new and cheap rapid malaria test, with ICT-Pf/PvR and microscopy in two malaria surveys in Thai villages on the Thai-Burmese border. The specificity, sensitivity, predictive positive and negative values of the Paracheck-PfR and ICT-PfR tests were calculated taking microscopy results as the gold standard. The 294 ICT-Pf/Pv tests resulted in two invalid (no control line) and 11 doubtful results. Both the ICT-Pf/PvR and Paracheck-PfR tests reliably detected P. falciparum infections. However, Paracheck-PfR failed to detect three P. falciparum cases and likewise, ICT-Pf/PvR failed to detect the same three cases and an additional four cases. These seven cases were detected by microscopy and had a parasitaemia under 150 parasites/microl. At a cost of c. US $1.00, the Paracheck-PfR test, based on the detection of the P. falciparum specific HRP-2 protein, is a reliable, easy to use and affordable tool for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria.Evaluation of a rapid antigen capture assay for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria.A study was carried out to evaluate the accuracy of a dipstick antigen capture assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen (Pf HRP-II) in peripheral blood to diagnose P. falciparum malaria. The sensitivity and specificity of the test was found to be 97 and 100 per cent respectively. The persistence of the antigen varied from 5 to 15 days after initiation of antimalarial therapy. The assay was simple to perform, rapid and easy to interpret. However, infection due to other species of human malaria parasites cannot be detected by this dipstick assay. Use of more sensitive technique like polymerase chain reaction (PCR) would help in diagnosing cases with low parasitaemia and infection due to other plasmodial species.Evaluation of the SD FK70 malaria Ag Plasmodium vivax rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.For clinical and epidemiological reasons, it is interesting to diagnose non-falciparum malaria to the species level. This retrospective study assessed the performance of the SD BIOLINE Malaria Antigen Pv test (FK70), a two-band immunochromatographic test detecting Plasmodium vivax-specific lactate dehydrogenase, on samples of international travellers in a non-endemic setting.Stored blood samples from international travellers suspected of malaria were used, with microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Samples infected by Plasmodium vivax (n = 100), Plasmodium falciparum (n = 75), Plasmodium ovale (n = 75) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 25) were included, as well as 100 malaria-negative samples. End points were sensitivity, specificity, inter-reader reliability and reproducibility.The overall sensitivity of the FK70 for the diagnosis of P. vivax was 88.0% (95% confidence interval (CI): 83.6% - 90.3%). For parasite densities > 500/microl, a sensitivity of 97.2% (CI: 92.6% - 99.1%) was obtained. Specificity was 98.5%, with 4 out of 75 P. falciparum samples testing positive. None of the P. ovale samples tested positive. Nearly two-thirds (57/88, 64.7%) of positive P. vivax samples showed faint or weak line intensities, with stronger line intensities at higher parasite densities. The test showed excellent reproducibility and reliability for test results and line intensities (kappa values exceeding 0.98 and 0.87 respectively).The FK70 test performed well in diagnosing P. vivax infections in a non-endemic reference setting. It can be of added value to microscopy in species differentiation of malaria infections, especially at parasite densities > 500/microl.The sensitivity of the OptiMAL rapid diagnostic test to the presence of Plasmodium falciparum gametocytes compromises its ability to monitor treatment outcomes in an area of Papua New Guinea in which malaria is endemic.Using in vivo samples from treatment failure malaria cases, we demonstrate the high sensitivity of the parasite lactase dehydrogenase (pLDH)-based OptiMAL rapid diagnostic test in the detection of P. falciparum gametocytes. This high sensitivity limits the use of pLDH-based tests in the monitoring of treatment outcomes in circumstances where gametocytemia is common.Malaria diagnosis: false negative parasight-F tests in falciparum malaria patients in Nigeria.This study was designed to assess the relative reliability of microscopy, the dipstick technique based on the detection of Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine rich protein II (HRPII) (Parasight-F) and PCR assays in diagnosing falciparum malaria infections in Nigerian children. The prevalence of P. falciparum infections in enrolled patients was 100% by microscopy. Parasite density ranged from 329 to 81,194 parasites/microL of blood, with a geometric mean parasite density of 5168 parasites/microL of blood. The sensitivity of the HRPII based dipstick, PCR and microscopy were 80%, 92% and 100% respectively. A false negative rate of 20% was observed with Parasight-F as compared with microscopy. The parasitemia in patients with false negative Parasight-F tests ranged from 319 to 54,680 parasites/microL of blood. Detailed PCR analysis of Isolates obtained from five out of the eight patients who exhibited a negative Parasight-F test, showed that the average numbers of P. falciparum clones in these five isolates were: 1.7 +/- 1.02 with MSPI, 3.2 +/- 1.3 with MSP2 and 1.4 +/- 1.72 with GLURP. Comparison of microscopy and HRPII results showed a significant (p=0.009) difference as opposed to microscopy and PCR (p=0.239). This study showed that caution should be exercised when excluding P. falciparum infections on the basis of HRPII based dipstick results alone. Microscopy or PCR diagnosis where possible, should be carried out in order to confirm negative P. falciparum HRPII-based dipstick tests.Diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria using ParaSight F, ICT malaria PF and malaria IgG CELISA assays.A battery of sixty-six blood samples from Senegal was analysed by the ParaSight F test, the ICT Malaria PF and the Malaria IgG CELISA. These three assays detect the histidine rich protein 2 antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. Thick smear microscopy was used as the reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were respectively 89%, 100%, 100%, 88% for the ICT; 86%, 93%, 94%, 85% for the paraSight and 88%, 87%, 88%, 87% for the Malaria IgG CELISA. The three assays failed to detect two positive samples with P. ovale and P. malariae. Assays were also compared with regard to the expense of equipment and reagents and speed and ease of use. The rapid ICT and ParaSight F test can be performed with minimal training and may be specially useful in areas where P. falciparum is the predominant malaria species, in epidemic malaria regions, and where skilled microscopy is not readily available.Performance of the OptiMAL assay for detection and identification of malaria infections in asymptomatic residents of Irian Jaya, Indonesia.The OptiMAL assay, a new immunochromatographic "dipstick" test for malaria based on detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), is purported to detect infections of approximately 200 parasites/microL of blood and to differentiate between Plasmodium falciparum and non-P. falciparum. We evaluated OptiMAL performance by comparing the test strip interpretations of two independent readers with consensus results obtained independently by expert malaria microscopists. Unbiased measures of sensitivity were derived by applying the OptiMAL test for detection and differentiation of light, asymptomatic infections by P. falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. OptiMAL readings were separated in time to determine whether the reaction signal was stable. Microscopy identified infections in 225 of 505 individuals screened; those with P. falciparum (n = 170) averaged 354 asexual forms/microL and P. vivax/Plasmodium malariae (n = 112) averaged 216 asexual forms/microL of blood. Concordance between OptiMAL and microscopy was 81% and 78% by the two independent readings. The assay's sensitivity for detection of any malaria species was 60.4% and 70.2% respectively and specificity was 97% and 89%. Most cases identified by microscopy as P. falciparum were graded as negative or non-falciparum by both OptiMAL readers. OptiMAL false negatives as well as misidentifications were related to low parasitemias (< 500/microL). The OptiMAL assay demonstrated 88-92% sensitivity for detecting infections of 500-1,000 parasites/microL, a range covering the mean parasitemia of primary symptomatic P. falciparum infections in malaria-naïve Indonesian transmigrants. This device was markedly less sensitive than expert microscopy for discriminating between malaria species and is presently unsuited for use as an epidemiological screening tool. The OptiMAL assay is not approved for diagnostic use but is commercially available for research purposes only.Rapid malaria tests: where do we go after 20 years?Great advances have been made in developing rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for diagnosing malaria. To date, RDTs present an exceedingly practical format for malaria diagnosis that outperforms traditional microscopy and more experimental next generation devices in the development pipeline. However, although use of such tests is accepted in principle, their actual use has lagged. Furthermore, study of how these tests perform, what their limitations are, and how to work with these limitations to still use them effectively has stagnated. We propose that the study and implementation of such RDTs should be aggressively advanced and propose a series of questions that can guide efforts.Comparison of the OptiMAL rapid test and microscopy for detection of malaria in pregnant women in Nigeria.Malaria during pregnancy causes anaemia in pregnant women and low birthweight in infants. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the OptiMAL rapid malaria test in comparison with standard microscopy for malaria diagnosis in 268 pregnant women attending antenatal clinics at the Jos University Teaching Hospital and the Federal Medical Centre-Gombe in Nigeria. Positive results by either method were confirmed using a polymerase chain reaction assay for malaria. Although the OptiMAL assay did not detect malaria in the blood of pregnant women with low levels of parasitaemia, it may be useful for the detection of placental malaria which predisposes to low birthweight infants.Field evaluation of the OptiMAL rapid malaria diagnostic test during anti-malarial therapy in Guyana.An assessment of the accuracy of clinical diagnosis, local microscopy and a rapid immunochromatographic card test in comparison with expert microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria in rural Kenya.Short report: Field evaluation of posttreatment sensitivity for monitoring parasite clearance of Plasmodium falciparum malaria by use of the Determine Malaria pf test in central India.The posttreatment performance of the Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein rapid diagnostic test Determine Malaria pf (Abbott Laboratories, Tokyo, Japan) was assessed in 70 patients in central India with uncomplicated falciparum malaria who were treated with chloroquine, sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine, and arteether. Data were compared with those of microscopy. Results revealed that the sensitivity for predicting recrudescence by means of the Determine test after treatment with chloroquine on Day 14 was 75%, with 50% specificity. However, antigenemia was detected in 16% of patients as late as Day 21 in sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine-treated subjects with a drug-sensitive response. Clearance of parasitemia in thick blood smear and clearance of antigenemia appeared to parallel each other only in arteether-treated subjects. The observed diagnostic trends therefore mean that the potential of the Determine test to detect recrudescent infection is limited.Rapid diagnostic testing for malaria.Malaria rapid diagnostic devices (MRDD) have been developed with the hope that they would offer accurate, reliable, rapid, cheap and easily available alternatives to traditional methods of malaria diagnosis. The results from early malaria rapid diagnostic studies were quite promising, especially for detecting Plasmodium falciparum at densities of more than 100-500 parasites/microl. Despite the introduction of these devices over a decade ago, only a few target antigens have been introduced. Of greater concern, these devices have shown limitations in sensitivity, ability to differentiate species and robustness under field conditions in the tropics. Recent trials have revealed wide variability in sensitivity both within and between products. We review the recent trials assessing MRDD use for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections in endemic and non-endemic countries and describe the various aspects of these devices which need further improvement. High quality, accurate, rapid and affordable diagnostic tools are urgently needed now that new antimalarial regimens, characterized by higher cost and increased toxicity, have been introduced more widely in response to emerging multi-drug resistance.Field trial of the RTM dipstick method for the rapid diagnosis of malaria based on the detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen in whole blood.The performance of the Quorum RapidTest Malaria (RTM) dipstick method that detects Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) antigen in whole blood was evaluated in a malaria endemic area. Results were compared with conventional Giemsa-stained blood films. Of 306 people tested 37.9% (116/306) were found to be parasitaemic; of these 66.4% (77/116) were P. vivax and 32.8% (38/116) were P. falciparum infections. There was only one (0.9%) mixed P. falciparum plus P. vivax infection. The RTM test was positive in 35/36 patients with P. falciparum identified on blood smear examination, resulting in a sensitivity of 97.2% [95% confidence interval (CI): 91.6-102.8%]. Specificity was 96.3% (95% CI: 93.9-98.6%). The RTM test had a positive predictive value of 77.8% (95% CI: 65.7-89.9%) and a negative predictive value of 99.6% (95% CI: 98.4-100.8%). Of the 10 false positives, seven reported recent malaria episode and treatment, indicating persistence of antigenaemia. If these were assumed truly infected, the positive predictive value is increased to 93.3% (95% CI: 85.8-100.8%). The RTM test was positive in all seven P. falciparum infections with gametocytes and one mixed infection, but was negative in all falciparum gametocytes and relapsing fever cases. All but one P. vivax infection gave negative result on the RTM test. The RTM test missed one patient with parasitaemia. The test is highly sensitive and specific requiring no instrument or trained personnel. It appears to be a very useful tool for rapid diagnosis of malaria, especially in the rural health institutions with limited diagnostic facilities.An exploratory study of factors that affect the performance and usage of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in the Limpopo Province, South Africa.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are relatively simple to perform and provide results quickly for making treatment decisions. However, the accuracy and application of RDT results depends on several factors such as quality of the RDT, storage, transport and end user performance. A cross sectional survey to explore factors that affect the performance and use of RDTs was conducted in the primary care facilities in South Africa.This study was conducted in three malaria risk sub-districts of the Limpopo Province, in South Africa. Twenty nurses were randomly selected from 17 primary health care facilities, three nurses from hospitals serving the study area and 10 other key informants, representing the managers of the malaria control programmes, routine and research laboratories, were interviewed, using semi-structured questionnaires.There was a high degree of efficiency in ordering and distribution of RDTs, however only 13/20 (65%) of the health facilities had appropriate air-conditioning and monitoring of room temperatures. Sixty percent (12/20) of the nurses did not receive any external training on conducting and interpreting RDT. Fifty percent of nurses (10/20) reported RDT stock-outs. Only 3/20 nurses mentioned that they periodically checked quality of RDT. Fifteen percent of nurses reported giving antimalarial drugs even if the RDT was negative.Storage, quality assurance, end user training and use of RDT results for clinical decision making in primary care facilities in South Africa need to be improved. Further studies of the factors influencing the quality control of RDTs, their performance of RDTs and the ways to improve their use of RDTs are needed.Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2-based immunocapture diagnostic assay for malaria: cross-reactivity with rheumatoid factors.Recently introduced rapid nonmicroscopic immunocapture assays for the diagnosis of malaria infection are being evaluated for their sensitivity and specificity in various epidemiological settings. A Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2)-based assay (ICT) and a Plasmodium-specific lactate dehydrogenase test (OptiMAL) were evaluated for their specificities in different groups of patients who tested negative for malaria infection by microscopy. The patients were selected from different disease groups: rheumatoid arthritis, hepatitis C, toxoplasmosis, schistosomiasis, and hydatid disease. One hundred thirty-three of the 225 patients were positive for rheumatoid factor. Thirty-five of the 133 (26%) rheumatoid factor-positive patients gave a false-positive reaction with the ICT assay, but only 4 of these gave false-positive reactions with the OptiMAL test. Thirty-three of the 35 false-positive specimens became negative when repeat tested with the ICT assay after absorbing out the rheumatoid factor activity. Our study shows that the PfHRP-2-based ICT assay gave a false-positive reaction in 26% of the patients who had rheumatoid factors, but were negative for malaria by microscopy.Comparison of two rapid, HRP2-based diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum.Evaluation of the Binax NOW ICT test versus polymerase chain reaction and microscopy for the detection of malaria in returned travelers.Microscopic detection of Plasmodium species has been the reference standard for the diagnosis of malaria for more than a century. However, maintaining a sufficient level of expertise in microscopic diagnosis can be challenging, particularly in non-endemic countries. The objective of this study was to compare a new rapid malaria diagnostic device (NOW ICT Malaria Test; Binax, Inc., Portland, ME) to polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and expert microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria in 256 febrile returned travelers. Compared with PCR, the NOW ICT test showed a sensitivity of 94% for the detection of P. falciparum malaria (96% for pure P. falciparum infection) and 84% for non-P. falciparum infections (87% for pure P. vivax infections and 62% for pure P. ovale and P. malariae infections), with an overall specificity of 99%. The Binax NOW ICT may represent a useful adjunct for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in febrile returned travelers.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test for assessing the burden of malaria at delivery in India.All pregnant women who came for delivery at a district hospital in Mandla and a civil hospital in Maihar were screened for Plasmodium falciparum (placental parasitemia using a rapid test and microscopy and peripheral and umbilical cord parasitemia using microscopy alone). Two rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), Paracheck Pf and ParaHITf, were used. At Mandla, the sensitivity and specificity of the Paracheck Pf for P. falciparum were 93% and 84%, respectively. The positive predictive values (PPVs) and negative predictive values (NPVs) were 50% and 99%, respectively. At Maihar, the sensitivity and specificity of the ParaHITf for P. falciparum were 87.5% and 97%, respectively. The PPVs and NPVs were 75.4% and 98.7%, respectively. Placental infection was significantly associated with low birth weight. The RDTs for the identification of P. falciparum were more sensitive in placental blood than the placental blood smear by microscopy. Thus, the RDTs should be useful for rapid assessment of malaria at delivery.Out with the old, in with the new: the utility of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria diagnosis in Africa.After many years of development, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria are now being rolled out in many African countries to support the introduction of artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACT). RDTs create new opportunities both for improved care and as research tools, but it is important that the research agenda continues to address the many challenges, both operational and technical, that still need to be met. Here we review what is known and what new evidence is needed to maximise the utility of RDTs in Africa.Role of the Parasight-F test in the diagnosis of complicated Plasmodium falciparum malarial infection.An evaluation was made of the diagnostic efficacy and utility of the Parasight-F test in diagnosing Plasmodium falciparum malaria, compared with conventional microscopy, particularly in severe and complicated cases. This study was designed as a prospective, case control hospital-based study. Febrile patients suspected to be suffering from malaria were selected randomly and were subjected to peripheral smear examinations (thick and thin) and Parasight-F tests till the required number of at least 30 cases of P. falciparum infection were identified, including at least 15 complicated cases. In addition 20 cases of P. vivax malarial infection as well as 20 healthy age and sex-matched individuals were taken as two control groups. The outcome measure was the number of cases with positive Parasight-F test results compared with conventional microscopy. Thirty-two patients with P. falciparum malaria were identified, with 15 severe and complicated cases. Peripheral smears were positive in 29 (91%) of these, while parasight-F test was positive in 31 out of 32 (97%) cases. Parasites were detected only by bone marrow examination in one case. Diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of peripheral smears for detecting falciparum infection were 90.6% and 100% respectively while that of the Parasight-F test were 96.8% and 100%, respectively (P>.05). The Parasight-F test has high sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing P. falciparum malarial infection, comparable to or even higher than microscopy exams, particularly in severe and complicated cases, with additional advantages of speed, simplicity and objectivity.Invalid result of Plasmodium falciparum malaria detection with the BinaxNOW Malaria rapid diagnostic test.Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase assay to detect malarial parasites.Microscopic examination of blood smears remains the gold standard for the diagnosis of malaria. However, it is labour-intensive and requires skilled operators. Immunochromatographic dipstick assays provide a potential alternative. One such dipstick, the Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase assay (pLDH), is based on detection of the Plasmodium intracellular metabolic enzyme, LDH. The differentiation of malarial parasites is based on the antigenic differences between the pLDH isoforms. This study was designed to assess the sensitivity and specificity of pLDH assays in detecting and differentiating between various malarial species compared with microscopy.Blood samples (n = 124) submitted to our laboratory for routine diagnosis of malaria were included in this study. From each blood sample, two thin films and a quantitative buffy coat (QBC) were made for microscopy. Thin films were stained with Giemsa and acridine orange. The pLDH assay was performed on all the samples according to the manufacturer's instructions.Of the 124 blood samples, 84 were negative by all methods (Giemsa, acridine orange, QBC and pLDH assay). Of the 38 samples positive for Plasmodium falciparum on microscopy, pLDH assay correctly identified 36 at parasite counts as low as < 40 parasites/microl and had a sensitivity and specificity of 94.3% and 97.6%, respectively. Of the 21 samples positive for Plasmodium vivax, pLDH assay correctly identified 19 at parasite counts as low as < 80/microl, and had a sensitivity and specificity of 90.4% and 100%, respectively. However, it failed to identify two Plasmodium vivax infections at parasite counts of 5000/microl and > 200/microl, suggesting that plasmodial gene deletions could be responsible for non-expression of pLDH.Our data demonstrate that pLDH assay, given its accuracy, rapidity (10-15 minutes), ease of performance and interpretation, can be a useful tool for the detection of malaria in countries where both plasmodial species are co-endemic and where laboratory support is limited.Evaluation of a dipstick test for the rapid diagnosis of imported malaria among patients presenting within the network TropNetEurop.Lack of experience on the part of involved laboratory personnel frequently complicates swift diagnosis of imported falciparum malaria in non-endemic areas. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 have been marketed for several years and have been extensively evaluated. Recently, a test kit capable of detecting antigen of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax has been introduced. In order to evaluate this newly available tool, specimens from 664 patients were screened during the course of a prospective multicentre study within the European Network on Imported Infectious Disease Surveillance (TropNetEurop). Among the screened specimens, samples from 82 patients (12.3%) were positive for falciparum malaria using expert microscopy. A further 17 samples were positive for vivax malaria. The evaluated test kit performed with a sensitivity of 87.8% and a specificity of 99% for detection of falciparum malaria. Respective values for vivax malaria were 76.5% and 100%. Dipstick tests have the potential of improving the speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, especially if non-specialized laboratories are involved. However, decreased values of sensitivity and specificity, in comparison with expert microscopy, still impose a clear limit on the usefulness of the currently available kits.Antigen capture immuno-chromatographic strip format in detecting parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase to diagnose malaria in nonimmune patients.Several rapid diagnostic test devices (RDT) based on detection of malaria antigen in the whole blood were developed. OptiMal test the presence of parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) enzyme using three monoclonal antibodies was used. Two monoclonal antibodies were pan-specific and recognized all malaria species. The third one was specific only for Plasmodium falciparum. The parasite antigens were detected using an antigen-capture immunochromatographic strip format. One hundred-nine malaria positive and 730 malaria negative cases diagnosed by microscopy were included. 75/109 were P. falciparum 26 as P. vivax, 3 P. malariae and 5 mixed infection of P. falciparum & P. vivax. The RDT showed a low sensitivity (85%, 95% Confidence Interval [CI], 79-92%) with a much lower sensitivity in detecting species other than P. falciparum as well as in mixed infections. The sensitivity was 50% for less than 200 parasites/micro. The sensitivity of OptiMal for P. falciparum was 87% (95% CI, 79-94), 81% (95% CI, 66-96) for P. vivax, and failed with P. malariae. Mixed infections were misdiagnosed as Pfalciparum. The sensitivity of OptiMal was quite good in detecting both P. falciparum & P. vivax (98%; 95% CI, 97-99 & 100%; 95% CI, 100-100 respectively) and 99% (95% CI, 98-99) for all species. The positive and negative ratio for all malaria species was: (+LR = 62.3, -LR = 0.01); for P. falciparum (+LR = 38.9, -LR = 0.01) and for P. vivax (+LR = 0.8077/0, -LR = 0.2). The test value to assess drug resistance in post treatment days was discussed.Operational accuracy and comparative persistent antigenicity of HRP2 rapid diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum malaria in a hyperendemic region of Uganda.Parasite-based diagnosis of malaria by microscopy requires laboratory skills that are generally unavailable at peripheral health facilities. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) require less expertise, but accuracy under operational conditions has not been fully evaluated in Uganda. There are also concerns about RDTs that use the antigen histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) to detect Plasmodium falciparum, because this antigen can persist after effective treatment, giving false positive test results in the absence of infection. An assessment of the accuracy of Malaria Pf immuno-chromatographic test (ICT) and description of persistent antigenicity of HRP2 RDTs was undertaken in a hyperendemic area of Uganda.Using a cross-sectional design, a total of 357 febrile patients of all ages were tested using ICT, and compared to microscopy as the gold standard reference. Two independent RDT readings were used to assess accuracy and inter-observer reliability. With a longitudinal design to describe persistent antigenicity of ICT and Paracheck, 224 children aged 6-59 months were followed up at 7-day intervals until the HRP2 antigens where undetectable by the RDTs.Of the 357 patients tested during the cross-sectional component, 40% (139) had positive blood smears for asexual forms of P. falciparum. ICT had an overall sensitivity of 98%, a specificity of 72%, a negative predictive value (NPV) of 98% and a positive predictive value (PPV) of 69%. ICT showed a high inter-observer reliability under operational conditions, with 95% of readings having assigned the same results (kappa statistics 0.921, p < 0.001). In children followed up after successful antimalaria treatment, the mean duration of persistent antigenicity was 32 days, and this duration varied significantly depending on pre-treatment parasitaemia. In patients with parasite density >50,000/microl, the mean duration of persistent antigenicity was 37 days compared to 26 days for parasitaemia less than 1,000/microl (log rank 21.9, p < 0.001).ICT is an accurate and appropriate test for operational use as a diagnostic tool where microscopy is unavailable. However, persistent antigenicity reduces the accuracy of this and other HRP2-based RDTs. The low specificity continues to be of concern, especially in children below five years of age. These pose limitations that need consideration, such as their use for diagnosis of patients returning with symptoms within two to four weeks of treatment. Good clinical skills are essential to interpret test results.Rapid diagnostic tests for the home-based management of malaria, in a high-transmission area.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) are sometimes recommended to improve the home-based management of malaria. The accuracy of an RDT for the detection of clinical malaria and the presence of malarial parasites has recently been evaluated in a high-transmission area of southern Mali. During the same study, the cost-effectiveness of a 'test-and-treat' strategy for the home-based management of malaria (based on an artemisinin-combination therapy) was compared with that of a 'treat-all' strategy. Overall, 301 patients, of all ages, each of whom had been considered a presumptive case of uncomplicated malaria by a village healthworker, were checked with a commercial RDT (Paracheck-Pf). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of this test, compared with the results of microscopy and two different definitions of clinical malaria, were then determined. The RDT was found to be 82.9% sensitive (with a 95% confidence interval of 78.0%-87.1%) and 78.9% (63.9%-89.7%) specific compared with the detection of parasites by microscopy. In the detection of clinical malaria, it was 95.2% (91.3%-97.6%) sensitive and 57.4% (48.2%-66.2%) specific compared with a general practitioner's diagnosis of the disease, and 100.0% (94.5%-100.0%) sensitive but only 30.2% (24.8%-36.2%) specific when compared against the fulfillment of the World Health Organization's (2003) research criteria for uncomplicated malaria. Among children aged 0-5 years, the cost of the 'test-and-treat' strategy, per episode, was about twice that of the 'treat-all' (U.S.$1.0. v. U.S.$0.5). In older subjects, however, the two strategies were equally costly (approximately U.S.$2/episode). In conclusion, for children aged 0-5 years in a high-transmission area of sub-Saharan Africa, use of the RDT was not cost-effective compared with the presumptive treatment of malaria with an ACT. In older patients, use of the RDT did not reduce costs. The question remains whether either of the strategies investigated can be made affordable for the affected population.Diagnostic and prognostic utility of rapid strip (OptiMal and Paracheck) versus conventional smear microscopy in adult patients of acute, uncomplicated P. falciparum malaria in Mumbai, India.The present study compared the diagnostic and prognostic utility of two rapid tests the (Paracheck and OptiMal) versus conventional smear microscopy.Using two independent microscopists we carried out the three tests in 31 adult cases of smear positive, acute, uncomplicated Plasmodium falciparum malaria. All three tests were done pretreatment, and on Days 8, 15 and 29.Compared to microscopy, the Paracheck had a sensitivity of 100%, while the OptiMal had a sensitivity of 83.7%. The lower sensitivity of OptiMal resulted from misidentification by both microscopists of 6/31 cases as Plasmodium vivax. As a follow up tool, the OptiMal was better than Paracheck, due to the earlier disappearance of the parasite LDH. Also in the Paracheck, between microscopists, there was a significant difference in reading the tests, on Days 8 and 15.Our study reiterates, the continued utility of conventional smear microscopy.Field trial of the direct acridine orange method and ParaSight-F test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria at district hospitals in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.Assessment of malaria in pregnancy using rapid diagnostic tests and its association with HIV infection and hematologic parameters in South-Eastern Nigeria.P. falciparum malaria in pregnancy was evaluated using histidine-rich proteins-2 RDT and related to HIV infection and hematologic parameters. Prevalence of malaria, HIV and anemia were 19.7%, 3.1% and 17.2% respectively. Primigravidae were significantly more infected with malaria. Malaria was not significantly associated with anemia, blood group, genotype and HIV infection.Should countries implementing an artemisinin-based combination malaria treatment policy also introduce rapid diagnostic tests?Within the context of increasing antimalarial costs and or decreasing malaria transmission, the importance of limiting antimalarial treatment to only those confirmed as having malaria parasites becomes paramount. This motivates for this assessment of the cost-effectiveness of routine use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) as an integral part of deploying artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACTs).The costs and cost-effectiveness of using RDTs to limit the use of ACTs to those who actually have Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia in two districts in southern Mozambique were assessed. To evaluate the potential impact of introducing definitive diagnosis using RDTs (costing $0.95), five scenarios were considered, assuming that the use of definitive diagnosis would find that between 25% and 75% of the clinically diagnosed malaria patients are confirmed to be parasitaemic. The base analysis compared two ACTs, artesunate plus sulfadoxine/pyrimethamine (AS+SP) costing $1.77 per adult treatment and artemether-lumefantrine (AL) costing $2.40 per adult treatment, as well as the option of restricting RDT use to only those older than six years. Sensitivity analyses considered lower cost ACTs and RDTs and different population age distributions.Compared to treating patients on the basis of clinical diagnosis, the use of RDTs in all clinically diagnosed malaria cases results in cost savings only when 29% and 52% or less of all suspected malaria cases test positive for malaria and are treated with AS+SP and AL, respectively. These cut-off points increase to 41.5% (for AS+SP) and to 74% (for AL) when the use of RDTs is restricted to only those older than six years of age. When 25% of clinically diagnosed patients are RDT positive and treated using AL, there are cost savings per malaria positive patient treated of up to $2.12. When more than 29% of clinically diagnosed cases are malaria test positive, the incremental cost per malaria positive patient treated is less than US$1. When relatively less expensive ACTs are introduced (e.g. current WHO preferential price for AL of $1.44 per adult treatment), the RDT price to the healthcare provider should be $0.65 or lower for RDTs to be cost saving in populations with between 30 and 52% of clinically diagnosed malaria cases being malaria test positive.While the use of RDTs in all suspected cases has been shown to be cost-saving when parasite prevalence among clinically diagnosed malaria cases is low to moderate, findings show that targeting RDTs at the group older than six years and treating children less than six years on the basis of clinical diagnosis is even more cost-saving. In semi-immune populations, young children carry the highest risk of severe malaria and many healthcare providers would find it harder to deny antimalarials to those who test negative in this age group.[Concordance between thick blood smear, immunochromatography and polymerase chain reaction for malaria diagnosis].The rapid and effective diagnosis of malaria is the determining condition for an appropriate treatment and control of the disease.The sensitivity, specificity and the positive and negative predictive values were evaluated in cases of suspected malaria in Colombia in a comparison of a rapid diagnostic test. the PCR test and the thick blood smear-the traditional gold standard.A group of 100 patients with symptoms compatible with malaria, were included in the study. They were selected from the following Colombian regions: Urabá, Córdoba, lower Cauca, and relatively fewer from other malaria endemic areas of Colombia including the provinces of Valle, Chocó in the central west of Colombia and Vichada to the east. To each patient the following three tests were performed: the rapid OptiMAL test, the PCR identification and the thick blood smear. The PCR amplified specific DNA sequences with primers designed to identify the genus Plasmodium, and the two species present in Colombia, P. falciparum and P. vivax.The sensitivity of the rapid test versus the thick smear, for the diagnosis of both species of Plasmodium was 93.9% (95% CI: 87-100%) and the specificity was 94.3% (95% CI:.253 85-100%). The PCR compared with the thick smear showed a sensitivity of 100% (95% CI: 99-100%) and a specificity of 97.1% (95% CI: 90-100%).The sensitivity and specificity of the three tests did not present statistically significant differences. However, the thick blood smear was recommended as the standard test, mainly due to its low cost.PfHRP2 and PfLDH antigen detection for monitoring the efficacy of artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) in the treatment of uncomplicated falciparum malaria.An assessment of the accuracy of two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) or Pf lactate dehydrogenase (PfLDH) was undertaken in children aged between six and 59 months included in an anti-malarial efficacy study in Benin.In Allada (Benin), 205 children aged 6-59 months with falciparum malaria received either artesunate-amodiaquine (ASAQ), artemether-lumefantrine (AL), or sulphadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP). Children included in the study were simultaneously followed by both RDT and high-quality microscopy for up to 42 days.At the time of inclusion, PfHRP2-based tests were positive in 203 children (99%) and PfLDH-based tests were positive in 204 (99.5%). During follow-up, independent of the treatment received, only 17.3% (28/162) of children effectively cured were negative with the PfHRP2 RDT at day 3, with a gradual increase in specificity until day 42. The specificity of antigen detection with the PfLDH test was 87% (141/162) on day 3, and between 92% and 100% on days 7 to 42. A statistical difference was observed between the persistence of PfHRP2 and PfLDH antigenaemia during follow-up in children treated with artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) but not with SP.Although both RDTs are as sensitive as microscopy in detecting true malaria cases, the PfHRP2 RDT had very low specificity during follow-up until day 28. On the other hand, the PfLDH test could be used to detect failures and, therefore, to assess anti-malarial efficacy.Comparison of two commercial assays with expert microscopy for confirmation of symptomatically diagnosed malaria.Conventional light microscopy has been the established method for malaria diagnosis. However, recently several nonmicroscopic rapid diagnostic tests have been developed for situations in which reliable microscopy may not be available. This study was conducted to evaluate the diagnostic performance of a recently introduced ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test. This assay detects Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 antigen (PfHRP-2) for P. falciparum diagnosis and pan-malarial antigen for P. vivax diagnosis. In this study we compared the performance of ICT Malaria Pf/Pv with microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood films and with an OptiMAL test that detects Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) antigen. A total of 750 clinically suspected malaria patients were examined at local health centers in Kuwait. Both the antigen tests had a high degree of specificity (>98%) for detection of malaria infection. However, they were less sensitive than microscopy. Compared with microscopy the ICT Malaria PF/pf test failed to detect malaria infection in 93 (34%) of 271 malaria patients (11% of patients with P. falciparum and 37% of patients with P. vivax) and the OptiMAL test failed to detect malaria infection in 41 (15%) of 271 malaria patients (7% of patients with P. falciparum and 13% of patients with P. vivax). The sensitivities of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL tests for detection of P. falciparum infection were 81 and 87%, and those for detecting P. vivax were 58 to 79%, respectively. The sensitivity of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL tests decreased significantly to 23 and 44%, respectively, at parasite densities of <500/ micro l. Both of the tests also produced a number of false-positive results. Overall, the performance of the OptiMAL test was better than that of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test. However, our results raise particular concern over the sensitivity of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test for detection of P. vivax infection. Further developments appear necessary to improve the performance of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test.[Evaluation of ICT malaria immunochromatographic Binax NOW ICT P.f/P.v test for rapid diagnosis of malaria in a Colombian endemic area].One of the strategies to reduce malarial morbidity and mortality is to make an early diagnosis, using simple rapid tests which are highly sensitive and specific. Furthermore, the tests must be easy to perform and understand by local people in such a way that a suitable and prompt antimalarial treatment is guaranteed.The sensitivity and specificity was determined for the immuno-chromographic malaria dipstick (ICT Pf/Pv) test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria in Turbo, Antioquia.The sample consisted of 171 patients distributed into two groups: the first group was 118 patients with acute febrile syndrome compatible with malaria to which ICT Pf/Pv and thick smears were applied simultaneously; a second group was 53 patients with positive diagnosis by thick smear, with follow-up on the 4th and 7th days after beginning treatment.Sensitivity and specificity of the ICT Pf/Pv test for Plasmodium falciparum infections were 54.2% (95%CI: 52.0-53.4%) and 93.6% (95%CI: 93.1-94.2%), respectively. In addition, for Plasmodium vivax the sensitivity and specificity were 80% (95%CI: 77.9-82.1%) and 100% (95%CI: 99.5-100%); there was a 21.4% loss of sensitivity for P. falciparum 21.4% and a 33% loss for P. vivax malaria with parasitaemias under 500 parasites/ul. For the confirmatory test, ICT Pf/Pv showed a global sensitivity of 71.6% with 20.7% false positive and 5.6% false negative results. During follow-up, ICT showed 36% and 34% false positive results for day 4 and 7, respectively.The ICT Pf/Pv test has a poor sensitivity for P. falciparum malaria and its capacity to detect parasitemias under 500 parasites/ul is minimal. As a confirmatory test, the ICT Pf/Pv has a good sensitivity for P. falciparum. Its use for patient follow-up is not recommended.Performance of the Now Malaria rapid diagnostic test with returned travellers: a 2-year retrospective study in a French teaching hospital.Malaria caused by Plasmodium falciparum remains the major life-threatening parasitic infection in the world. The number of cases in non-endemic countries continues to increase, and it is important that misdiagnosis of malaria should not occur, especially in non-immune travellers, because of the high risk of a fatal outcome. In a retrospective study of 399 sera, the Now Malaria rapid test was compared with the quantitative buffy coat (QBC) test and microbiological examination of thin blood films. Compared with the QBC test and thin blood films, the Now Malaria test had sensitivity and specificity values of 96.4% and 97%, respectively, for the detection of pure P. falciparum infection. A negative predictive value of 99.4% allows this test to be included in diagnostic strategies for patients presenting with clinical suspicion of malaria. Two false-negative results were associated with low levels of parasitaemia in the specimens. Thus, use of the Now Malaria test alone to detect P. falciparum infection in non-endemic countries could lead to misdiagnosis of malaria. This rapid diagnostic test should therefore be performed in association with another prompt traditional method such as examination of thin blood films.Post treatment sensitivity studies with the ParaSight-F test for malaria diagnosis in Zimbabwe.The post-treatment diagnostic performance of the Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein (HRP-II) antigen detection test, ParaSight-F test, was assessed on 55 falciparum malaria cases treated with chloroquine during in vivo drug sensitivity studies. The post-treatment sensitivity of the test remained high, except for an insignificant decline on day 1. However, specificity dropped sharply by day 1, subsequently increasing linearly with time to satisfactory values by day 10. As expected, from its inverse relationship to specificity, the false positive rate was high on day 1 and decreased linearly to low level by day 10. The temporary increase in false positive rate-following treatment was due to persistent parasite antigen, rather than subpatent parasitaemia. Thus findings showed that positive readings by the test within 10 days post-treatment may occur in cured cases and will not necessarily imply treatment failure. Furthermore it will be important to take patient antimalarial history into consideration during routine usage of the test for malaria diagnosis. The trend of Youden's J-index for the ParaSight-F test showed that from 10 days post-treatment, the test was generally reliable, with positive readings indicating active infection. It was concluded that the ParaSight-F test was not only valuable at confirming malaria diagnosis on clinical cases in seasonal transmission areas, but had potential for application to detect recrudescent infections within 2 weeks of chloroquine treatment.Performance of an immunochromatography test for vivax malaria in the Amazon region, Brazil.The study was carried out to evaluate the diagnostic performance of the ICT malaria Pf/Pv test for vivax malaria diagnosis in Bel m, Amazon region, Brazil. The results of blood malaria parasites examination using an immunochromatography test were compared with thick blood film (TBF) examination. It was also evaluated the performance of this test storaged at three different temperatures (25 degree C, 30 degree C, and 37 degree C) for 24 hours before use. Overall sensitivity of ICT Pf/Pv was 61.8% with a specificity of 100%, positive and negative predictive value of 100% and 71.8%, respectively and accuracy of 80.6%. The test sensitivity was independent of the parasite density. This test needs to be further reviewed in order to have better performance for P. vivax malaria diagnosis.Evaluation of rapid immunocapture assays for diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax in Korea.The rapid immunocapture assays, OptiMal and ICT, were evaluated from 87 individuals for the diagnosis of malaria infections directly from whole blood. A total of 87 individuals was examined for malaria parasites by microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood smears, and 65 cases were positive for Plasmodium vivax by microscopy. Correspondingly, the OptiMal test identified malaria infection in 45 cases (69.2%) of microscopy positive cases. Of these, two cases were misinterpreted as Plasmodium falciparum, whereas ICT detected P. vivax infection in 29 (44.6%) patients. We would like to propose that rapid immuno capture assays are an easy method that can serve as a useful tool in addition to microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria, but sensitivity is not yet satisfactory for diagnosis of P. vivax in Korea.Glutamate dehydrogenase antigen detection in Plasmodium falciparum infections.The usefulness of malaria diagnosis by Plasmodium falciparum GDH (NADP+), obtained by affinity chromatography, is demonstrated in ELISA assays, testing IgG antibodies against GDH (NADP+) from patients with acute malaria, who have had two or more episodes of malaria, or from sera of hyperimmune patients. GDH (NADP+) thermal stability was demonstrated in a high heat resistance assay. The immunofluorescence assay demonstrated that anti-culture (P. falciparum) supernatant serum and anti-GDH (NADP+) of Proteus spp. recognized epitopes in Venezuelan isolates, and Colombian and Brasilian malarial strains. The antigen is soluble, with high specificity, is a potent immunogen and is thermoresistant.Is molecular biology the best alternative for diagnosis of malaria to microscopy? A comparison between microscopy, antigen detection and molecular tests in rural Kenya and urban Tanzania.To assess the agreement of different diagnostic methods for the diagnosis and confirmation of the clinical suspicion of Plasmodium infection in children in Tanzania and Kenya.Blood samples were collected by the finger prick method from 338 children. Blood samples were collected from 338 children with the clinical suspicion of uncomplicated malaria in health clinics in Tanzania and Kenya. The presence of Plasmodium parasites was assessed with microscopy, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and the molecular assays, quantitative nucleic acid sequence based amplification (QT-NASBA) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). The results were compared and analysed for agreement.There was a high degree of agreement (88.6-100%) between RDTs or molecular tests and microscopy. In rural Kenya, with a high incidence of malaria cases, the correlation coefficient ranged from 0.94 for RDTs to 0.76 for PCR. In urban Tanzania, where there was a low incidence of cases, R for RDTs was 1.0 but only 0.25 for PCR and 0.33 for NASBA.Malaria is overestimated if the diagnosis is based solely on clinical signs. Therefore, laboratory confirmation is essential. Microscopy is a reliable method in rural areas where malaria is prevalent, but RDTs offer a good alternative with the advantage that it is an easy and rapid method. Molecular tests are more sensitive but difficult to implement in rural areas. In areas with lower incidence, molecular tests detect a significantly higher number of Plasmodium infections than RDTs or microscopy. Although implementation of molecular tools can be difficult, the prospect of an easy and cheap detection system makes them promising tools for the near future.Field evaluation of the ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. immunochromatographic test in India.[Imported malaria: diagnostic traps and rapid tests].Imported malaria is a disease prevalent in France: 6,000 to 8,000 cases a year, of which 15% are pediatric cases. Despite this high incidence, the diagnosis is often delayed. The patient may then evolve to a severe form. This diagnostic delay is due to non-specific clinical symptoms in children. The most common symptoms are fever and digestive disorders (diarrhea, vomiting). In the absence of thrombocytopenia, the laboratory tests are not very useful for diagnosis. Parasitological examinations are dependent on the experience of the biologist, particularly in cases of low parasitemia as those observed in children who have received partial chemoprophylaxis. The recent introduction of rapid tests based on the detection of Plasmodium proteins, allows emergency remedy to this problem. The blood smears remains the gold standard and has to be used to confirm the results of rapid tests. If rapid tests improve the detection of Plasmodium in 2009, it remains mandatory to evoke the diagnosis of malaria in any febrile child coming from an endemic area.[Efficiency of KAT-quick P.f. test (KAT medical, SAR) among the populations of drug-resistant parasites].The KAT-Quick P.f. test (KAT Medical, South African Republic) is based on the detection of protein HPR II produced by trophozoites and young gametocytes of P. falciparum. This test was conducted by the authors in the distribution areas of P. falciparum strains differing in the spectrum of drug resistance. Five hundred and forty-nine blood samples from febrile patients in Vietnam (n=84), Sierra Leone (n=41), Nigeria (n=14), Tanzania (n=8), Kenya (n=5), and Tadjikistan (n=397) were tested. Microscopy served as a primary control. Detection of P. falciparum DNA, using polymerase chain reaction (PCR) with included primers (nested PCR) of the most sensitive modification of PCR was a final control. The efficiency of the KAT-Quick P.f. test was estimated as a ratio of the number of its positive results to those of PCR. It was equal to 98-95%. The KAT-Quick P.f. test revealed no false-positive case associated with the genome of the parasite. The specificity of the test was determined as a ratio of the number of its negative (no P. falciparum) results to those of PCR. The blood samples from patients with vivax malaria and from those with nonmalarial fever were investigated. There was no cross reaction of the KAT-Quick P.f. test system for P. falciparum with that for P. vivax. The KAT-Quick P.f. test yielded no positive reaction with the blood from patients with non-malarial fever. Drug resistance depending on the spectrum of specific drugs caused its emergence may be determined by one or several mechanisms that are ultimately determined by one, the key mechanism. Thus, the findings suggest that multidrug resistance of P. falciparum does not trigger the occurrence of changes in its surface antigen--HRPII that is responsible for the efficiency of the KAT-Quick P.f. test. These may be also extrapolated to other rapid tests patterned after the same principle.Malaria diagnosis under field conditions in the Venezuelan Amazon.To improve practical, accurate diagnosis of malaria in the Amazon rainforest of Venezuela, two rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) (OptiMAL-IT) and FalciVax) and a laboratory light microscope, used in the field with a battery-operated head lamp as an external light source, were evaluated against the standard laboratory microscope procedure for malaria detection. One hundred and thirty-six Yanomami patients were studied for the presence of malaria parasites. Thirty-three patients (24%) were positive for malaria (Plasmodium falciparum, P. vivax, P. malariae). Twenty-one (64%) of the positive patients had <100 parasites/microl. Both RDTs showed poor sensitivity (24.2% for OptiMAL-IT) and 36.4% for FalciVax) but good specificity (99% both for OptiMAL-IT) and FalciVax). Field and laboratory microscopy showed sensitivities of 94% and 91%, respectively. The kappa coefficient was 0.90, indicating a high agreement between field and laboratory microscopy. We conclude that (i) adequate slide reading cannot be substituted by either of the two RDTs in the Venezuelan Amazon and (ii) the use of a light source such as that described above makes slide reading more feasible than hitherto in remote areas without electricity.[Diagnosis of Falciparum malaria by immunochromatographic test].To evaluate the applicability of rapid immunochromatographic test(ICT) for diagnosing falciparum malaria in outpatient clinics in endemic area.With thick blood smear method as control, ICT was used for the detection of P. falciparum.The sensitivity and specificity of ICT in detecting P. falciparum was 94.7% and 90.3%, respectively. No cross-reaction with P. vivax was found (P > 0.05).ICT is much more rapid and simple than thick blood smear method for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, and can be applied in the outpatient clinics in endemic area.An assessment of the usefulness of a rapid immuno-chromatographic test, "Determine trade mark malaria pf" in evaluation of intervention measures in forest villages of central India.Plasmodium falciparum malaria, is a major health problem in forested tribal belt of central India. Rapid and accurate methods are needed for the diagnosis of P. falciparum. We performed a blinded evaluation of the recently introduced Determine trade mark malaria pf test (Abbott, Laboratories, Japan) compared with microscopy and splenomegaly in children in epidemic prone areas of district Mandla to assess the impact of intervention measures.Children aged 2-10 yrs with and without fever were examined for spleen enlargement by medical specialist by establishing a mobile field clinic. From these children thick blood smears were prepared from finger prick and read by a technician. Simultaneously, rapid tests were performed by a field lab attendant. The figures for specificity, sensitivity and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.In all 349 children were examined. The sensitivity and specificity for Determine rapid diagnostic test were 91 and 80% respectively. The positive predictive values (PPV), negative predictive values (NPV) and accuracy of the test were respectively 79, 91 and 85%. On the contrary, the sensitivity and specificity of spleen in detecting malaria infection were 57 and 74 % respectively with PPV of 73%, NPV 59 % and an accuracy of 65%.Determine trade mark malaria rapid diagnostic test is easier and quicker to perform and has other advantages over microscopy in not requiring prior training of personnel or quality control. Thus, highlighting the usefulness of a rapid antigen test in assessing prevailing malaria situation in remote areas.Evaluation of a rapid test for histidine rich protein 2 for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Cameroonian children.[ParaSight F in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria].The ParaSight F is a new diagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum infections and is based on the detection of a trophozoite-derived antigen, the histidine rich protein II (HRP-II). To assess the usefulness of this test, we conducted a prospective study and analyzed 62 blood specimens from 38 patients, using thin blood films, thick blood films and the ParaSight F test. Compared to thick blood film, on samples taken before and during treatment, the ParaSight F test had 86.4% sensitivity and 100% specificity. In 31.5% of P. falciparum infected patients, parasitemia was lower than 1 parasite/1000 red blood cells, with all specimens being positive by the ParaSight F test. In 15 cases, specimens were negative by thin blood film, but were positive by thick blood film and by the ParaSight F test. Two patients had, after their treatment was started, positive results by ParaSight F and negative results by thick blood film. Cross-reactivity occurred neither with other Plasmodium species, nor in cases of severe inflammatory syndrome. Persistence of antigenemia was monitored in 14 patients receiving quinine. At day five of treatment, antigenemia persisted in seven patients. In conclusion, the ParaSight F test does not allow following up the efficacy of treatment, identifying other Plasmodium species, or assessing parasitemia. However, because this test is easy to perform and has good sensitivity and specificity, it is a useful tool in emergent context, in cases of parasitemia lower than the thin blood film threshold, and in cases morphologically difficult to decipher.Monitoring malaria control in Khammouane province, Laos: an active case detection survey of Plasmodium falciparum malaria using the Paracheck rapid diagnostic test.In Khammouane province, Laos, over 5000 slide-positive malaria cases were reported at local health facilities in 1997. To combat the spread of malaria, insecticide-treated nets (ITNs) and community health education were provided to the people in this province by the Lao Ministry of Health and the Japan International Cooperation Agency. In order to document the current malaria situation, an active case detection (ACD) survey using rapid diagnostic tests was conducted at 23 sites from June to July, the rainy season, in 2005. A total of 1711 villagers from 403 households participated in the survey. The proportion of positive cases was 0.7% (12/1711) with a range in each village of 0-8.2%. The low infection rate observed in this ACD survey was consistent with the decrease in the number of slide-positive malaria cases at local health facilities (from over 5000 cases to 536 cases), indicating the substantial progress made in malaria control. Although the reduction of malaria cases can be attributed to multiple factors, continued promotion of the proper use of ITNs as well as community-based testing and treatment services, especially in remote areas, may lead to a further reduction of malaria cases in the province.Bedside diagnosis of imported malaria using the Binax Now malaria antigen detection test.Malaria may be misdiagnosed in non-endemic countries when the necessary experience for rapid expert microscopy is lacking. Rapid diagnostic tests may improve the diagnosis and may play a role as a bedside diagnostic tool. In a multicentre study we recruited patients suspected of malaria over a period of 14 months. The Binax Now Malaria rapid test was used at the bedside and in the clinical microbiology laboratory. The training of clinical staff was monitored and their experience with the use of the test was recorded. 542 patients were included, 80 of whom had malaria diagnosed by microscopy. The rapid test used at the bedside had a sensitivity of 88% for the detection of P. falciparum compared to 95% when the test was performed in the microbiology laboratory. The risk of technical problems and invalid tests was highest when the test was used at the bedside. The rapid diagnostic test may be useful for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria when used by routine laboratory staff, but could lead to misdiagnoses when used at the bedside. Microscopy is still essential in order to identify the few missed diagnoses, to determine the degree of parasitaemia, and to ensure species diagnosis, including mixed infections.Development and evaluation of an immunochromatographic kit for the detection of antibody to Plasmodium vivax infection in South Korea.Malaria is a major parasitic disease in tropical areas. Three to five hundred million people suffer from the disease and it kill a million people per year. Blood smear observation was developed for the diagnosis of malaria, but the examination needs skilled experts and exact diagnosis is time consuming. A kit based on immunochromatography can be a reliable and rapid method for clinical diagnosis, even in the hands of inexperienced personnel. However, all such currently developed kits can only diagnose P. falciparum malaria. In our previous report, the C-terminal region of P. vivax merozoite surface protein 1 (PvcMSP) was cloned and expressed in E. coli. In the present study, we developed an immunochromatographic kit using this PvcMSP for the diagnosis of specific antibody to P. vivax malaria in serum samples. The kit was used to examine sera from vivax malaria patients and non-malaria- infected person and the test showed 100% sensitivity (78/78) and 98.3% specificity (58/59). This result demonstrated that the immunochromatographic kit for P. vivax antibody detection is applicable for the rapid and precise diagnosis of P. vivax malaria.Malaria diagnosis and treatment under the strategy of the integrated management of childhood illness (IMCI): relevance of laboratory support from the rapid immunochromatographic tests of ICT Malaria P.f/P.v and OptiMal.The algorithm developed for the integrated management of childhood illness (IMCI) provides guidelines for the treatment of paediatric malaria. In areas where malaria is endemic, for example, the IMCI strategy may indicate that children who present with fever, a recent history of fever and/or pallor should receive antimalarial chemotherapy. In many holo-endemic areas, it is unclear whether laboratory tests to confirm that such signs are the result of malaria would be very relevant or useful. Children from a holo-endemic region of Tanzania were therefore checked for malarial parasites by microscopy and by using two rapid immunochromatographic tests (RIT) for the diagnosis of malaria (ICT Malaria P.f/P.v and OptiMal. At the time they were tested, each of these children had been targeted for antimalarial treatment (following the IMCI strategy) because of fever and/or pallor. Only 70% of the 395 children classified to receive antimalarial drugs by the IMCI algorithm had malarial parasitaemias (68.4% had Plasmodium falciparum trophozoites, 1.3% only P. falciparum gametocytes, 0.3% P. ovale and 0.3% P. malariae). As indicators of P. falciparum trophozoites in the peripheral blood, fever had a sensitivity of 93.0% and a specificity of 15.5% whereas pallor had a sensitivity of 72.2% and a specificity of 50.8%. The RIT both had very high corresponding sensitivities (of 100.0% for the ICT and 94.0% for OptiMal) but the specificity of the ICT (74.0%) was significantly lower than that for OptiMal (100.0%). Fever and pallor were significantly associated with the P. falciparum asexual parasitaemias that equalled or exceeded the threshold intensity (2000/microl) that has the optimum sensitivity and specificity for the definition of a malarial episode. Diagnostic likelihood ratios (DLR) showed that a positive result in the OptiMal test (DLR = infinity) was a better indication of malaria than a positive result in the ICT (DLR = 3.85). In fact, OptiMal had diagnostic reliability (0.93) which approached that of an ideal test and, since it only detects live parasites, OptiMal is superior to the ICT in monitoring therapeutic responses. Although the RIT may seem attractive for use in primary health facilities because relatively inexperienced staff can perform them, the high cost of these tests is prohibitive. In holo-endemic areas, use of RIT or microscopical examination of bloodsmears may only be relevant when malaria needs to be excluded as a cause of illness (e.g. prior to treatment with toxic or expensive drugs, or during malaria epidemics). Wherever the effective drugs for the first-line treatment of malaria are cheap (e.g. chloroquine and Fansidar), treatment based on clinical diagnosis alone should prove cost-saving in health facilities without microscopy.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria.ParaSight-F test to diagnose malaria in hypo-endemic and epidemic prone regions of Vietnam.The antigen capture ParaSight-F test was evaluated during a drug sensitivity survey in a hypoendemic region of northern Vietnam. When only asexual blood forms of P. falciparum were considered, sensitivity of ParaSight-F was 100%, specificity 88% (95% CI 95-80%), positive predictive value 68% (95% CI 85-50%) and negative predictive value 100%. ParaSight-F proved very convenient for rapid screening and selection of patients to enrol in a drug sensitivity study. In northern Vietnam, the introduction of the test as a routine diagnostic tool is not justified, considering its high cost, the necessity to carry out the treatment of presumptive Plasmodium vivax cases and the persistence of positive reactions following treatment. However, the test will be a valuable tool in remote areas in emergency situations, where rapid confirmation of a P. falciparum outbreak is required.Evaluation of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based colloid gold-immunochromatography assay for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.To establish a colloid gold-immunochromatography assay (GICA) for detecting Plasmodium falciparum.The monoclonal antibodies (mAbs) against lactate dehydrogenase of P. falciparum (LDHpf) were screened for preparation of GICA strips. With microscopic examination of the blood smears and PCR test as control, GICA was evaluated for its sensitivity, specificity and stability in the diagnosis of malaria in the outpatient clinics in China.Four hybridoma cell lines against LDHpf were prepared. Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay demonstrated that the 4 mAbs reacted only with P. falciparum, but not with protein of normal human red cell, P. vivax, Toxoplasma gondii, or Schistosoma japonicam. All the 4 mAbs recognized a 33 kD protein designated as LDHpf as shown by Western blot analysis. Compared with the microscopic examination of blood smears and PCR test, GICA had the sensitivities of 88.37% and 86.67% and the specificities of 95.65% and 97.78%, respectively. Concordance between microscopic examination and GICA for P. falciparum infection was 91.55%.GICA established in this study is simple, rapid, sensitive and specific for detecting P. falciparum, and is potentially useful in developing reagent kits for clinical use.Update on rapid diagnostic testing for malaria.To help mitigate the expanding global impact of malaria, with its associated increasing drug resistance, implementation of prompt and accurate diagnosis is needed. Malaria is diagnosed predominantly by using clinical criteria, with microscopy as the current gold standard for detecting parasitemia, even though it is clearly inadequate in many health care settings. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have been recognized as an ideal method for diagnosing infectious diseases, including malaria, in recent years. There have been a number of RDTs developed and evaluated widely for malaria diagnosis, but a number of issues related to these products have arisen. This review highlights RDTs, including challenges in assessing their performance, internationally available RDTs, their effectiveness in various health care settings, and the selection of RDTs for different health care systems.Rapid diagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum in 32 Marines medically evacuated from Liberia with a febrile illness.Detection and species determination of malaria parasites by PCR: comparison with microscopy and with ParaSight-F and ICT malaria Pf tests in a clinical environment.A rapid procedure for the diagnosis of malaria infections directly from dried blood spots by PCR amplification was evaluated with samples from 52 patients. Plasmodium infections were identified with a genus-specific primer set, and species differentiation between Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax was analyzed by multiplex PCR. The PCR test with any of the three primer sets was able to detect as few as four parasites per microliter by gel electrophoresis or by nonisotopic paper hybridization chromatography. The diagnoses obtained by PCR correlated closely with those obtained by Giemsa staining except for two samples observed to have mixed P. falciparum-P. vivax infections. These were initially missed by microscopic analysis. In comparison with antigen-capture assays for P. falciparum, the PCR assays were able to detect three infections that were missed by the ParaSight-F test. The PCR test was negative for nine ParaSight-F-positive samples and one ICT Malaria Pf-positive sample, and these were confirmed to be false-positive results. The PCR thus gave no false-negative or false-positive results. Patients undergoing antimalarial therapy were also monitored by the PCR assay. Four of seven patients who were PCR positive for P. vivax at the time of discharge were later readmitted to the hospital with a recurrence of P. vivax infection. We would like to propose that PCR is a sensitive and easy method that can serve as a useful addition to microscopy for the diagnosis and the clinical monitoring of treatment of malaria.[Efficiency and specificity of the KAT-test for rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria].A new rapid KAT Quick Malaria test for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, which is based on the detection of a monoclonal antibody-antigen complex of malaria parasites, has been worked out by the KAT Medical CC in South Africa. The efficiency and specificity of the KAT test were compared with those of the microscopic method and with the ICT test for rapid diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax. The polymerase chain reaction was used as a control test. Testing for malaria was performed on 98 blood samples from feverish patients in Vietnam and Tadjikistan and among the persons who had returned to Moscow from endemic regions. The efficiency of the KAT test for falciparum-malaria was found to be 100% versus 90.5% with ICT. The absence of cross-reactions with P. vivax and the presence of pseudopositive results of the KAT test for fever cases of non-malaria origin indicate its high specificity. There was no correlation between the rate of test line colouring and the level of parasitemia. The KAT test yielded positive results only when gametocytes were found in blood specimens.Evaluation of the performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo and Paracheck Pf tests for the diagnosis of malaria in Wondo Genet, southern Ethiopia.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test relative to microscopy for the diagnosis of falciparum and vivax malaria in Ethiopia.668 febrile patients visiting two health centers in Wondo Genet, southern Ethiopia, involved in this study in 2008. Giemsa-stained thin and thick blood smears were prepared and microscopically examined under a 100x oil immersion microscope objective for Plasmodium species identification and determination of parasitaemia, respectively. CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test and Paracheck Pf test were performed as per the manufacturers' instruction.The diagnostic validity of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum were very good with sensitivity of 99.4%, specificity of 98%, positive predictive value of 94.4% and negative predictive value of 99.8%. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test for the diagnosis of P. vivax were 99.4%, 98.2%, 94.5% and 99.8%, respectively. The diagnostic performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test is comparable to that of Paracheck Pf test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum (sensitivity 99.4%, specificity 98.2%).Although CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test and Paracheck Pf test have comparable diagnostic performance for the diagnosis of P. falciparum, CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test has the added advantage of diagnosing P. vivax. Hence, it is preferable to use CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test for the diagnosis of malaria in areas where microscopy is not accessible and where malaria due to P. falciparum and P. vivax are co-endemic as in Ethiopia.Point-of-care testing for malaria outbreak management.A rapid antigen assay for malaria was performed on blood samples collected during a simultaneous outbreak of falciparum malaria and vivax malaria on a remote island in the Indonesian archipelago. During the outbreak, a total of 89 patients (4.3% of the population) were diagnosed with malaria within a week. Microscopic examination revealed 78 malaria slide-positive cases, of whom 49 (62.8%) were identified as P. falciparum, 7 (9.0%) as P. vivax and 22 (28.2%) as mixed P. falciparum and P. vivax infections. The rapid malaria assay showed excellent correlation with expert-confirmed routine microscopy for P. falciparum and P. vivax monoinfections and mixed infections with a parasite density >50 parasites/microl. Several slide-negative blood samples collected from febrile patients with clinical malaria tested positive in the rapid test. The estimated sensitivity calculated for the rapid test (91.0%) was slightly higher than that of microscopy (87.6%). The result indicates that rapid antigen detection for malaria could be a useful alternative to microscopy to reduce the workload during emergency outbreak situations.A comparison of two rapid field immunochromatographic tests to expert microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria.In Myanmar, we tested two rapid malaria immunochromatographic kits: the OptiMAL assay for the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), and the ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. test for histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) and panmalarial antigens. A total of 229 patients were examined, of whom 133 were found to be malaria positive by Giemsa microscopy. Both OptiMAL and ICT gave lower sensitivities than previously reported. ICT sensitivity for Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum parasites were 86.2 and 2.9%, respectively; specificity was 76.9 and 100%, respectively. OptiMAL sensitivity for P. falciparum and non-falciparum parasites were 42.6 and 47.1%, respectively; specificity was 97.0 and 96.9%, respectively. The sensitivity of both tests for the detection of both P. falciparum and non-falciparum parasites increased with parasite density. Several explanations for these results are explored. Our results raise particular concern over batch quality variations of malaria rapid diagnostic devices (MRDDs).Comparative evaluation of four techniques for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections.Four diagnostic techniques for Plasmodium falciparum infection were evaluated against serial parasite dilutions and on identical field samples. These were (i) Giemsa-stained thick blood films (GTF), (ii) acridine orange-stained thick (AOTF) and thin (AOTnF) blood films, (iii) the quantitative buffy coat technique (QBC); and (iv) the ParaSight-F dipstick test (PS). PS had a consistently higher sensitivity and speed, was easiest to learn, and required no laboratory facility. The 100% sensitivity cut-off points against known parasite densities (per mm3) were: PS, 30; GTF, 84; QBC, 84; AOTnF, 84; AOTF, 149. In the field study, test sensitivities compared with examination of 800 microscope fields of a Giemsa-stained thin blood film were PS, 96.6%; AOTF, 93.1%; GTF, 91.4%; QBC, 89.7%; AOTnF, 82.8%. In the dilution study, one false positive result was recorded with QBC; in the field study there was one false positive each with PS, AOTnF and AOTF. When a newly trained microscopist examined samples of the parasite dilutions, the 100% sensitivity cut-off points were AOTF, 84; GTF, 140; QBC, 390. Total handling time was shortest with PS regardless of whether samples were processed individually or in batches of 10 or 100. The ParaSight-F test is recommended as the diagnostic tool for the future.Use of the Parasight-F diagnostic test for imported malaria in a travel clinic.The Parasight-F test based on the detection of a soluble antigen specific for Plasmodium falciparum is designed for the immediate diagnosis of malaria infection. We evaluated its use by clinicians during consultations. This prospective study of its diagnostic utility in febrile patients consulting a travel clinic on their return from areas endemic for malaria was conducted between May 1996 and May 1997. The Parasight-F test was performed by the clinician with confirmation by means of standard microscopic examination of venous blood. One-hundred and forty patients were enrolled. Forty-three (31%) cases of malaria were identified by microscopic examination. Thirty-eight were due to P. falciparum. The Parasight-F tests yielded 6 false-positive and 3 false-negative results compared to the microscopic findings. The specificity and sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria were 94% and 92%. These results show that the Parasight-F test alone cannot replace microscopic diagnosis of malaria in travel clinics.Immunoassays for tropical parasitic infections.Rapid immunochromatography-based detection of mixed-species malaria infection in Pakistan.We report the identification of mixed Plasmodium infections in four recent patients with malaria clinically refractory to empiric chloroquine therapy using the rapid antigen detection kit, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv. A rapid in vitro immunodiagnostic test, the NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit was used for the detection of circulating Plasmodium falciparum (Pf) and Plasmodium vivax (Pv) antigens in whole blood. Peripheral blood microscopy confirmed mixed-species infection in all the cases. Thick and thin peripheral blood films were made and stained with Giemsa stain and examined by both hospital laboratory staff and an experienced parasitologist who was blinded to the results of the rapid malarial antigen tests. Four recent patients (all male; mean age, 24 years) with mixed malarial infection were identified. All the subjects were males working for an oil company in a coastal area of Pakistan, and all had been diagnosed presumptively with malaria based on clinical grounds (without microbiologic confirmation), and were treated empirically with chloroquine without clinical response. Semiquantitative malaria counts via microscopy were as follows: P. vivax, scanty (2 patients) and moderate (2 patients); for P. falciparum--scanty (1 patient), moderate (2 patients), and heavy (1 patient). The present case series, although limited by the small number of patients with proven mixed P. falciparum-P. vivax infection, highlights the usefulness of the rapid antigen test in a highly malarious region of Pakistan where chloroquine resistance is prevalent. Although there was full concordance between the results of blood smear microscopy and rapid antigen testing, these techniques are potentially most useful when there is a discrepancy with microscopy findings. Accurate and rapid diagnosis of parasites, particularly in cases of mixed P. falciparum and P. vivax infection, is of immense importance for individual patient management and in reducing the burden of disease, especially in regions of chloroquine resistance.Field evaluation of malaria rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections.The objective of this study was to evaluate various malaria rapid diagnostic tests as a tool in the detection of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections in field conditions. Four field surveys were conducted in malaria-endemic areas of Palawan and Davao del Norte, Philippines to validate the various rapid diagnostic tests, namely Diamed OptiMAL 48 (DiaMed AG, Switzerland), ParaHIT f (Span Diagnostics, India), Orchid OptiMAL, and Paracheck Pf (both from Orchid Biomedical Systems, India). The results of the various rapid diagnostic tests were compared to those of microscopy. Sensitivity, specificity and detection rates according to the level of parasitemia were used as parameters to describe the performance of the various rapid diagnostic tests in the field. Practical and operational assessments were also done. The results of the study show that the sensitivity and detection rates were generally lower than previously reported, with sensitivities ranging from 4.8% to 20.6%, except for Diamed OptiMAL 48, which had sensitivities of 78.8% to 96.8%, and detection rates of 50.0% to 96.8%. The rest had detection rates ranging from 0.0% to 50.0%. All the specificities ranged from 18.2% to 100.0%. Improper conditions at the time of manufacturing, storage, transport, and utilization may affect the validity of the results. Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria provide practical means of detecting malarial infections, especially in endemic areas. However, issues regarding variability in performance must to be addressed before they can be used as mainstream diagnostic tools.A rapid dipstick antigen capture assay for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria. WHO Informal Consultation on Recent Advances in Diagnostic Techniques and Vaccines for Malaria.Recent advances in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections have made it possible to consider supplementing light microscopy with a standardized dipstick antigen capture assay based on the detection of a parasite-specific protein, which is secreted by the asexual blood stages and immature gametocytes but not by the other stages. Field trials indicate that this dipstick assay provides consistently reproducible results, with a threshold of detection of P. falciparum parasitaemia similar to that obtained by high quality routine malaria microscopy and a specificity and sensitivity of around 90% compared with standard thick blood film microscopy. The stability, reproducibility, and ease of use of the assay clearly indicate that it has potential for application in the management of malaria, particularly at the peripheral health care level, provided its accuracy can be assured and that it can be made affordable. Consideration should be given to its wider use where operational requirements and resources so justify, and where decisions are based on adequate evaluation of the existing health delivery systems.End-user errors in applying two malaria rapid diagnostic tests in a remote area of Sudan.We assessed end-user practice for numerous procedural steps of two types of RDTs: Core Malaria Pf (the cassette format) and OptiMAL IT (the dipstick format). Two types of errors occurred: generic errors common to both types of test and specific errors caused by the test design and manufacturer's instructions. End-user errors were more frequent with OptiMAL IT than Core Pf tests. To improve malaria diagnosis with rapid tests, users require training and better manufacturer's instructions that take into account local conditions.A comparison of three diagnostic techniques for malaria: a rapid diagnostic test (NOW Malaria), PCR and microscopy.Malaria is a common, life-threatening infection in endemic tropical areas and one that presents a diagnostic challenge to laboratories in most non-endemic countries. A rapid and accurate diagnosis is a prerequisite for effective treatment, especially for the potentially fatal cases of Plasmodium falciparum infection. In the present, multi-centre study, the performances of a rapid diagnostic test (NOW) Malaria) and several, commercial, PCR-based assays (AMS61, AMS42, AMS43, AMS4 and AMS45) were compared against the results of microscopical examination of bloodsmears (the current 'gold standard'). The subjects were either non-European immigrants (N=135) or international travellers (N=171). There was good concordance between the results of all the detection methods, with kappa values of >0.8. Although the NOW Malaria rapid test was both sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) in detecting P. falciparum infections, it was less specific (93.1%) and sensitive (90.7%) in identifying the other Plasmodium species. The results from the AMS61 assay, designed to detect any malarial infection, generally parallelled those of the microscopy (kappa = 0.89), giving a specificity of 98.2% and a sensitivity of 91.0%. Although the use of species-specific molecular primers to identify pure infections with P. falciparum and P. vivax gave results that were in good agreement with those of the microscopy, the subjects who had apparently pure infections with P. ovale or P. malariae were always found PCR-negative. Compared with the standard microscopy, both the NOW Malaria test and the PCR-based assays were therefore poor at identifying mixed infections. The NOW Malaria test and the PCR-based assays clearly need to be improved, particularly for the correct identification of infections with Plasmodium spp. other than P. falciparum, including mixed infections. For now, expert microscopy must remain the mainstay of the laboratory diagnosis of malaria.[Evaluation of the Optimal-IT and ICT P.f./P.v. rapid dipstick tests for diagnosing malaria within primary healthcare in the municipality of Manaus, Amazonas].Malaria is routinely diagnosed using the thick blood smear test. However, this technique requires the training of microscopists and may be time-consuming. A concordance study was conducted on two dipstick tests (Optimal-IT and ICT P.f./P.v.) and the thick blood smear test, within primary healthcare in Manaus.Comparison of five methods of malaria detection in the outpatient setting.In eastern Africa where 90% of the malaria is due to Plasmodium falciparum, the accuracy of malaria diagnosis at the outpatient level is becoming increasingly important due to problems of drug resistance and use of alternative, costly antimalarial drugs. The quantitative buffy coat (QBC) technique, acridine orange staining with an interference filter system, and the ParaSight-F test have been introduced as alternative methods to conventional microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria. Two hundred thirteen outpatients were tested using these alternative methods and conventional microscopy by five experienced technologists; two were randomly allocated to read the results of each test. Paired results showed the highest level of agreement with the ParaSight-F test (99%), followed by Field stain (92%). The results of the QBC technique showed the least agreement (73%). Using conventional microscopy as the reference standard, the ParaSight-F test had a sensitivity range of 90-92% and a specificity of 99%, staining with acridine orange had a sensitivity range of 77-96% and a specificity range of 81-98% and the QBC technique had a sensitivity range of 88-98% and a specificity range of 58-90%. All microscopic tests showed lower sensitivities (as low as 20% using staining with acridine orange) in detecting low parasitemias (< or = 320/microl) than the ParaSight-F test (70%). Due to the high cost of the ParaSight-F test, Field-stained blood films remain the most appropriate method for diagnosis of P. falciparum in eastern Africa. The ParaSight-F test may be used in situations where no trained microscopists are available, or where malaria is strongly suspected and the results of microscopy are negative.Comparison of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based immunochromatographic antigen detection assay (OptiMAL) with microscopy for the detection of malaria parasites in human blood samples.Microscopic examination of blood smears remains the gold standard for malaria diagnosis, but is labor-intensive and requires skilled operators. Rapid dipstick technology provides a potential alternative. A study was conducted in The Gambia to compare the performance of OptiMAL, an immunochromatographic antigen detection assay for the diagnosis of malaria using parasite lactate dehydrogenase, against standard microscopy in patients with suspected malaria. For initial diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum, irrespective of stage, this assay had a sensitivity of 91.3%, a specificity of 92%, a positive predictive value of 87.2%, and a negative predictive value of 94.7%. The sensitivity of the test decreased markedly at parasitemias < 0.01%. This assay can be used for the diagnosis of malaria in areas where microscopy is not available and for urgent malaria diagnosis at night and at weekends, when routine laboratories are closed and when relatively inexperienced microscopists may be on duty.Evaluation of different methods for diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria.Rapid diagnosis is a prerequisite for institution of effective treatment and reducing the mortality and morbidity of falciparum malaria. This study was taken up to compare the efficacy of various rapid methods viz, acridine orange, Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen detection and Field's stain with traditional microscopy i.e, Leishman stain for diagnosing falciparum malaria. Thick and thin blood films of 443 consecutive patients with history of fever with chills and rigors were examined by Leishman and Field's method. Acridine orange stained wet mounts of blood were examined under fluorescence microscopy. All films were examined by two independent microbiologists. Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen was detected using commercially available kit, Paracheck Pf. Out of the 443 subjects examined for P.falciparum 18.28% were detected by Leishman stain, 6.32% by Field's stain, 18.28% by acridine orange and 18.1% by antigen based technique. Field's stain missed 53 (65.4%), while Paracheck Pf was negative in 6(7.4%) of the Leishman positive samples. All Field's stain and acridine orange positives were positive by Leishman, but five Paracheck Pf positives were negative. Leishman stain is cost effective but if facilities are available one should use acridine orange for screening. The antigen detection kits are rapid, simple and are useful but to rule out false negatives in clinically suspected cases, Leishman stain is reliable.[Can the thick drop/smear examination for malaria be replaced by a rapid diagnostic test in first intention? The Mayotte experience].Malaria is a public health problem in the French island of Mayotte (160,000 inhabitants) in the Indian Ocean. In the late 1990, resistance to chloroquine greatly increased, and so did the number of malaria cases, so that a new health policy had to be adopted. Since 2001, the initial smear/thick drop examination, the results of which took too long to obtain, has systematically been replaced by a rapid diagnosis test (Optimal IT Diamed) in all hospitals and public health centers.Epidemiological data of malaria on the island was collected and a prospective study was made from March 2005 to February 2006, on two sites (the emergency department of the main hospital and a rural health centre) on all patients presenting with malaria (104 and 139 cases respectively).The first Optimal IT test diagnosed the condition accurately in 88 and 96% of the cases, respectively. Every time symptoms would persist after negative test results and an Optimal IT test was repeated within three days, the parasitemia level was low (0.08 to 0.66%). Very low parasitemia level was very likely to account for a false negative (test result).These results concerning malaria (and its epidemiological data) in Mayotte show that the initial use of an Optimal IT test instead of the thin/thick blood smear results in a faster management of patients with malaria, although the Optimal IT test is slightly less sensitive and requires training/practice.Assessing the economic impact of a rapid on-site malaria diagnostic test.A set of three models has been developed for assessing the economic impact of existing and new malaria diagnostic technology, specifically microscopy of blood slides and rapid on-site diagnostic tests (RDT). The models allow for phased introduction of the new technology in targeted areas. The derived computer software program facilitates evaluation of costs to the supplier, to the consumer and aggregate costs, with comparison among the three models to give relative costs of progressive transition from blood slides to RDT technology. The models and the related software program can assist planners in the health sector in determining costs of current programs and assessing the potential economic impact of introducing rapid on-site diagnosis. Details of the models and the operational software program are available on request.Performance of malaria rapid diagnostic tests as part of routine malaria case management in Kenya.Data on malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) performance under routine program conditions are limited. We assessed the attributes of RDTs performed by study and health facility (HF) staffs as part of routine malaria case management of patients > or = 5 years of age in Kenya. Expert microscopy was used as our gold standard. A total of 1,827 patients were enrolled; 191 (11.6%) were parasitemic by expert microscopy. Sensitivity and specificity of RDTs performed by study staff were 86.6% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 79.8-93.5%) and 95.4% (95% CI: 93.9-96.9%), respectively. Among tests performed by HF staff, RDTs were 91.7% (95% CI: 80.8-100.0%) sensitive and 96.7% (95% CI: 92.8-100.0%) specific, whereas microscopy was 52.5% (95% CI: 33.2-71.9%) sensitive and 77.0% (95% CI: 67.9-86.2%) specific. Our findings suggest that RDTs perform better than microscopy under routine conditions. Further efforts are needed to maintain this high RDT performance over time.Comparison of the ParaSight-F test and the ICT Malaria Pf test with the polymerase chain reaction for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in travellers.Rapid and accurate methods are needed for the diagnosis of imported malaria. The ParaSight-F test and the ICT Malaria Pf test are commercially available kits marketed for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria. Both tests are antigen-capture assays based on the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 in peripheral blood. Using microscopy and a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based method as reference standards, we performed a 'blinded' comparison of these assays for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 200 febrile travellers returning from malaria-endemic areas. As determined by PCR and microscopy, 148 travellers had malaria and, of these patients, 54.7% (81/148) were infected with P. vivax only, 31.1% (46/148) with P. falciparum only, 9.5% (14/148) with P. ovale, 0.7% (1/148) with P. malariae, and 4.1% (6/148) had mixed infections. Compared to PCR, the ParaSight-F and ICT Malaria Pf tests had initial sensitivities of 94% and 90% and specificities of 95% and 97%, respectively, for the detection of P. falciparum malaria. When discrepant samples were retested with day 0 and day 1 bloods, the sensitivities improved to 96% and 94%, respectively. The 2 remaining false negative results with the Para-Sight-F test and 2 of the 3 false negative results with the ICT Malaria Pf test occurred in samples with < 100 parasites/microL. The performance of these kits was not significantly different (P = 0.75) and both are simple, rapid, and accurate tests for the detection of P. falciparum infection in the returned traveller.Paracheck Pf compared with microscopy for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria among children in Tanga City, north-eastern Tanzania.Malaria is a major public health problem particularly in rural Sub-Saharan Africa. In most urban areas, malaria transmission intensity is low thus monitoring trends using reliable tools is crucial to provide vital information for future management of the disease. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) such as Paracheck Pf are now increasingly adopted for Plasmodium falciparum malaria diagnosis and are advantageous and cost effective alternative to microscopy. This cross sectional survey was carried out during June 2005 to determine the prevalence of malaria in an urban setting and compare microscopy diagnosis versus Paracheck Pf for detecting Plasmodium falciparum. Blood samples from a total of 301 children (< 10 years) attending outpatient clinic at Makorora Health Centre, in Tanga, Tanzania were examined for the presence of malaria. Twenty-nine (9.6%) of the children were positive to malaria by microscopy while 30 (10.0%) were positive by Paracheck test. Three out of 30 positive cases detected by Paracheck were negative by microscopy; thus considered to be false positive results. For the 271 Paracheck Pf negative cases, 2 were positive by microscopy; yielding 2 false negative results. Paracheck Pf sensitivity and specificity were 93.1% and 98.9%, respectively. P. falciparum was the only malarial species observed among the 29 microscopy positive cases. The prevalence of anaemia among the children was 53.16%. These findings indicate a low prevalence of malaria in Tanga City and that Paracheck Pf can be an effective tool for malaria diagnosis.Following the course of malaria treatment by detecting parasite lactate dehydrogenase enzyme.Operational trial of ParaSight-F (dipstick) in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria at the primary health care level.The rapid manual ParaSight-F test of Plasmodium falciparum malaria, an antigen capture test for detecting trophozoite-derived histidine rich protein-2 (PF HRP-2), is simple to perform and provides a definite diagnosis within 10 minutes. During an operational trial at health centers and mobile malaria units where microscopical diagnosis is not available and using defined symptom screening criteria, 3,361 subjects were tested yielding 618 positives (18.4%) for PF-HRP-2 by ParaSight-F. Microscopic examination of the same subjects by thick blood film examined 7 days later at a malaria clinic showed 578 falciparum, and 349 vivax and mixed infection (F+V) 41. The technology proved highly effective in detecting falciparum malaria at the peripheral levels where access to malaria laboratory services are difficult, thus allowing immediate administration of a complete course of treatment in the absence of a microscopic examination.Evaluation of a rapid dipstick test, Malar-Check, for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Brazil.The present study was carried out to evaluate the Malar-Check trade mark Pf test, an immunochromatographic assay that detects Plasmodium falciparum Histidine Rich Protein II, does not require equipment, and is easy and rapid to perform. In dilution assays performed to test sensitivity against known parasite density, Malar-Check were compared with thick blood smear (TBS), the gold standard for diagnosis. Palo Alto isolate or P. falciparum blood from patients with different parasitemias was used. The average cut-off points for each technique in three independent experiments were 12 and 71 parasites/mm3 (TBS and Malar-Check, respectively). In the field assays, samples were collected from patients with fever who visited endemic regions. Compared to TBS, Malar-Check yielded true-positive results in 38 patients, false-positive results in 3, true-negative results in 23, and false-negative result in 1. Malar-Check performed with samples from falciparum-infected patients after treatment showed persistence of antigen up to 30 days. Malar-Check should aid the diagnosis of P. falciparum in remote areas and improve routine diagnosis even when microscopy is available. Previous P. falciparum infection, which can determine a false-positive test in cured individuals, should be considered. The prompt results obtained with the Malar-Check for early diagnosis could avoid disease evolution to severe cases.Comparison of clinical, microscopic and rapid diagnostic test methods in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Enugu, Nigeria.To compare the use of clinical, microscopic and immunochromato-graphic methods in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Children with history of fever were consecutively recruited. Information on personal characteristics, and clinical features were obtained with the parental consent before enrolment. Malaria parasite density was done with quantitative microscopy, as well as specie identification in both local and reference laboratories. Rapid diagnostic test (RDT) kits were also used for parasite detection.Eighty three children had clinical diagnosis of malaria, while the remaining 6 had other diagnoses. On microscopy 89 and 26 patients had parasitaemia by the local and reference laboratories respectively. With the RDT, 15 patients had parasitaemia with corresponding minimum densities of 1200 and 716 parasites per ul from the local and reference laboratories. The sensitivity and specificity of the RDT to the reference laboratory were 42.31% and 93.65% respectively, while concordance was 57.69% for RDT, 30.49% for clinical diagnosis (all symptoms), 43.75% for clinical diagnosis (fever alone), and 29.21% for local laboratory.There was a significant deficiency in malaria diagnosis using any of the methods alone. For reliable diagnosis of malaria a combination of the methods of diagnosis is recommended. Degradation of the RDTs might have contributed to its low sensitivity. Training and better quality assurance should be established for the medical and laboratory workers in order to improve malaria diagnosis.False-positive rapid tests for malaria in patients with rheumatoid factor.Comparison of optimal malarial test with light microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria.To evaluate the efficacy of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based immunochromatographic antigen detection assay (optimal) against conventional light microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria at Military Hospital, Rawalpindi and Department of Pathology Army Medical College Rawalpindi from August to October 2002 in patients reporting sick with history suggestive of malaria.The blood samples were collected from 215 patients reporting with symptoms suggestive of malaria. Thick and thin blood films were prepared, stained with Leishman's stain and examined by light microscopy for the presence of malarial parasites. Parasitaemia was estimated on all positive slides. All samples were tested for presence of malarial parasite by optimal dipstick method according to the manufacturer's instructions.A total of 215 cases were studied. Malarial parasites were visualized in 98 (45.5%) cases with light microscopy. Optimal test revealed 93 (43.2%) of these samples as positive. Microscopy showed 61 out of 98 positive cases to be P. vivax and 37 P. falciparum. The Optimal dipstick method revealed that 58 out of 93 were positive for P. vivax and 35 positive for P. falciparum. These results demonstrated that Optimal had sensitivities of 95% and 94.5% for P. vivax and P. falciparum respectively. It has 100% specificity for both malarial species, when compared to conventional microscopy.Optimal test showed excellent correlation with microscopy in the diagnosis of P. vivax and P. falciparum. It is expensive but it has an advantage of being simple, rapid and effective test in the diagnosis of malaria especially where well trained microscopists are not available or work load is too high.The Para Check-PC Test:--a simple rapid Dip stick test to detect Plasmodium falciparum infection.Evaluation of a rapid and inexpensive dipstick assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Rapid, accurate and affordable methods are needed for the diagnosis of malaria. Reported here is an evaluation of a new immunochromatographic strip, the PATH Falciparum Malaria IC Strip, which is impregnated with an immobilized IgM monoclonal antibody that binds to the HRP-II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. In contrast to other commercially available kits marketed for the rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria, this kit should be affordable in the malaria-endemic world. Using microscopy and polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based methods as reference standards, we compared two versions of the PATH test for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 200 febrile travellers. As determined by PCR and microscopy, 148 travellers had malaria, 50 of whom (33.8%) were infected with P. falciparum. Compared with PCR, the two versions of the PATH test had initial sensitivities of 90% and 88% and specificities of 97% and 96%, respectively, for the detection of falciparum malaria. When discrepant samples were retested blindly with a modified procedure (increased sample volume and longer washing step) the sensitivity and specificity of both kits improved to 96% and 99%, respectively. The two remaining false negatives occurred in samples with < 100 parasites per microliter of blood. The accuracy, simplicity and predicted low cost may make this test a useful diagnostic tool in malaria-endemic areas.Performance of the OptiMAL dipstick test for management of severe and complicated malaria cases in a tertiary hospital, central India.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria by village health workers using the rapid manual ParaSight-F test.Malaria diagnosis by dipstick assay in a Honduran population with coendemic Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax.A Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase dipstick designed to separately detect P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria was evaluated in two Honduran populations where both species are endemic. The dipstick was compared to thick film microscopy; the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) was used to analyze discordant results. The dipstick had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 95% compared with microscopy in the diagnosis of Plasmodium infections in a hospital population; the mean parasite density was approximately 590/mm3. In a field sample of mostly asymptomatic volunteers, the sensitivity of the dipstick for Plasmodium infection varied with parasite density. Additionally, the sensitivity and specificity of the dipstick was similar to thick film microscopy in the diagnosis of vivax malaria compared with the PCR. The dipstick was unable to detect P. vivax in the presence of P. falciparum because of cross-reactivity in the pan-specific band. Accurate species identification in mixed infections remains a problem in malaria diagnosis.Paracheck-Pf accuracy and recently treated Plasmodium falciparum infections: is there a risk of over-diagnosis?An assessment of the accuracy of Paracheck Pf, a malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) detecting histidine rich protein 2 was undertaken amongst children aged 6-59 months in eastern Democratic Republic of Congo.This RDT assessment occurred in conjunction with an ACT efficacy trial. Febrile children were simultaneously screened with both RDT and high quality microscopy and those meeting inclusion criteria were followed for 35 days.358 febrile children were screened with 180 children recruited for five weeks follow-up. On screening, the RDT accurately diagnosed all 235 true malaria cases, indicating 100% RDT sensitivity. Of the 123 negative slides, the RDT gave 59 false-positive results, indicating 52.0% (64/123) RDT specificity. During follow-up after treatment with an artemisinin-based combination therapy, 98.2% (110/112), 94.6% (106/112), 92.0% (103/112) and 73.5% (50/68) of effectively treated children were still false-positive by RDT at days 14, 21, 28 and 35, respectively.Results show that though the use of Paracheck-Pf is as sensitive as microscopy in detecting true malaria cases, a low specificity did present a high frequency of false-positive RDT results. What's more, a duration of RDT false-positivity was found that significantly surpassed the 'fortnight' after effective treatment reported by its manufacturer. Though further research is needed in assessing RDT accuracy, study results showing the presence of frequent false positivity should be taken into consideration to avoid clinicians inappropriately focusing on malaria, not identifying the true cause of illness, and providing unnecessary treatment.Evaluation of alternative diagnostic techniques for diagnosis of cerebral malaria in a tertiary referral hospital in Bangladesh.Five alternative techniques for diagnosis of malaria were evaluated in 124 clinically diagnosed cerebral malaria cases admitted in a tertiary hospital in Bangladesh. Clinical diagnosis of cerebral malaria was done by WHO criteria. The tests were conventional routine malaria microscopy; prolonged microscopy; dipstick antigen capture assay (Para Sight TM-F test); pigments in peripheral leucocytes and routine microscopy repeated at 12 hours interval. First four tests were done at 0 hours of hospital admission and repeat routine microscopy was added at 12 hours interval. Diagnostic capability of the test was 64%, 65%, 69%, 27% and 63% respectively. None of the tests except pigments in peripheral leucocytes was superior at initial evaluation. Only the dipstick test added 5% more diagnostic possibility compared with routine microscopy as standard. Stratification of diagnostic capability in different ways improved diagnosis 15% and 11% in smear negative cases by dipstick and prolonged microscopy respectively. It was increased by 50% (5/10 patients) with dipstick test in the smear negative patients with history of anti-malarials prior to hospital admission.Rapid diagnosis of malaria--a new approach.Evaluation of the Makromed dipstick assay versus PCR for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in returned travelers.Microscopy has been the traditional reference standard for malaria diagnosis. However, difficulty in maintaining the required technical skills, particularly in areas where malaria is not endemic, has prompted the development of rapid nonmicroscopic diagnostic assays based on the detection of malaria parasite antigen in whole blood. In this study, we evaluated the performance of one such device, the Makromed dipstick test, blindly compared to PCR and microscopy for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in 200 febrile returned travelers. The Makromed assay detects the presence of P. falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein II with an antigen capture immunochromatographic strip format. Compared to PCR as the reference standard, the dipstick assay had a sensitivity of 97.0% and a specificity of 96.0%. The positive and negative predictive values were 81.2% and 99.5%, respectively. Rapid malaria diagnostic devices may provide a useful diagnostic adjunct in a clinical setting.Detection of Plasmodium ovale by the ICT malaria P.f/P.v. immunochromatographic test.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic card test for Plasmodium falciparum in Ibadan, Nigeria.This short report describes the results of a rapid, simple and cost effective immunodiagnostic test for malaria in Ibadan, Nigeria. A total of 77% patients presenting at the children outpatient clinic, University College Hospital with malaria symptoms were screened for malaria parasites by microscopy using Giemsa stain and by the immunochromatographic card test. The immunodiagnostic test had a sensitivity of 93.1% and a specificity of 95.8%, making a good alternative for malaria diagnosis especially in rural areas without electricity, where microscopy is not possible, and a decision is to be made on when to start treatment.Detection of P. vivax antigens in malaria endemic populations of Nepal by ELISA using monoclonal antibodies raised against Thai isolates.An indirect enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using monoclonal antibody (MAb) originated from the native Thai isolates of P. vivax (McPV1) and the polyclonal antibody (PAb) raised against Nepali isolates of P. vivax was developed for detection of P vivax antigens in red cell lysates. The assay was specific (100%) since it was positive only with P. vivax-infected erythrocytes and was negative when erythrocytes from 40 healthy individuals from malaria non-endemic areas and 40 P. falciparum infected erythrocytes were tested. When the assay was applied to 203 vivax blood samples already proven by microscopic examination collected from Dhanusha district of Nepal, and using the cut-off level of the mean optical density (OD) (0.144) of 40 healthy individuals who had been living in malaria-endemic areas (0.073) + 2 SD (0.016), the assay could detect 189/203 samples, indicating the sensitivity of the test was 93.1% with a detection limit of erythrocytes of 240 parasites/10(6) erythrocytes. In addition, the assay was negative when 40 blood samples with fever of unknown origin, collected from the same malaria-endemic areas, were tested. However, there was a significant correlation between OD values and parasitemia (r=0.649; p=0.018). The results indicate that MAb-PAb indirect ELISA using MAb raised against Thai isolates of P. vivax as the coating antibodies, and polyclonal antibodies raised against local Nepali isolates as the detecting antibody, could detect P. vivax antigens with high degrees of sensitivity and specificity. Furthermore, it seems that the McPV1 MAb raised against Thai isolates of P. vivax could recognize the antigens of Nepali isolates in a wide range of blood samples.Determining cost-effectiveness and cost component of three malaria diagnostic models being used in remote non-microscope areas.This cross-sectional experimental study developed a methodology to analyze the cost-effectiveness of three malaria diagnostic models: microscopy; on-site OptiMAL; and on-site Immunochromatographic Test (on-site ICT), used in remote non-microscope areas in Thailand, from both a public provider and patient perspective. The study covered six areas in two highly malaria-endemic areas of provinces located along the Thai-Myanmar border. The study was conducted between April and October 2000, by purposively recruiting 436 malaria suspected cases attending mobile malaria clinics. Each patient was randomly selected to receive service via the three diagnostic models; their accuracy was 95.17%, 94.48% and 89.04%, respectively. In addition, their true positive rates for all malaria species were 76.19%, 82.61% and 73.83%; for falciparum malaria 85.71%, 80.95% and 80.00%, and for vivax malaria 57.14%, 100% and 50%, respectively, with the parasitemia ranging from 80 to 58,240 microl of blood. Consequently, their costs were determined by dividing into provider and consumer costs, which were consequently classified into internal and external costs. The internal costs were the costs of the public providers, whereas the external costs were those incurred by the patients. The aggregate costs of these three models were 58,500.35, 36,685.91, and 40,714.01 Baht, respectively, or 339.53, 234.39, and 243.93, in terms of unit costs per actual case. In the case of microscopy, if all suspected malaria cases incurred forgone opportunity costs of waiting for treatment, the aggregate cost and unit cost per actual case were up to 188,110.89 and 944.03 Baht, respectively. Accordingly, the cost-effectiveness for all malaria species, using their true positive rates as the effectiveness indicator, was 446.75, 282.40, and 343.56 respectively, whereas for falciparum malaria it was 394.80, 289.37 and 304.91, and for vivax malaria 595.67, 234.39 and 487.86, respectively. This study revealed that the on-site OptiMAL was the most cost-effective. It could be used to supplement or even replace microscopy for this criteria in general. This study would be of benefit to malaria control program policy makers to consider using RDT technology to supplement microscopy in remote non-microscope areas.Diagnostic performance characteristics of rapid dipstick test for Plasmodium vivax malaria.We compared the diagnostic performance characteristics of newly developed method, the rapid dipstick test, which provides colorimetric determination by developing antibody to the lactate dehydrogenase enzyme of parasites, with conventional standard thick-blood film examination. For the rapid test, OptiMAL commercial kits were used. The results were also evaluated with clinical findings from patients. The parasites were determined by microscopic examination of thick-blood films from 81 patients with vivax malaria from southeastern Anatolia, Turkey. The OptiMAL test results were found to be negative in five patients who were diagnosed clinically and through thick-film testing as having vivax malaria. There was no false positivity observed with the OptiMAL test. We concluded that this rapid malaria test has a lower level of sensitivity than the classical thick-blood-film test for malaria, but that these methods have equal specificity.Co-reactivity of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 and aldolase on a combined immuno-chromographic-malaria dipstick (ICT) as a potential semi-quantitative marker of high Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia.The combined immuno-chromographic-malaria dipstick (ICT) for the rapid diagnosis of malaria detects both Plasmodium falciparum (P.f.)-specific, histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and a plasmodial aldolase expressed by all Plasmodium species pathogenic to humans. ICT was applied in 674 febrile returnees from malaria-endemic regions attending our Tropical Diseases Unit. Microscopy confirmed malaria in 69/674 cases, of whom 67/69 had returned from Africa or Madagascar, and 2/69 from the Caribbean. Monoparasitic P.f. infection occurred in 52/69, mixed infection was due to P.f.+ P. ovale (P.o.) in 3/69, and P.f.+P. malariae (P.m.) in 1/69 cases. Monoparasitic P. vivax (P.v.) infection occurred in 8/69 , P.o. in 3/69, and P.m. in 2/69 cases . Whereas a positive HRP-2 band on the test was a highly sensitive indicator for P.f. infection (52/52 patients; sensitivity 100%), this was not the case for a positive aldolase band (25/52 patients; sensitivity 48.1%). Sensitivity of aldolase band for non-falciparum plasmodia was even lower: aldolase was positive in only 3/8 (37.5%) of patients with vivax malaria, and in 0/5 cases with P.o.- or P.m. infection. Co-reaction of both bands occurred more frequently in patients with P.f. parasitaemia of > or =40,000/microl (20/25, 80.0%) as compared to patients with P.f. parasitaemia <40,000/microl (5/27, 18.5%; P<0.00005), and to patients with mixed infection (P.f.+ P.o., P.f.+ P.m.: 2/4, 50.0%; diff. n.s.). In our series, co-reaction of HRP-2 and aldolase indicated monoparasitic falciparum malaria with high P.f. parasitaemia, rather than mixed infection. Whereas the aldolase band is not a reliable qualitative marker for malaria, co-reaction of HRP-2 and aldolase band may have a potential for indicating high parasitaemia in falciparum malaria.Comparative performance of the ParaSight F test for detection of Plasmodium falciparum in malaria-immune and nonimmune populations in Irian Jaya, Indonesia.A comparison was made of the performance of the ParaSight F test (F test) for detection of Plasmodium falciparum in blood from malaria-immune (410 native Irianese) and nonimmune (369 new transmigrants) populations in Irian Jaya, Indonesia, where malaria is hyperendemic and all four species of human malaria occur. There were highly significant differences between populations in the sensitivity (Irianese, 60% versus transmigrants, 84%; P < 0.001) and specificity (Irianese, 97% versus transmigrants, 84%; P < 0.001) of the F test. The test had comparably high levels of sensitivity for Irianese children aged < or = 10 years, both age groups of transmigrants (76-85%), but low sensitivity for Irianese aged > 10 years (40%), among whom only 7% of parasitaemias < 120 per microliter and 69% of those > 120 per microliter were detected. Specificity was comparably high for transmigrant children aged < or = 10 years and both age groups of Irianese (93-98%). The low specificity for transmigrants aged > 10 years (79%) was due to a preponderance of false positives, frequently identified by microscopy as P. vivax. The results suggest that comparison based on microscopy underestimated the performance of the ParaSight F test and that malaria immune status, irrespective of P. falciparum density, may influence the test's sensitivity.The ParaSight F test uses a nonmicroscopic dipstick approach to the rapid detection of Plasmodium falciparum in blood. The performance of this test was assessed in serum samples collected in Irian Jaya, Indonesia, from 410 native Irianese (malaria-immune) and 369 new transmigrants (nonimmune). Of particular interest was the capability of the F test to detect P. falciparum prevalence among children, whose immunity is less than that of adults. There were highly significant differences by population in the F test's sensitivity (60% for Irianese vs. 84% for transmigrants) and specificity (97% for Irianese vs. 84% for transmigrants). The test had high sensitivity levels (76-85%) for Irianese children 10 years of age and under and both child and adult transmigrants, but low sensitivity (40%) for Irianese over 10 years of age. Specificity was comparably high (93-98%) for transmigrant children and both age groups of Irianese. The low specificity (79%) for transmigrants over 10 years of age reflected a preponderance of false positives, frequently identified by microscopy as P. vivax. These findings suggest that microscopy comparisons underestimate the performance of the ParaSight F test and that malaria immune status, regardless of P. falciparum density, may influence the test's sensitivity.ParaSight-F rapid manual diagnostic test of Plasmodium falciparum infection.The ParaSight(R)-F test is a qualitative diagnostic test of Plasmodium falciparum, which is based on the detection by a monoclonal antibody of a species-specific soluble antigen (histidine-rich protein (HRP-II)) in whole blood and which can be performed without special equipment. A visual reading is given by a polyclonal antibody coupled with dye-loaded liposomes; when positive, a pink line appears. The test has been compared with microscopic examination of thin blood smears and with Quantitative Buffy Coat malaria test (QBC(R) in a single-blind study. A total of 358 patients who had returned to France from malarial areas and consulted their doctor with symptoms or for a routine examination were enrolled in the study; 33 of them were found to have a falciparum malaria infection by the diagnostic test. On the day of consultation, the specificity of the ParaSight(R)-F test was 99% and its sensitivity 94%. The follow-up of infected patients after treatment showed that the test became negative later than the other reference tests. There was no correlation between antigen persistence and the intensity of the ParaSight(R)-F signal or circulating parasitaemia. No cross-reaction was noted for seven malaria cases due to other Plasmodium species. The test was performed quickly (10 tests in 20 minutes), was easy to read, and required minimal space. For cases of imported malaria, the test's specificity and low threshold for detection could make it a valuable adjunct test. However, in its present form, it cannot replace microscopic techniques which are species-specific and quantitative. In endemic areas, the test seems to be very promising by its results and ease of use according to published field studies.Comparative diagnostic performance of two commercial rapid tests for malaria in a non-endemic area.In the study reported here, the diagnostic performance of two new rapid tests for the diagnosis of malaria was evaluated in symptomatic patients in a non-endemic area. Of 557 consecutive patients, 109 (19.6%) had documented malaria. For the NOW ICT MALARIA P.f./P.v. (Binax, Portland, ME, USA) and OptiMAL IT (Diamed, Cressier, Switzerland) tests, respectively, sensitivity values were 96.3% and 79.8% (P-value, 0.0001), and specificity values were 98.8% and 98.4%. The NOW ICT test did not detect two of 80 Plasmodium falciparum infections, and it generated false-positive results for five patients. The OptiMAL IT test failed to detect ten of the P. falciparum infections, and it generated seven false-positive results. The results suggest that these rapid diagnostic tests for malaria may be useful, but they cannot replace microscopic examination of blood films.[Tests for rapid diagnosis of malaria].Evaluation of OptiMAL, a dipstick test for the diagnosis of malaria.The ICT Malaria Pf: a simple, rapid dipstick test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria at the Thai-Myanmar border.The ICT Malaria Pf test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection was evaluated in the diagnosis of 305 patients with fever who were admitted to a hospital located on the Thai-Myanmar border. All patients were admitted for at least one week to exclude reinfection. The test was performed using admission blood samples collected into ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of the test were 92.7%, 95.1% and 94.7% respectively, compared to standard microscopic diagnosis. The ICT Malaria Pf test is an accurate method for the diagnosis of P. falciparum infection. Its simplicity and rapidity make it particularly appropriate for use in remote areas where microscopic examination of blood films is unavailable.Persistent histidine-rich protein 2, parasite lactate dehydrogenase, and panmalarial antigen reactivity after clearance of Plasmodium falciparum monoinfection.We tested 240 patients with Plasmodium falciparum monoinfection for persistent parasite antigenemia after successful standardized antimalarial therapy by using the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL-IT assays that detect the malaria antigens Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) and parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), respectively, as well as a panmalarial antigen (PMA). The patients were screened for antigenemia on days 0, 3, 7, and 14 of follow-up. On day 0, all 240 patients showed positive reactivity with both assays. Of the 229 cases with negative parasitemia on day 3, persistent antigenemia was observed in 207 (90.4%) of the cases: 188 (82.1%) for HRP2 antigen and 75 (32.8%) for PMA. There was a gradual decrease in antigenemia on follow-up to day 14; however, the drop in reactivity to PMA was less than that for HRP2 antigen. In contrast to HRP2 antigenemia, there was a significant decrease in pLDH antigenemia to 38.4% and to 14.8% (PMA) on day 3 (P < 0.03). The pLDH antigenemia level dropped further to 14.8% on day 7. There was no significant association of persistent antigenemia with gametocytemia. One case with gametocytemia was negative for both the antigens. In conclusion, the OptiMAL-IT assay is more sensitive than the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test for monitoring therapeutic responses after antimalarial therapy since the LDH activity ceases when the malarial parasite dies.MalaQuick versus ParaSight F as a diagnostic aid in travellers' malaria.In this study we assessed whether travellers can perform malaria rapid tests, following the provided information leaflet, and correctly interpret performed and pre-prepared test strips. Two Plasmodium falciparum testing systems, namely MalaQuick (ICT) and ParaSight F were used. Test performance and test interpretation of pre-prepared tests were compared. There was no significant difference in test performance between the 2 tests. Interpretation of prepared test strips in both test systems was very reliable in blood parasite densities between 0.1% and 2%, but major problems were encountered at low parasitaemia (< 0.1% blood parasites) and also in ParaSight F test strips showing high parasitaemia (> 2% blood parasites). Low parasitaemia ParaSight F test strips were correctly interpreted by 52.1% compared with 10.8% correct interpretations with MalaQuick (P < 0.0001). Correct interpretation of highly positive (> 2% blood parasites) pre-prepared test strips was higher with MalaQuick (96.8%) than with ParaSight F (33.8%), P < 0.0001. Both tests were associated with high levels of false-negative interpretations which render them unsuitable as self-diagnostic kits. Efforts must be made to assist lay individuals in test performance by technical test improvement, by equiping the test strips with an additional reading aid for interpretation, and by providing instruction by a skilled person.Diagnostic performance of two antigen capture tests for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Zimbabwe.The objective was to compare the diagnostic performance of two antigen capture tests, ParaSight-F test and Immunochromatographic test (ICT), for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.A comparative study.Burma Valley, Mutare District, Manicaland in Zimbabwe.Patients attending the local clinic with clinical signs and symptoms associated with malaria infection. A blood film was collected from the patient and at the same time blood for the ParaSight-F test and the ICT was collected too. A total of 123 patients were diagnosed using the ICT test, the ParaSight-F test and microscopy which was used as a "gold" standard.True positives and negatives, false positives and negatives with reference to microscopy.The results indicate that ICT had a higher sensitivity (100%) than the ParaSight-F test (93.94%) but showing a lower specificity. The specificity for ICT (75%) is lower than the ParaSight-F test (81.2%) because of the presence of circulating P. falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) in blood even after two weeks post treatment. Two slides that were negative for ParaSight-F tests showed positive on microscopy. However, 21 and 12 slides which were negative on microscopy, showed positive with ICT and ParaSight-F respectively. The fact that ICT detects very low quantities of PfHRP-2 puts it at a comparative advantage because it detects positives even at very low parasite rates.The availability of these two antigen capture tests, which are easy to perform, will reduce the number of severe cases by providing early diagnosis. The tests will also reduce the number of unnecessary treatments and irrational use of antimalarials.[Interpreteation of immunochromatographic tests with HRP-2 antigen in children under 5 years in an area of high risk of malaria transmission in Papua New Guinea].The immunochromatographic tests with HRP-2 antigen (histidine-rich protein) Vision Biotech Pf Rapid Malaria Test was performed in 291 children under 5 years presenting fever or history of fever (malaria presumptive cases) admitted to Children Out-Patient Department of the Modilon Hospital in Madang, in a high malaria risk area of Papua New Guinea. The results of the tests were compared to the results of the parasitic examination of the peripheral blood with light microscopy (thick and thin smears). The HRP-2 test showed very high sensitivity (95.4%) and specificity (94.1%) for Plasmodiumfalciparum parasitaemia and none or very low sensitivity and specificity for other malaria species. The HRP-2 test detected both asexual and sexual stages of the Plasmodium falciparum parasites. The test did not show significant changes in detection of different levels of parasitaemia. These findings enable to conclude that the HRP-2 immunochromatographic assay can be very helpful to diagnose Plasmodium falciparum malaria when microscopy examination is not available, but as qualitative tests can be difficult for interpretation especially in high malaria risk areas. Therefore it can require re-examination of blood with microscopy to confirm species and development stages of Plasmodium spp. and to assess parasite load.Test characteristics of the SD FK80 Plasmodium falciparum/Plasmodium vivax malaria rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.The SD FK80 P.f/P.v Malaria Antigen Rapid Test (Standard Diagnostics, Korea) (FK80) is a three-band malaria rapid diagnostic test detecting Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2) and Plasmodium vivax-specific lactate dehydrogenase (Pv-pLDH). The present study assessed its performance in a non-endemic setting.Stored blood samples (n = 416) from international travellers suspected of malaria were used, with microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Samples infected by Plasmodium falciparum (n = 178), Plasmodium vivax (n = 99), Plasmodium ovale (n = 75) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 24) were included, as well as 40 malaria negative samples.Overall sensitivities for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax were 91.6% (95% confidence interval (CI): 86.2% - 95.0%) and 75.8% (65.9% - 83.6%). For P. falciparum, sensitivity at parasite densities >or= 100/microl was 94.6% (88.8% - 97.6%); for P. vivax, sensitivity at parasite densities >or= 500/microl was 86.8% (75.4% - 93.4%). Four P. falciparum samples showed a Pv-pLDH line, three of them had parasite densities exceeding 50.000/microl. Two P. vivax samples, one P. ovale and one P. malariae sample showed a HRP-2 line. For the HRP-2 and Pv-pLDH lines, respectively 81.4% (136/167) and 55.8% (43/77) of the true positive results were read as medium or strong line intensities. The FK80 showed good reproducibility and reliability for test results and line intensities (kappa values for both exceeding 0.80).The FK80 test performed satisfactorily in diagnosing P. falciparum and P. vivax infections in a non-endemic setting.Limited level of accuracy provided by available rapid diagnosis tests for malaria enhances the need for PCR-based reference laboratories.The rise of imported malaria cases and the high fatality rate in Europe make the search for new and easy diagnostic methods necessary. Rapid diagnosis tests (RDTs) are, in part, developed to cover the lack of diagnosis experience. Unfortunately, our data suggest that the accuracy of RDTs is insufficient and could increase the number of incorrect malaria diagnoses.Performance appraisal of rapid on-site malaria diagnosis (ICT malaria Pf/Pv test) in relation to human resources at village level in Myanmar.Logistic, economic and technical factors limit rapid access to microscopic confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of malaria in many rural areas in endemic countries such as Myanmar. A study was conducted to evaluate a rapid on-site immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf/Pv) for detection of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in two villages in the Taikkyi region of Myanmar. The ICT Malaria tests were performed by a volunteer health worker (VHW) in Yae-Aye-San village and by a professionally trained midwife (MW) in Kankone village. A total of 1000 symptomatic patients participated in the study by providing blood samples for an ICT test and for microscopy. The ICT performance indices, relative to microscopy, were better for the trained MW compared with the less experienced VHW. For P. falciparum and/or P. vivax infections, the sensitivities were 82.7% for the VHW compared with 93.7% for the MW. For P. falciparum infections, the sensitivities were 82.2% for the VHW and 91.3% for the MW, while the corresponding values for P. vivax infections were 66.7 and 79%, respectively. Although the test kit appeared to perform better in more experienced hands, this study questions whether this difference is related to the use of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit, or related to other factors such as differences in the quality of blood slides prepared by the VHW and MW for microscopic examination. Overall, the results suggest that a rapid diagnostic assay such as the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit can be used in rural settings by relatively inexperienced persons, such as VHWs, with a reasonable degree of sensitivity, thus providing on-site confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of malaria.Rapid diagnostic devices for malaria: field evaluation of a new prototype immunochromatographic assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum Plasmodium.The NOW ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. for Whole Blood (Binax, Inc., Portland, ME) is a new malaria rapid diagnostic device that represents a technical advance over previous assays, such as ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. and ICT Malaria P.f.. We evaluated this device in March 2001 in symptomatic patients at malaria clinics in Maesod, Thailand. Microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood smears was the reference standard. In 246 patients, microscopy showed 32 (13.0%) infected with Plasmodium falciparum, 63 (25.6%) with P. vivax, 6 (2.4%) with mixed infections of P. falciparum and P. vivax, 5 (2.0%) with P. malariae, and 140 (56.9%) negative. Sensitivity for P. falciparum was 100% and specificity was 96.2% (200 of 208; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 92-98). For P. vivax, sensitivity was 87.3% (55 of 63; 95% CI = 77-93) and specificity was 97.7% (173 of 177; 95% CI = 95-99), but all the four false-positive results were microscopically positive for P. malariae; thus, specificity for non-falciparum Plasmodium was 100%. These results suggest improved performance over NOW ICT predecessors.Diagnosis of malaria: a review of alternatives to conventional microscopy.Malaria causes significant morbidity and mortality worldwide, including countries with mainly imported malaria. In developing nations, scarce resources lead to inadequate diagnostic procedures. In affluent countries, poor familiarity with malaria may cause clinical and laboratory misdiagnosis. Microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick and thin films remains the current standard for diagnosis. Although it has good sensitivity and allows species identification and parasite counts, it is time consuming, requires microscopical expertise and maintenance of equipment. Microscopy with fluorescent stains (QBC), dipstick antigen detection of HRP2 and pLDH (Parasight-F, ICT Malaria Pf, OptiMAL), polymerase chain reaction assays and some automated blood cell analysers offer new approaches and are reviewed here, with emphasis on clinical relevance and their potential to complement conventional microscopy, especially in countries with imported malaria.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria parasites.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge to laboratories in most countries. Endemic malaria, population movements, and travelers all contribute to presenting the laboratory with diagnostic problems for which it may have little expertise available. Drug resistance and genetic variation has altered many accepted morphological appearances of malaria species, and new technology has given an opportunity to review available procedures. Concurrently the World Health Organization has opened a dialogue with scientists, clinicians, and manufacturers on the realistic possibilities for developing accurate, sensitive, and cost-effective rapid diagnostic tests for malaria, capable of detecting 100 parasites/microl from all species and with a semiquantitative measurement for monitoring successful drug treatment. New technology has to be compared with an accepted "gold standard" that makes comparisons of sensitivity and specificity between different methods. The majority of malaria is found in countries where cost-effectiveness is an important factor and ease of performance and training is a major consideration. Most new technology for malaria diagnosis incorporates immunochromatographic capture procedures, with conjugated monoclonal antibodies providing the indicator of infection. Preferred targeted antigens are those which are abundant in all asexual and sexual stages of the parasite and are currently centered on detection of HRP-2 from Plasmodium falciparum and parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase or Plasmodium aldolase from the parasite glycolytic pathway found in all species. Clinical studies allow effective comparisons between different formats, and the reality of nonmicroscopic diagnoses of malaria is considered.Field and laboratory comparative evaluation of ten rapid malaria diagnostic tests.The paper reports on a comparative evaluation of 10 rapid malaria tests available in South Africa in 1998: AccuCheck (AC, developmental), Cape Biotech (CB), ICT Malaria Pf (ICT1) and Pf/Pv (ICT2), Kat Medical (KAT), MakroMal (MM), OptiMAL (OP), ParaSight-F (PS), Quorum (Q), Determine-Malaria (DM). In a laboratory study, designed to test absolute detection limits, Plasmodium falciparum-infected blood was diluted with uninfected blood to known parasite concentrations ranging from 500 to 0.1 parasites per microlitre (P/microL). The 50% detection limits were: ICT1, 3.28; ICT2, 4.86; KAT, 6.36; MM, 9.37; CB, 11.42; DM, 12.40; Q, 16.98; PS, 20; AC, 31.15 and OP, 91.16 P/microL. A field study was carried out to test post-treatment specificity. Blood samples from malaria patients were tested with all products (except AC and DM) on the day of treatment and 3 and 7 days thereafter, against a gold standard of microscopy and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). OP and PS produced fewer false-positive results on day 7 (18 and 19%, respectively) than the other rapid tests (38-56%). However, microscopy, PCR, OP and PS disagreed largely as to which individuals remained positive. The tests were further compared with regard to general specificity, particularly cross-reactivity with rheumatoid factor, speed, simplicity, their ability to detect other species, storage requirements and general presentation.Validity, reliability and ease of use in the field of five rapid tests for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Uganda.A study was conducted to measure the overall performance of several rapid diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum infection, in order to select the most appropriate test to be used in the field. A total of 742 patients attending the out-patient department of Mbarara Hospital with a clinical suspicion of malaria were included in the study. For each patient, a thick/thin film and 5 rapid tests based on the detection of histidine-rich protein II (HRP-II) (Paracheck Pf dipstick and device, ParaHIT f, Malaria Rapid and BIO P.F.) were performed. Outcomes were validity, inter-reader reliability and 'ease of use in the field', measured by both the general characteristics of the test and by the opinion of the readers. About half (57%) of the patients were positive for P. falciparum. The Paracheck Pf (dipstick and device) was considered as the most appropriate for the use in the field, being sensitive (97%), moderately specific (88%), reliable (kappa coefficient = 0.97), easy to use and cheap (about US$ 0.5/test). The ParaHIT f represented a good alternative.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test, 'Determine malaria pf', in epidemic-prone, forest villages of central India (Madhya Pradesh).A rapid, immunochromatographic test for malaria diagnosis, 'Determine malaria pf', was evaluated by a field team in the epidemic-affected, forest setting of Chhindwara district, in Madhya Pradesh, central India. In all, 526 fever cases were screened for Plasmodium falciparum in October or November, 1999. Those found to be infected were treated with sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine and primaquine. Using microscopy as the gold standard, the new test had a sensitivity of 98% and a specificity of 87%. The positive and negative predictive values were 88% and 98%, respectively. Although follow-up of 64 subjects on day 7 post-treatment revealed that 20% of those who then appeared smear-negative were still antigenaemic, 34% of the subjects were still smear-positive, for asexual parasites, at that time. The Determine test was found to be very easy to perform and the results could be read reliably by field workers, without any supervision. The ease of use of the test indicates that it could be useful in the management of malaria, particularly in remote and inaccessible areas, provided that its accuracy can be assured and that it can be made affordable.Cross-reactivity in rapid diagnostic tests between human malaria and zoonotic simian malaria parasite Plasmodium knowlesi infections.Plasmodium knowlesi has a relatively broad host range extending to humans, in whom it causes zoonotic malaria. Recent studies have shown that human infection with P. knowlesi is widely distributed in forested areas of Southeast Asia. In the present study, we evaluated commercial rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for human malaria to assess their reactivity and sensitivity in detecting P. knowlesi parasites using blood samples obtained from infected monkeys. The blood samples were assayed using two commercial RDTs based on immunochromatographic assays: (i) the OptiMAL-IT, designed to detect parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) of both P. falciparum and other plasmodia, and (ii) the Entebe Malaria Cassette (MC), designed to detect P. falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) and P. vivax-specific pLDH. Interestingly, when the P. knowlesi-infected blood samples were examined with the RDTs, OptiMAL test results were interpreted as falciparum malaria-positive, while Entebe MC test results were interpreted as vivax malaria-positive. The sensitivities of both tests in detecting P. knowlesi parasite were similar to those for P. falciparum and higher than P. vivax. Thus, commercial RDTs based on detection of pLDH should be used with great caution, and should not replace conventional microscopy in the diagnosis of suspected cases of P. knowlesi malaria.Evaluation of light microscopy and rapid diagnostic test for the detection of malaria under operational field conditions: a household survey in Ethiopia.In most resource-poor settings, malaria is usually diagnosed based on clinical signs and symptoms and not by detection of parasites in the blood using microscopy or rapid diagnostic tests (RDT). In population-based malaria surveys, accurate diagnosis is important: microscopy provides the gold standard, whilst RDTs allow immediate findings and treatment. The concordance between RDTs and microscopy in low or unstable transmission areas has not been evaluated.This study aimed to estimate the prevalence of malaria parasites in randomly selected malarious areas of Amhara, Oromia, and Southern Nations, Nationalities and Peoples' (SNNP) regions of Ethiopia, using microscopy and RDT, and to investigate the agreement between microscopy and RDT under field conditions.A population-based survey was conducted in 224 randomly selected clusters of 25 households each in Amhara, Oromia and SNNP regions, between December 2006 and February 2007. Fingerpick blood samples from all persons living in even-numbered households were tested using two methods: light microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood slides; and RDT (ParaScreen device for Pan/Pf).A total of 13,960 people were eligible for malaria parasite testing of whom 11,504 (82%) were included in the analysis. Overall slide positivity rate was 4.1% (95% confidence interval [CI] 3.4-5.0%) while ParaScreen RDT was positive in 3.3% (95% CI 2.6-4.1%) of those tested. Considering microscopy as the gold standard, ParaScreen RDT exhibited high specificity (98.5%; 95% CI 98.3-98.7) and moderate sensitivity (47.5%; 95% CI 42.8-52.2) with a positive predictive value of 56.8% (95% CI 51.7-61.9) and negative predictive value of 97.6% (95% CI 97.6-98.1%) under field conditions.Blood slide microscopy remains the preferred option for population-based prevalence surveys of malaria parasitaemia. The level of agreement between microscopy and RDT warrants further investigation in different transmission settings and in the clinical situation.[Usefulness of the "OptiMAL Rapid Malaria test" for rapid detection of malaria imported to Poland].In this survey the use of OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of malaria was evaluated. It was proved that this test allowed to diagnose the Plasmodium sp. antigen in 72% of examined blood specimens, 82% for P. falciparum infection and 69% for P. vivax, whereas P. ovale was not detected at all. The test sensitivity depended on the parasitemia level. It showed a sensitivity of 100% for parasitemia density exceeded 1%, 95.4% with the parasitemia ranging from 0.1-0.99%. For lower parasite density, the test's sensitivity was of 32 and 60%. The OptiMAL test showed a 99.1% specificity thus it revealed to be significantly high.Performance of an immunochromatographic test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria.The immunochromatographic test (ICT) for the rapid diagnosis of malaria has been marketed for several years. In a study in which three Centres of Tropical Medicine participated and data were pooled, performance of the test varied considerably when comparing the results between each centre. The sensitivity of ICT in 2,343 patients tested in our services was 100% and the specificity 99.74%. Moreover, two patients with a positive ICT would initially have been missed by expert microscopy, with Plasmodium falciparum malaria being confirmed microscopically some hours later. The principal reasons for the better performance of the test in our series appear to be blood collection in EDTA vials and considerable experience with handling and interpreting the ICT test.[Evaluation of the OptiMal test in the diagnosis of imported malarial outbreak].The OptiMal test is an immuno-chromatographic dipstick test that permits indiscriminate detection of Plasmodium falciparum and other species of human malaria. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of the test for diagnosis of imported malaria. A total of 244 patients with a presumptive diagnosis of imported malaria in France were included during the study period. The reference test, i.e., combined thick and thin blood films, demonstrated infection by Plasmodium falciparum in 58 cases, Plasmodium vivax in 12, P. ovale in 8 and Plasmodium malariae in 2. The OptiMal test detected only 46 of the 55 Plasmodium falciparum cases. The sensitivity of the test for diagnosis of that species was 80%, its specificity was 98%, and its positive and negative predictive values were 95 and 93% respectively. Parsitemia studies showed poor test reliability for densities lower than 150/ul. Detection of other species was accurate in 21 out of 22. The results of this study demonstrate that the current version of the OptiMal test should be used with great caution for the diagnosis of malarial infection in hospital practice.Evaluation of three rapid tests for diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in Colombia.The diagnostic capacity of three malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), NOW-Malaria-ICT, OptiMAL-IT, and Paracheck-Pf, was evaluated against expert microscopy in Colombia. We tested 896 patients, of whom microscopy confirmed 139 P. falciparum, 279 P. vivax, and 13 mixed P.f/P.v infections and 465 negatives. Paracheck-Pf and NOW-malaria-ICT were more accurate in detecting P. falciparum (sensitivities 90.8% and 90.1%, respectively) in comparison with Optimal-IT (83.6%). NOW showed an acceptable Pf detection rate at low densities (< 500/microL), but resulted in a higher proportion of false positives. For P. vivax diagnosis, Optimal-IT had a higher sensitivity than NOW (91.0% and 81.4%, respectively). The choice between the two Pf/Pv detecting RDTs balances P. falciparum and P. vivax detection rates. Considering some degree of P. falciparum overtreatment and failure to detect all P. vivax cases as more acceptable than missing some cases of P. falciparum, we recommend careful implementation of NOW-malaria-ICT in areas where microscopy is lacking. The price is however still a constraint.Clinical trials of a new immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Goa.Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) based immunochromatographic test kit (ICT Malaria Pf) for the rapid diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria was evaluated at the clinic of Malaria Research Centre (Field Station), Goa. Of the 98 febrile patients screened, 22 were ICT positive for P. falciparum. Simultaneous microscopic examination of the blood smears of these ICT positive patients showed that 20 were positive for P. falciparum alone, whereas one had mix infection of both P. vivax and P. falciparum suggesting 100% sensitivity. Only one slide negative patient who had taken 600 mg chloroquine the previous day was positive in the ICT. Out of the remaining 76 blood smears, 41 showed P. vivax infection and none cross-reacted with P. falciparum HRP-2 antigen and were ICT negative except one mix infection case in which P. vivax and P. falciparum infections occurred concomitantly suggesting species specificity of 98.7%. The positive predictive value, negative predictive value and efficacy of the ICT were 95.4, 100 and 98.9% respectively. The band intensity of the ICT positive cases significantly correlated with P. falciparum parasitaemia (p < 0.01). The usefulness and the disadvantages of this diagnostic kit have been discussed in context of prevailing malaria situation in the country.Field evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test for detection of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax in patients with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria in eastern Indonesia.In areas such as eastern Indonesia where both Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax occur, rapid antigen detection tests for malaria need to be able to detect both species. We evaluated the new combined P. falciparum-P. vivax immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria P.f/P.v.) in Radamata Primary Health Centre, Sumba, Indonesia, from February to May 1998 with 560 symptomatic adults and children with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria. Blinded microscopy was used as the "gold standard," with all discordant and 20% of concordant results cross-checked blindly. Only 50% of those with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria were parasitemic. The ICT Malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test was sensitive (95. 5%) and specific (89.8%) for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, with a positive predictive value (PPV) and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 88.1 and 96.2%, respectively. HRP2 and panmalarial antigen line intensities were associated with parasitemia density for both species. Although the specificity and NPV for the diagnosis of vivax malaria were 94.8 and 98.2%, respectively, the overall sensitivity (75%) and PPV (50%) for the diagnosis of vivax malaria were less than the desirable levels. The sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria was 96% with parasitemias of >500/microl but only 29% with parasitemias of <500/microl. Nevertheless, compared with the test with HRP2 alone, use of the combined antigen detection test would reduce the rate of undertreatment from 14.7 to 3.6% for microscopy-positive patients, and this would be at the expense of only a modest increase in the rate of overtreatment of microscopy-negative patients from 7.1 to 15. 4%. Cost remains a major obstacle to widespread use in areas of endemicity.Parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in an endemic area in west Uganda.The measurement of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) has been presented as an easy and rapid method for the diagnosis of malaria in humans. In order to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of such a test we examined blood samples from 429 Ugandan patients. While pLDH activity was significantly linked to parasitaemia, sensitivity and specificity were found to be rather low at 58.8 and 62.2% respectively. The positive and negative predictive values failed to meet necessary standards. We conclude that the methods of measurement of pLDH activity in malaria infection, although potentially useful for the fast diagnosis of malaria, need to be improved to be of true value in endemic areas.Comparison of HRP2- and pLDH-based rapid diagnostic tests for malaria with longitudinal follow-up in Kampala, Uganda.Presumptive treatment of malaria results in significant overuse of antimalarials. Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may offer a reliable alternative for case management, but the optimal RDT strategy is uncertain. We compared the diagnostic accuracy of histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2)- and plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH)-based RDTs, using expert microscopy as the gold standard, in a longitudinal study of 918 fever episodes over an 8-month period in a cohort of children in Kampala, Uganda. Sensitivity was 92% for HRP2 and 85% for pLDH, with differences primarily due to better detection with HRP2 at low parasite densities. Specificity was 93% for HRP2 and 100% for pLDH, with differences primarily due to rapid clearance of pLDH antigenemia after treatment of a previous malaria episode. RDTs may provide an effective strategy for improving rational delivery of antimalarial therapy; in Kampala, either test could dramatically decrease inappropriate presumptive treatments.Performance of a rapid antigen test for the diagnosis of congenital malaria.To assess the performance of OptiMAL, a rapid malaria antigen capture dipstick, in diagnosing congenital malaria.Live newborns aged 0-3 days, delivered at Olabisi Onabanjo University Teaching Hospital, Sagamu, Nigeria between August 2004 and January 2005, were screened for malaria parasitaemia with an immunochromatographic test (OptiMAL) and blood film microscopy. OptiMAL detects plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).Twenty-one of 192 newborns (10.9%) were diagnosed with congenital malaria by blood film microscopy. The OptiMAL test was negative in all infants.OptiMAL rapid malaria antigen capture dipstick might not be useful for diagnosing malaria parasitaemia in newborns. Blood film microscopy remains the gold standard for the diagnosis of congenital malaria.Evaluation of the RealArt Malaria LC real-time PCR assay for malaria diagnosis.PCR-based methods have advantages over traditional microscopic methods for the diagnosis of malaria, especially in cases of low parasitemia and mixed infections. However, current PCR-based assays are often labor-intensive and not readily quantifiable and have the potential for contamination due to a requirement for postamplification sample handling. Real-time PCR can address these limitations. This study evaluated the performance characteristics of a commercial malaria real-time PCR assay (RealArt Malaria LC Assay; Artus GmbH, Hamburg, Germany) on the LightCycler platform for the detection of malaria parasites in 259 febrile returned travelers. Compared to nested PCR as the reference standard, the real-time assay had a sensitivity of 99.5%, specificity of 100%, positive predictive value of 100%, and negative predictive value of 99.6% for the detection of malaria. Our results indicate that the RealArt assay is a rapid (<45 min), sensitive, and specific method for the detection of malaria in returned travelers.Immunochromatographic test for the diagnosis of Falciparum malaria.The diagnosis of malaria poses great difficulty at times due to non-availability of microscope, trained personnel or laboratory set up. We undertook the immunochromatographic test in 98 suspected cases of malaria for the detection of antigen of P. falciparum in the blood and to assess its sensitivity and positive predictive value. The sensitivity was 87.06% (confidence interval 77.57 to 92.55%) and the positive predictive value was 93.67%. This is a simple, sensitive and convenient test which can be performed in remote areas.Field evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax infection in forest villages of Chhindwara, central India.A rapid new immunochromatographic test (ICT malaria P.f/P.v) for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax was evaluated against thick blood smears in forest villages of Chhindwara, Madhya Pradesh, where both Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax are prevalent. 344 symptomatic patients (Gond ethnic tribe) in five villages were screened by field staff of the Malaria Research Centre in October 1999. For P.falciparum, the ICT was 97.5% sensitive and 88% specific, with a positive predictive value (PPV) of 87.6% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 97.6%. For P.vivax the sensitivity was only 72%, the specificity 99%, with a PPV of 92% and an NPV of 96%. Although a negative test result was inadequate to exclude parasitaemia < or = 300/microl for P.falciparum and < or = 1500/microl for P.vivax, the test is potentially useful in remote areas.Non-microscopic methods for diagnosis of malaria.Assessment of three new parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pan-pLDH) tests for diagnosis of uncomplicated malaria.A study to assess the diagnostic capabilities of three parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pan-pLDH) tests, Vistapan), Carestart and Parabank), was conducted in Uganda. An HRP2 test, Paracheck-Pf), and a Giemsa-stained blood film were performed with the pLDH tests for outpatients with suspected malaria. In total, 460 subjects were recruited: 248 with positive blood films and 212 with negative blood films. Plasmodium falciparum was present in 95% of infections. Sensitivity above 90% was shown by two pLDH tests, Carestart (95.6%) and Vistapan (91.9%), and specificity above 90% by Parabank (94.3%) and Carestart (91.5%). Sensitivity decreased with low parasitaemia (chi(2) trend, P<0.001); however, all tests achieved sensitivity >90% with parasitaemia > or =100/microl. All tests had good inter-reader reliability (kappa>0.95). Two weeks after diagnosis, 4-10% of pLDH tests were still positive compared with 69.7% of the HRP2 tests. All tests had similar ease of use. In conclusion, two pLDH tests performed well in diagnosing P. falciparum malaria, and all pLDH tests became negative after treatment more quickly than the HRP2. Therefore the rapid test of choice for use with artemisinin-combination therapies in this area would be one of these new pLDH tests.Comparison of the OptiMAL rapid antigen test with field microscopy for the detection of Plasmodium vivax and P. falciparum: considerations for the application of the rapid test in Afghanistan.To establish the sensitivity and specificity of a batch of 'OptiMAL 48' rapid antigen tests procured by the World Health Organization in Afghanistan, a sample was tested, in parallel with routine, microscopical diagnosis, at basic health units (BHU) within Afghan refugee camps in Pakistan. The results of both methods of field diagnosis were compared with those of cross-checking microscopy at a reference laboratory, which were taken as the 'gold standard'. Out of 499 patients examined, 36% were diagnosed as malaria cases by field microscopy and 34% by the rapid test. For the OptiMAL 48 test, cross-checking of the corresponding smears at the reference laboratory gave a sensitivity of 79.3% and a specificity of 99.7% for Plasmodium falciparum and corresponding values of 86.1% and 98.7% for P. vivax infections. The performance of the field microscopy was better, with a sensitivity and specificity of 85.2% and 99.7% for P. falciparum, and 90.4% and 98.7% for P. vivax, respectively. These results show that the performance of OptiMAL 48 is adequate for acute- and post-emergency situations when the alternative is just clinical diagnosis. However, in the developing health system of Afghanistan, the main focus should be on the expansion of the existing network for microscopical diagnosis and quality control, to meet the needs of a stable situation. Rapid antigen tests are more suited to investigations of outbreaks in remote situations, where health services are deficient or absent.Comparison of the diagnosis of malaria by microscopy, immunochromatography and PCR in endemic areas of Venezuela.Whole blood samples (N = 295) were obtained from different locations in Amazonas and Sucre States, in Venezuela. Malaria was diagnosed by microscopy, OptiMAL and polymerase chain reaction (PCR), with Plasmodium vivax, P. falciparum, and P. malariae being detected when possible. We identified 93 infections, 66 of which were caused by P. vivax, 26 by P. falciparum, and 1 was a mixed infection. No infection caused by P. malariae was detected. The sensitivity and specificity of each diagnostic method were high: 95.7 and 97.9% for microscopy, 87.0 and 97.9% for OptiMAL, and 98.0 and 100% for PCR, respectively. Most samples (72.2%) showed more than 5000 parasites/microL blood. The sensitivity of the diagnosis by microscopy and OptiMAL decreased with lower parasitemia. All samples showing disagreement among the methods were reevaluated, but the first result was used for the calculations. Parasites were detected in the 6 false-negative samples by microscopy after the second examination. The mixed infection was only detected by PCR, while the other methods diagnosed it as P. falciparum (microscopy) or P. vivax (OptiMAL) infection. Most of the false results obtained with the OptiMAL strip were related to the P. falciparum-specific band, including 3 species misdiagnoses, which could be related to the test itself or to genetic variation of the Venezuelan strains. The use of the microscopic method for malaria detection is recommended for its low cost but is very difficult to implement in large scale, population-based studies; thus, we report here more efficient methods suitable for this purpose.Evaluation of a rapid whole blood immunochromatographic assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria.Microscopic examination of blood smears is the 'gold standard' for malaria diagnosis, but is labour intensive and requires skilled operators. Plasmodium vivax malaria accounts for up to 70% of infections in Sri Lanka. The objective of this study was to determine the effectiveness of an immunochromatographic test which can detect both the species of Plasmodium, P. vivax and P. falciparum, present in Sri Lanka.Prospective study from May 2001 to March 2002.All persons above 5 years of age who presented to the Malaria Research Station, Kataragama or the Anti-malaria Clinic, Kurunegala, with a history of fever were recruited to the study. Thick and thin blood smears were examined for malarial parasites. The rapid diagnostic test (RDT), ICT Malaria P.f/P.v (AMRAD ICT, Australia) was performed simultaneously by an independent investigator. The severity of clinical disease of all patients was evaluated.The study sample comprised 328 individuals of whom 126 (38%) were infected, 102 with P. vivax (31.1%) and 24 with P. falciparum (7.3%). The RDT was found to be highly sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) for the diagnosis of P. falciparum when compared with field microscopy. The sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria was only 70%. When P. vivax parasitaemia was greater than 5000 parasites/microL the RDT was 96.2% sensitive. A significant association was noted between the band intensity on the dipstick and both peripheral blood parasitaemia (p < 0.001) and clinical severity of disease with P. vivax (p = 0.011).The ICT Malaria P.f/P.v test can be used in Sri Lanka in the absence of microscopists.False positive ParaSight-F test for malaria in patients with rheumatoid factor.Rapid diagnostic modalities for malaria.[Malaria diagnosis and treatment in a rural Health Centre in Mayotte (Comoro archipelago, 2002)].With a marked increase in both morbidity and mortality, as well as a high level of resistance to chloroquine (CQ), malaria is once again a major public health problem in Mayotte, a French overseas territory in the Comoro archipelago. The object of this study is to assess the contribution in the field of two new antimalarial fight steps taken in 2001-2002: The use of the rapid diagnostic test (RDT) for malaria OptiMAL in the rural health centres and the drop of the CQ alone for the simultaneous administration of CQ and sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP) as the first-line treatment for uncomplicated malaria. All 581 suspected malaria attacks, diagnosed by RDT during the year 2002 in a rural health centre of the island, were registered. The good positive predictive value of the RDT used (97.2%) calculated during the study has permitted an important reduction of the rate of wrongly administer antimalarial treatment. Before RDT was used, through lack of emergency microscopic diagnosis, the antimalarial treatment was presumptive in the isolated health centres and that rate was superior to 90%. It is now below 3%. Before the introduction of the new protocol, in the middle of the year 2002, the rate of therapeutic failures with CQ used alone was 40.2% (33/82). With the simultaneous administration of CQ and SP as a first-line treatment, this rate fell down to 1.8% (6/337). For the time being, this new treatment policy is acceptable in Mayotte. But the experience of the countries who have adopted this therapeutic policy shows that the effectiveness of the association CQ-SP is likely to be temporary. It is necessary to set up a "durable long-term" therapy strategy in Mayotte as soon as possible by adopting as first-line treatment for uncomplicated malaria a combination therapy according to the recommendations of the World Health Organization. It could be the artemether-lumefantrine combination which has already been the subject of an efficacy survey in the island.Accuracy of malaria diagnosis by microscopy, rapid diagnostic test, and PCR methods and evidence of antimalarial overprescription in non-severe febrile patients in two Tanzanian hospitals.The study was aimed to evaluate the malaria over/underdiagnosis and over/underprescription of antimalarial drugs. Between February and March 2007 blood samples were collected from 336 non-severe febrile outpatients attended in two peripheral Tanzanian hospitals. Microscopy and a rapid diagnostic test (RDT) were done locally and the accuracy evaluated by qualitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for Plasmodium spp. The testing was performed at National Institute for Infectious Diseases Lazzaro Spallanzani (INMI), Rome, Italy. As a result of PCR, we identified 26 malaria cases out of 336 (7.7%) patients. Microscopy and RDT accuracies were 93.5% and 97.6%, respectively. Overprescription and underdiagnosis rates were 29.3% and 30.8%, respectively. On-field training, clinical management of febrile illness, and malaria microscopy in remote settings should be considered.The hospital- and field-based performances of the OptiMAL test, for malaria diagnosis and treatment monitoring in central India.The performance of the OptiMAL test, to detect and differentiate Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax, was evaluated in central India. The subjects were either symptomatic patients, who presented at a referral hospital in urban Jabalpur, or the inhabitants of remote, tribal, forested villages where malaria is a major public-health problem. In each setting, the results of conventional microscopy were used as the 'gold standard'. Under hospital conditions, the test had excellent sensitivity (100%), good specificity (97%), a high positive predictive value (98%) and a high negative predictive value (100%). The corresponding values in the field-based study in the tribal villages (100%, 67%, 84% and 100%, respectively) were almost as good. The results of OptiMAL testing reveal the decline in parasitaemias (of P. falciparum or P. vivax) after drug administration. For monitoring the effectiveness of treatment, the test could therefore be a useful alternative to microscopy, particularly (1) in places where the facilities for microscopy are poor or non-existent and (2) among hospitalized patients with severe, complicated malaria (in whom parasitaemia and drug response need to be followed very carefully). Follow-up (within 28 days of diagnosis) of the 58 malaria cases detected in the field revealed that the OptiMAL test can be used to detect re-infection with a different Plasmodium sp. (sensitivity = 100%; specificity = 100%; J-index = 1) or recrudescence/re-infection with the same Plasmodium sp. (sensitivity = 83%; specificity = 100%; J-index = 0.83) accurately. The ability to use the test to distinguish P. falciparum from P. vivax, and to identify mixed infections of these two species, is of great significance in areas where the preferred and effective therapy for P. falciparum malaria differs from that for P. vivax.Comparison of a rapid field immunochromatographic test to expert microscopy for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum asexual parasitemia in Thailand.We assessed a rapid, Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein 2 (PfHRP2)-based immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf Test), for detection of asexual P. falciparum parasitemia in 551 subjects in three groups: (1) symptomatic patients self-referring for diagnosis, (2) villagers in a screening survey, and (3) patients recently treated for P. falciparum malaria. Expert light microscopy was the reference standard. ICT test performance was similar for diagnostic and screening modes. Four findings emerged: (1) test sensitivity correlated directly with parasite density, (2) test band intensity correlated directly with parasite density, (3) persistent test positivity after parasite clearance precludes its use for monitoring early therapeutic responses, and (4) a false negative test at 18,000 parasites/microl is unexplained. We conclude that a strong positive ICT test is highly predictive of falciparum asexual parasitemia for the diagnosis of new cases of falciparum malaria in Thailand, but a negative test result is inadequate to exclude parasitemia < 300/microl, and in some instances, even a higher parasitemia.The ParaSight-F dipstick test as a routine diagnostic tool for malaria in Sri Lanka.Blood from 1053 persons who presented for treatment at outpatient clinics of government health institutions in Sri Lanka, and 250 who took part in a blood survey for malaria, was examined by thick blood film microscopy under routine field conditions, and by the ParaSight-F dipstick method. All the samples were also examined microscopically under laboratory conditions when 4 times the number of microscope fields were examined. Compared with this reference standard, the sensitivity and specificity of the ParaSight-F test were 90.2% and 99.1%, and those of microscopy in the field were 92.4% and 98.4% respectively, there being no statistically significant difference between the 2 methods. The ParaSight-F test reading correlated significantly and positively with the intensity of clinical disease of patients but not with their peripheral parasitaemia, indicating that it may be a more accurate measure of the true parasite load than microscopy, which detects only parasites which are in the peripheral blood and not those which are sequestered in deep organs. The ParaSight-F test, however, failed to detect Plasmodium falciparum infections with only gametocytes in the blood (19.6% of the infected blood samples in this study). The time taken for a patient to revert to negativity by the ParaSight-F test was also significantly longer, up to 14 d. This would make the test unsuitable for checking the response to antimalarial treatment within 14 d. In an endemic area it would therefore fail to detect drug resistant populations of parasites.The ParaSight-F rapid dipstick antigen capture assay for monitoring parasite clearance after drug treatment of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Three methods for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection in peripheral blood were compared during antimalarial treatment and follow-up in 32 Burundian patients: dipstick antigen capture assay, standard (TBF) and prolonged thick blood film examination (PTBF) (3 x 5 min and 3 x 20 min examination respectively). Parasitaemia was determined daily by comparison with total white blood cell counts (determined by Coulter counter) until no parasite was detected on 2 consecutive days by PTBF. Cumulatively, 231 observations were made with each assay: 64 were negative and 167 positive by PTBF (59 had parasite counts < or = 100/microL). Compared to PTBF, the sensitivities of TBF and the dipstick assay were 1.0 for parasite counts > 100/microL and 0.458 and 0.966 respectively for counts < or = 100/microL. Overall, the dipstick assay was significantly more sensitive (0.988 vs. 0.808; P < 0.001) but less specific (P = 0.013) than TBF. The dipstick assay is of potential use for monitoring response to drug treatment and for detecting low parasitaemias.Malaria diagnosis by field workers using an immunochromatographic test.A rapid immunodiagnostic test (ICT Malaria PfTest) has been developed by ICT Diagnostics (Sydney, Australia) for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection. The test is an antigen capture assay based on the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 in peripheral blood. This study was undertaken to assess the performance and usefulness of the test as a diagnostic method in highly malarious, inaccessible forested villages of Mandla district, central India. In all, 353 patients with fever were scanned by the test in parallel with thick blood film examination. The sensitivity and specificity were 100% and 84.5%, respectively. The whole test took about 5 min. The test results became negative in most cases (70%) within 7 d after initiation of curative chemotherapy. The test is simple, easy to learn and accurate, and may prove to be an important tool in the battle against falciparum malaria.Use of malaria rapid diagnostic test to identify Plasmodium knowlesi infection.Reports of human infection with Plasmodium knowlesi, a monkey malaria, suggest that it and other nonhuman malaria species may be an emerging health problem. We report the use of a rapid test to supplement microscopic analysis in distinguishing the 5 malaria species that infect humans.Comparison of three antigen detection tests for diagnosis and follow-up of falciparum malaria in travellers returning to Berlin, Germany.We determined the sensitivity and specificity of three rapid immunochromatographic malarial antigen detection test systems (RDTs) for the detection of Plasmodium falciparumand assessed the quality of follow-up results. ParaSight-F and ICT Malaria detect histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2), whereas OptiMal detects plasmodial lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH). ParaSight-F performed with 95.1% sensitivity and 97.1% specificity (554 patients tested of whom 144 had falciparum malaria). ICT Malaria performed with 95.7% sensitivity and 99.2% specificity (718 patients tested of whom 184 had falciparum malaria). OptiMal performed with 76.2% sensitivity and 99.7% specificity (539 patients tested of whom 130 had falciparum malaria). In follow-up investigations, HRP-2 did not appear to be a useful antigen due to its long half-life, whereas pLDH offers a reasonable correlation with the presence of viable parasites in those cases initially detected. We therefore conclude that a combination of both antigens might be the best option for creating a reliable RDT for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria.Diagnosis of malaria in non-endemic countries by the ParaSight-F test.QBC, examination of thin blood smears, and Parasight-F were performed for every case of malaria suspected between May 1997 and December 1998. Data from 310 patients were reported. Fifty had malaria infection diagnosed by QBC and thin blood film, among whom 39 had Plasmodium falciparum infection. Three of these 39 were negative with the Parasight-F test. Eleven patients had a positive ParaSight-F test but microscopic diagnosis methods were negative. Interpretation of these 11 positive ParaSight-F results is proposed to depend on clinical criteria.Relative utility of dipsticks for diagnosis of malaria in mesoendemic area for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in northeastern India.For diagnosis of malaria, popular brands of rapid test kits collectively termed as "dipsticks" were subject to field evaluation in northeastern India for their comparative sensitivity and specificity vis-à-vis conventional microscopic results. Dipsticks based on Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein (Pf HRP-2) antigen capture assay revealed 100% sensitivity and high specificity (94-100%); thus, they were concluded to be reliable tools for confirmed diagnosis of malarial infection. However, an advanced version of the same kit, having incorporated additional pan-malarial monoclonal antibody, was found to be less sensitive (71%) for non-falciparum infections. Besides, Pf HRP-2-based kits continued to show positive results up to day 7, even after clearance of parasitemia on account of persistent antigenemia. This very limitation seemed to have been overcome by parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) enzyme-based kit. This kit was observed to have high sensitivity (81-89%) and specificity (100%) for both falciparum and non-falciparum malaria, but cannot distinguish mono-infection from mixed infections. It is concluded that the rational use of these kits would accord health benefits in terms of early detection and prompt treatment, reduce drug pressure, and possibly delay the emergence and spread of multi-drug-resistant strains of malarial parasites.Rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria by detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen.Malaria is a resurging problem all over the country and rapid diagnosis is mandatory to decrease the morbidity and mortality and for control of malaria. In the current study the aim was to evaluate the usefulness of rapid Plasmodium falciparum antigen detection and to compare its utility over conventional peripheral thick and thin smear examination.Three hundred fifty seven randomly selected patients with pyrexia and or atypical presentations of malaria, found initially negative for malaria were subjected to thick and thin smear examination and Plasmodium falciparum antigen detection test by using commercially available Parasight F. kit.54.6% of cases presented with pyrexia, while other presentations of falciparum malaria were less frequently encountered (162/357). Eighty five patients (23.8%) were diagnosed as having falciparum malaria based on smear/Parasight F. Test. Eighty- four of these patients were positive for Parasight F. test and only 34.51% of these cases were also positive on smear examination.The antigen detection test for Plasmodium falciparum is useful for rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria. It could detect 65.5% cases of falciparum malaria which were initially negative by peripheral smear examination. Hence, this technique is superior to peripheral smear staining and helps early diagnosis.Trial of the ParaSight-F test for malaria diagnosis in the primary health care system, Zimbabwe.Rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria remains one of the main limitations to prompt treatment. Diagnosis based on clinical symptoms is decidedly unreliable, especially in areas of seasonal transmission like Zimbabwe. In view of this, the Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein (HRP-II) antigen detection assay (ParaSight-F test) was tried at 10 health centres in 3 malaria endemicity zones of Zimbabwe, as a malaria diagnostic tool for primary health care. Parasitological evaluations were conducted using thick and thin film microscopy as gold standard, and ease of test operation and practicability to nurses were ascertained by questionnaire. The sensitivity of the test did not vary substantially by endemicity zone and was approximately 93%. Specificities were 85, 72 and 92% in the hyperendemic, mesoendemic and hypoendemic zones, respectively. Positive predictive values varied considerably with endemicity, the lowest being in the hypoendemic zone (56%). However, negative predictive values did not change significantly, with a mean of 94%. It was found that the ParaSight-F test reduced mistreatment for malaria, relative to clinical diagnosis, by up to 81%, especially in the hypoendemic region. Test acceptability evaluations were good.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria.False-positive results of a Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2-detecting malaria rapid diagnostic test due to high sensitivity in a community with fluctuating low parasite density.The persistence of parasite histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) in the circulation after parasite clearance has been considered a drawback for rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) targeting HRP2 and a major cause of false-positive results. This paper reports results of a study into whether a proportion of RDT HRP2 false-positive cases carried parasites using polymerase chain reaction analysis as the gold standard rather than microscopy. The high rate of RDT false-positive parasitemia results in comparison with microscopy was shown to predominantly represent cases that had a parasite density below the threshold for detection by microscopy. Despite the generally low disease-endemic prevalence of malaria in the area, there was a high prevalence of chronic infections with low, fluctuating, parasite densities that were better detected by RDT. Our results suggest that in areas known to have low-density parasitemias, RDTs targeting HRP2 may increase diagnostic sensitivity in comparison with microscopy. While microscopy remains the standard for comparison of malaria diagnostic accuracy, the limitations of microscopy, and the possibility that RDTs may have superior accuracy in some circumstances, should be taken into account when interpreting results of diagnostic trials.Short communication: An assessment of the use of malaria rapid tests by village health volunteers in rural Laos.Rapid malaria diagnosis, a key component of malaria control strategies, is hampered by the expense and training requirements of reliable microscopy. Rapid malaria antigen tests may improve the diagnosis of malaria in the rural tropics. After 1 h training 64 village health volunteers (VHVs) from rural Laos, with no previous laboratory experience, performed two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (ParacheckPf and OptiMAL) accurately. The reliability of six VHVs was assessed longitudinally, over 10 months with different frequencies of retraining. Compared with microscopy, error rates in dipstick interpretation were low (<2%) for both tests and were not associated with retraining frequency (P>0.2). Previously untrained Lao VHVs performed malaria rapid tests reliably with high sensitivity and specificity after minimal training.Feasibility and acceptability of home-based management of malaria strategy adapted to Sudan's conditions using artemisinin-based combination therapy and rapid diagnostic test.Malaria remains a major public health problem especially in sub-Saharan Africa. Despite the efforts exerted to provide effective anti-malarial drugs, still some communities suffer from getting access to these services due to many barriers. This research aimed to assess the feasibility and acceptability of home-based management of malaria (HMM) strategy using artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) for treatment and rapid diagnostic test (RDT) for diagnosis.This is a study conducted in 20 villages in Um Adara area, South Kordofan state, Sudan. Two-thirds (66%) of the study community were seeking treatment from heath facilities, which were more than 5 km far from their villages with marked inaccessibility during rainy season. Volunteers (one per village) were trained on using RDTs for diagnosis and artesunate plus sulphadoxine-pyrimethamine for treating malaria patients, as well as referral of severe and non-malaria cases. A system for supply and monitoring was established based on the rural health centre, which acted as a link between the volunteers and the health system. Advocacy for the policy was done through different tools. Volunteers worked on non-monetary incentives but only a consultation fee of One Sudanese Pound (equivalent to US$0.5).Pre- and post-intervention assessment was done using household survey, focus group discussion with the community leaders, structured interview with the volunteers, and records and reports analysis.The overall adherence of volunteers to the project protocol in treating and referring cases was accepted that was only one of the 20 volunteers did not comply with the study guidelines. Although the use of RDTs seemed to have improved the level of accuracy and trust in the diagnosis, 30% of volunteers did not rely on the negative RDT results when treating fever cases. Almost all (94.7%) the volunteers felt that they were satisfied with the spiritual outcome of their new tasks. As well, volunteers have initiated advocacy campaigns supported by their village health committees which were found to have a positive role to play in the project that proved their acceptability of the HMM design. The planned system for supply was found to be effective. The project was found to improve the accessibility to ACTs from 25% to 64.7% and the treatment seeking behaviour from 83.3% to 100% before- and after the HMM implementation respectively.The evaluation of the project identified the feasibility of the planned model in Sudan's condition. Moreover, the communities as well as the volunteers found to be satisfied with and supportive to the system and the outcome. The problem of treating other febrile cases when diagnosis is not malaria and other non-fever cases needs to be addressed as well.Parasight F test compared with the polymerase chain reaction and microscopy for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in travelers.Imported malaria is an increasing problem worldwide. A rapid and accurate test for Plasmodium falciparum infection would facilitate the diagnosis of malaria in the returned traveler. The ParaSight F antigen capture assay (dipstick test) is a new diagnostic test for P. falciparum based on detection of circulating histidine-rich protein-2 antigen. We performed a blinded evaluation of this assay compared with microscopy and the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 151 febrile travelers. Compared with the PCR, the dipstick test had a sensitivity of 88% and a specificity of 97%. The ability of the dipstick test to detect P. falciparum was similar with that of microscopy (88% versus 83%) since the species of Plasmodium in 14 of 133 malaria-infected patients could not be determined by microscopy due to low parasite numbers. The dipstick test was 40% sensitive for infections with < 50 parasites/microliter, 89% with 50-100 parasites/microliter, and > or = 93% with > 100 parasites/microliter. Circulating antigen was detectable in 68% of the patients seven days after initiation of treatment and in 27% at day 28. The dipstick test represents a simple and accurate test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum infection in the returned traveler.Parasight-F dipstick antigen test in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Ethiopia.To determine the shelf life, rapidity and diagnostic performance of ParaSight-F.Prospective randomised study.Malaria diagnostic and treatment posts and health centres in central-southern part of the Ethiopian Rift Valley.Three hundred and eighty two subjects randomly selected.Double blind evaluation of the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of PFT versus CBF.The point prevalence was found to be 29.7% with species dominance of P. falciparum to P. vivax in the ratio of 4:1. The ParaSight-F test showed, considering P. falciparum only, a sensitivity of 92.5% and specificity of 93%. A remarkably high positive predictive value (PPV) of 82% as well as a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99% was obtained. Considering all species of Plasmodium, sensitivity was 78.6% and specificity 93%, with PPV and NPV of 82% and 91% respectively. Moreover, PFT was found to be rapid with a batch of ten-strips--a rack completed in 30 to 50 minutes, which was five to six times faster than CBF reading. In shelf-life studies, after one year of storage at room temperature, results were found similar to the original readings, indicating the stability and long durability of the test strips.In their durability and high diagnostic performances, both the microscopic slide readings and PFT were found comparable and interchangeable, and advantage in endemic areas where laboratory facilities are not available. The rapidity of PFT may be of greater value during malaria epidemics. But during non-epidemic seasons, the inability of PFT not to detect all forms of malaria remains a draw back.Evaluation of the KAT-Quick Malaria Rapid Test for rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Thailand.In recent years, several rapid diagnostic tests for falciparum malaria have been developed. KAT test results were compared with microscopy on 90 consecutive patients hospitalized at the Hospital for Tropical Diseases, Bangkok, Thailand. Fifty-one patients had P. falciparum infections while 49 had malaria due to other plasmodium species. For a geometric mean +/-SD (Min;Max;range) parasitemia of 11,481 +/- 5.0 (88;713,838;713,750), the sensitivity of the KAT test was 96% (95% CI = 86-99.5), the specificity was 92% (95% CI = 80-99), the accuracy was 94% and the reliability was 85%. These findings suggest that the KAT test is of potential interest in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Thailand.Modeling the financial and clinical implications of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in the case-management of older children and adults in Kenya.Using data on clinical practices for outpatients 5 years and older, test accuracy, and malaria prevalence, we model financial and clinical implications of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) under the new artemether-lumefantrine (AL) treatment policy in one high and one low malaria prevalence district in Kenya. In the high transmission district, RDTs as actually used would improve malaria treatment (61% less over-treatment but 8% more under-treatment) and lower costs (21% less). Nonetheless, the majority of patients with malaria would not be correctly treated with AL. In the low transmission district, especially because the treatment policy was new and AL was not widely used, RDTs as actually used would yield a minor reduction in under-treatment errors (36% less but the base is small) with 41% higher costs. In both districts, adherence to revised clinical practices with RDTs has the potential to further decrease treatment errors with acceptable costs.Trial with ParaSight-F in the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Chennai (Tamil Nadu), India.Efficacy of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein (HRP-II) based diagnostic test ParaSight-F, was evaluated for diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria at the Malaria Clinic in Malaria Research Centre (Field Station), Chennai, Tamil Nadu. A total of 93 febrile patients were screened in parallel by microscopy and by ParaSight-F. The sensitivity and specificity of the test were 100% for the detection of P. falciparum infection.A field trial of the ParaSight-F test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection.The rapid manual ParaSight-F test for Plasmodium falciparum is an antigen capture test detecting trophozoite-derived histidine rich protein II, is simple and provides a definitive diagnosis within 10 min. Compared with 913 thick blood film examinations, the ParaSight-F test had 93.4% sensitivity and 98.2% specificity. Compared with 520 blood samples within the same study examined with the aid of the polymerase chain reaction, the ParaSight-F test had 91.6% sensitivity and 99.4% specificity. The ParaSight-F test could be a valuable diagnostic tool for falciparum malaria in any situation requiring rapid diagnosis in the absence of microscopical examination.Comparison of methods for the rapid laboratory assessment of children with malaria.Rapid diagnosis and accurate quantification of Plasmodium falciparum parasitemia are important for the management of malaria. The assessment of disease severity also depends on evaluation of metabolic indexes such as blood glucose and lactate concentrations. Here we describe an accurate and rapid alternative to conventional thick film examination (Lambaréné method). We also assess near-patient methods for measuring blood glucose (OneTouch) and lactate (Accusport). The accuracy of the Lambaréné method is similar to that of thin films. Results from the OneTouch glucose meter also are in good agreement with a YSI 2300 reference meter. Overall, the Accusport lactate meter agrees poorly with the YSI 2300 reference meter. However, the sensitivity and specificity to detect hyperlactatemia (blood lactate > or = 5 mmol/L) are 0.94 and 0.98, respectively.Detection of histidine rich protein 2 and panmalarial ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test antigens after chloroquine treatment of uncomplicated falciparum malaria does not reliably predict treatment outcome in eastern Indonesia.In regions with drug-resistant malaria, the ability to rapidly detect or predict treatment failure (TF) soon after a course of standard therapy for Plasmodium falciparum malaria would facilitate the prompt institution of second-line therapy. We thus evaluated longitudinally the ability of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv immunochromatographic test to predict treatment outcome. Sixty-six Sumbanese Indonesians with uncomplicated falciparum malaria were treated with chloroquine and followed for 28 days by use of 1997 World Health Organization criteria for assessment of therapeutic efficacy of antimalarial drugs. The ICT Pf/Pv testing could be compared with microscopy in approximately half of the patients on each day of follow-up. Although strongly positive histidine rich protein 2 (HRP2) line intensities (equal to or greater than the control band) in convalescence were highly predictive of TF, any degree of positivity for the HRP2 and panmalarial antigens in convalescence was only moderately predictive of TE Positive predictive values of the HRP2 and panmalarial antigens for TF were 76.9% and 87.0%, respectively, on Day 3, 82.4% and 87.5% on Day 7, and 78.9% and 78.9% on Day 14. Negative HRP2 and panmalarial antigen results in convalescence were even less predictive of an adequate clinical response, and false-negative HRP2 and panmalarial antigen test results were found in one-sixth (6 of 37) of recrudescent infections diagnosed by microscopy among patients with late treatment failure. To reliably predict treatment outcome with rapid antigen tests, further development appears necessary to improve sensitivity for viable asexual parasites while avoiding detection of both gametocytes and persistent antigen in convalescence.Diagnosis of malaria by detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen with a rapid dipstick antigen-capture assay.Two field studies in Kenya and an experimental challenge study in the USA were done to assess the accuracy of a dipstick antigen-capture assay based on qualitative detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2) in peripheral blood for diagnosis of P falciparum infection. In these studies, the assay was 96.5-100% sensitive for detection of greater than 60 P falciparum asexual parasites/microL blood, 70-81% sensitive for 11-60 parasites/microL blood, and 11-67% sensitive for 10 parasites or less/microL blood. Specificity was 95% (95% CI 85-105%; n = 20) among naive American volunteers, 98% (96-101%; n = 112) among volunteers exposed to the bite of P falciparum-infected mosquitoes, and 88% (84-92%; n = 285) among Kenyans living in an area with holoendemic malaria. Our results also indicated that PfHRP-2 antigen was not detectable in blood 6 days after initiation of curative chemotherapy, and suggest that such circulating antigens rarely lead to false-positive tests. The dipstick assay's sensitivity, specificity, simplicity, and speed may make it an important tool in the battle against malaria.Performance of the OptiMAL test for malaria diagnosis among suspected malaria patients at the rural health centers.The OptiMAL test detects both Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax malaria infections. In this study, we evaluated the performance of the OptiMAL test at the Basic Health Units (BHUs) and the District Health Quarter (DHQ) Center in rural villages of Punjab, Pakistan that provide minimal health services. Two sets of blood specimens obtained from 930 suspected malaria patients attending these BHUs were tested at BHUs and the DHQ Center by microscopy and the OptiMAL test. At the BHUs, 231 (25%) of the patients were positive by microscopy and 278 (30%) patients tested positive by the OptiMAL test. At the DHQ Center, microscopic analysis of a second set of specimens from the same patients confirmed the malaria infection in 386 (42%) patients and the OptiMAL test result was positive in 300 (32%) patients. To determine the performance of OptiMAL test at the BHUs and the DHQ Center, all data were compared with microscopy results obtained at the DHQ Center. The OptiMAL test results for P. falciparum at the BHUs were comparable to those of the OptiMAL test at the DHQ Center. However, the sensitivity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) of the OptiMAL test were considerably lower for P. vivax infections than for P. falciparum infections, irrespective of whether the test was performed at the BHUs or at the DHQ Center (P. falciparum: sensitivity = 78-85%, PPV = 89-97%, NPV = 96-98%; P. vivax: sensitivity = 61-76%, PPV = 88-95%, NPV = 90-93%). The OptiMAL test also detected a number of false-positive and false-negative results at both the BHUs and the DHQ Center. The false-positive results ranged from 1% to 2%; however, the number of false-negative results was much higher (BHUs: P. falciparum = 22%, P. vivax = 39%; DHQ Center: P. falciparum = 15%, P. vivax = 24%). In conclusion, these results, when combined with other advantages of the OptiMAL test, suggest that this test can be used by relatively inexperienced persons to diagnose malaria infection in rural areas where facilities for microscopy are not available.Evaluation of diagnostic methods of re-emerging malaria in Korean patients.Malaria is one of the most important parasitic diseases especially in tropical areas. Over 300 million people are affected and the condition causes 1-3 million deaths each year. It is transmitted by the bite of infected Anopheles mosquitoes. Although Korea was declared to be free of Malaria by the WHO in 1979, malaria re-emergence has been apparent since 1993 amongst soldiers located near the De-Militarized Zone (DMZ) in the northern part of the country. Conventional microscopic examination of thin and thick blood films demonstrates the presence of the parasite and thus this method has been used to confirm the diagnosis of malaria, but it is a labor-intensive procedure and relies upon subjective interpretation. To overcome these limitations, fast and reliable methods for malaria detection have been recently introduced. In this study, we compared three kinds of antibody detection kits and one biochemical test kit that determines the presence of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) with conventional peripheral blood smears. The antibody detection methods examined were, two rapid test pack format methods and a single microplate format enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) kit, as manufactured by Korean companies. The sensitivities of the three commercial antibody detection kits in the early stage of malaria were 70.8%, 77.4%, and 63.6%, their corresponding specificities 90.5%, 91.8%, and 80.9%, and their accuracies 87.6%, 87.0%, and 76.7%. The sensitivity and specificity of the pLDH assay were 100% apiece and the results were in 100% concordance with the microscopy of thick blood films. Thus, the pLDH assay may be used as an alternative for conventional microscopic blood film examination, especially in emergency situations when prompt treatment is necessary.Field evaluation of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv immunochromatographic test for the detection of asymptomatic malaria in a Plasmodium falciparum/vivax endemic area in Thailand.Rapid antigen assays provide an effective tool for the detection of malaria in symptomatic patients. However, the efficacy of these devices for detecting asymptomatic malaria, where parasite levels are normally significantly lower than in symptomatic patients, is less well established. We evaluated the efficacy of a new combined Plasmodium falciparum-Plasmodim vivax immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf/Pv) in a cross-sectional malaria survey of the village of Ban Kong Mong Tha, Kanchanaburi Provice, Thailand, from August to December 2000. A total of 1,976 bleeds were made from 559 individuals over the course of the study. Blinded microscopy of thick and thin blood films was used as the gold standard; all discordant and 10% of concordant results were cross-checked. Of 1,976 ICT Malaria Pf/Pv dipsticks tested, 98.3% (n = 1,943) performed as expected, as evidenced by the appearance of the control line. The ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test was both sensitive (100.0%) and specific (99.7 %) for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria with parasitemias of > or = 500 trophozoites/microL; however, only 15.9% (13/82) of infected individuals had parasitemia rates this high. When P. falciparum parasitemia rates were < 500/microL, the sensitivity of the diagnosis was only 23.3%, with a positive predictive value (PPV) and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 76.2 and 97.2%, respectively. The ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test was specific, but not sensitive, for the diagnosis of vivax malaria with parasite rates of > or = 500 trophozoites/microl, with sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of 66.7%, 99.9%, 66.7%, and 99.9%, respectively. At parasite rates of < 500/microL, corresponding values were 0.0%, 99.9%, 0%, and 95.1%. Because of the relatively high cost of these assays, low parasite rates found in the majority of asymptomatic individuals, and low sensitivity of this assay with rates of < 500/microl, use of this assay as a tool for active case detection is of limited value in western Thailand.[Rapid immunochromatographic tests for detection of malaria: principles and strategies for use].Malaria is a parasitological emergency requiring safe quick accurate diagnosis so that appropriate therapy can be implemented. A number of rapid diagnostic tests based on detection of HRP2 Ag, enzymes, LDH or aldolase are now available. However the use of these tests is restricted to trained, experienced staff in special situations. The purpose of this report is to describe the different tests on the market and clarify the limitations for their use.Rapid diagnostic tests compared with malaria microscopy for guiding outpatient treatment of febrile illness in Tanzania: randomised trial.To compare rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria with routine microscopy in guiding treatment decisions for febrile patients.Randomised trial.Outpatient departments in northeast Tanzania at varying levels of malaria transmission.2416 patients for whom a malaria test was requested.Staff received training on rapid diagnostic tests; patients sent for malaria tests were randomised to rapid diagnostic test or routine microscopyProportion of patients with a negative test prescribed an antimalarial drug.Of 7589 outpatient consultations, 2425 (32%) had a malaria test requested. Of 1204 patients randomised to microscopy, 1030 (86%) tested negative for malaria; 523 (51%) of these were treated with an antimalarial drug. Of 1193 patients randomised to rapid diagnostic test, 1005 (84%) tested negative; 540 (54%) of these were treated for malaria (odds ratio 1.13, 95% confidence interval 0.95 to 1.34; P=0.18). Children aged under 5 with negative rapid diagnostic tests were more likely to be prescribed an antimalarial drug than were those with negative slides (P=0.003). Patients with a negative test by any method were more likely to be prescribed an antibiotic (odds ratio 6.42, 4.72 to 8.75; P<0.001). More than 90% of prescriptions for antimalarial drugs in low-moderate transmission settings were for patients for whom a test requested by a clinician was negative for malaria.Although many cases of malaria are missed outside the formal sector, within it malaria is massively over-diagnosed. This threatens the sustainability of deployment of artemisinin combination treatment, and treatable bacterial diseases are likely to be missed. Use of rapid diagnostic tests, with basic training for clinical staff, did not in itself lead to any reduction in over-treatment for malaria. Interventions to improve clinicians' management of febrile illness are essential but will not be easy.Clinical trials NCT00146796 [ClinicalTrials.gov].Short report: Failure of the OptiMAL rapid malaria test as a tool for the detection of asymptomatic malaria in an area of Thailand endemic for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax.We evaluated the efficacy of the OptiMAL assay in a cross-sectional malaria survey in western Thailand from April to August 2001. Expert microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick and thin blood films was used as the gold standard. Positive control lines were evident in 99% (1,128 of 1,137) of the assays tested. However, 34% (384 of 1,128) of assays produced an aberrant result (a positive P. falciparum-specific line and a negative panmalarial line). False-positive panmalarial and Plasmodium falciparum-specific lines occurred in 25.9% (270 of 1,042) and 60.3% (628 of 1,042) of microscopy-negative samples, respectively. Due to the preponderance of false-positive test results, it was necessary to develop subjective criteria for test positivity based on line intensity. For determination of assay performance during this study, we therefore considered all test lines that were scored as intermediate or strong as positive and lines that were faint as negative. Using these criteria, we determined that the sensitivity of the OptiMAL assay for P. falciparum was 25% with > 500 parasites/microl and 10.5% with > 100 parasites/microl, while for P. vivax, the sensitivity at the same parasite rates was 100% and 41.7%, respectively. Further studies are required to determine whether the problems we identified are limited to this particular lot of OptiMAL assays.ParaSight-F test results in cerebral malaria patients before and after treatment in Chittagong Medical College Hospital, Bangladesh.Performance of a commercial immunochromatographic test for the diagnosis of vivax malaria in Turkey.Assessing the Parasight-F test in northeastern Papua, Indonesia, an area of mixed Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax transmission.User-friendly, reliable, and inexpensive methods for diagnosing malaria are needed at the primary health care level. During a randomized treatment trial, the Parasight-F test was assessed on days 0, 3, 7, and 28 against standard light microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick blood smears for diagnosing Plasmodium falciparum parasitemia in patients with P. falciparum (n = 84) or P. vivax (n = 59) malaria. The median P. falciparum parasite count on day 0 was 2,373/microL (range = 20-74,432/microL). At the start of treatment, the Parasight-F test had a sensitivity of 95.2% (80 of 84; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 88.2-98.7), and a specificity of 94.9% (56 of 59; 95% CI = 85.8-98.9). On day 7, this test showed false-positive results in 17 (16.3%) of 104 patients (95% CI = 9.8-24.9). The Parasight-F test performed well when compared with light microscopy in detecting P. falciparum parasitemia in patients presenting with clinical malaria. However, the high false-positive rate on day 7 limits its use for patient follow-up.Colorimetric detection of Plasmodium falciparum and direct sequencing of amplified gene fragments using a solid phase method.A rapid colorimetric assay for the detection of DNA from Plasmodium falciparum malaria is described, allowing direct sequencing of amplified fragments in the positive samples. The method is based on amplification by the polymerase chain reaction (PCR), with incorporation of biotin and a lac operator sequence in the amplified target DNA. The PCR product was immobilized on streptavidin-coupled magnetic beads, and detected by the specific binding of an Escherichia coli lac repressor beta-galactosidase fusion protein. Positive samples were subsequently treated with alkali to generate single stranded templates, which were used for solid phase genomic sequencing. As targets for amplification and sequencing we selected a region of the gene for the antigen Pf155/RESA and a region of the parasite dihydrofolate reductase gene (PfDHFR/TS). We show here that both of these gene targets can be used for specific detection of P. falciparum in patient blood samples. Genomic sequencing of five patient isolates revealed no variation in the Pf155/RESA gene fragment. In a comparison of this sequence with conserved protein domains, a marked similarity to the src homology region 3 was detected. A point mutation was found in the PfDHFR/TS gene fragment of one of the clinical samples, replacing Ser108 with Asn. This mutation has earlier been described in pyrimethamine and cycloguanile-resistant strains of P. falciparum.